Probably about time that I recognize my favorite go to sushi spot.  I've tried too many local places to count and always come back to Yuki .   When I travel I'm always looking for THIS place - the local neighborhood sushi place hidden in the odd strip mall, with a regular clientele, and really good food. -Great service, great price point, and fresh and delicious sashimi and sushi. -On a (rare) cold day, order the katsu curry. -Go with friends, sit alone and read the paper, or share some sake with likeable strangers at the bar. -Doug, Kiyo, and staff are attentive and enjoyable!
Tried this for lunch; great deals on bento boxes and other set dinners, and good prices overall for sushi, especially at lunch. The quality of fish, preparation, and service was all high.  My current favorite South Bay sushi option. Traditional decor -- a nice sushi bar, several tatami seating areas, and tables.  Not quiet but not loud.  Next time I'll try sitting at the bar.
We decided to try this place to celebrate my friend's birthday, which was actually a pretty good idea. 1 of those stars is strictly for the service here-- everyone was super nice and accommodating and they were really eager to help us with surprising our friend. We brought in our own cake and they stored it for us in the back, and after the meal, they brought it out and got the whole restaurant to sing happy birthday, which was really nice. Food-wise, it's not bad. The sashimi is fresh and better than I expected. I think the rolls were fairly standard, but nothing to write home about. There's kind of a lack of vegetarian options, which is kind of unfortunate. I'm not sure how scrumptious plain avocado rolls are. The dinner combos were also pretty standard, and the portions were decently large. tl;dr: I wasn't wow-ed by the food, but the good service here made it a better experience.
Fresh fish, served up in big delicious pieces, on top of perfect sushi rice. The rolls are so tasty...we ordered a couple off the specials list and they were creative and very good. The appetizers were also very good.  And everything came out fast...with friendly smiles. I really liked Yuki Sushi...I would easily go back there to try more stuff on their menu. A nice little hidden gem in San Jose...
Ambiance: In my opinion there are three types of sushi restaurant decors. You have the trendy style, the modern zen-like style, and the traditional style. Yuki Sushi definitely falls into the traditional style. The place is small and looks old and authentic. Doesn't do anything special for me though. 3/5 Food: Being a native New Yorker the prices here were ridiculously low and the sushi tasted better than most restaurants I've been at in New York. There are plenty of options on the menu and everything seems to be good. I went with a few speciality rolls and was filled up and satisfied. Nothing out of the world on the menu, more of a traditional sushi restaurant. End your night with some mochi ice cream, which was delicious (gotta go green tea). 4/5 Service: The service is very quick and efficient. We didn't have to wait long for any of our food and the place wasn't empty either. 4/5
On a quest to find a new sushi joint for some good sashimi and nigiri...this one failed. The sashimi was just ok. Nothing out of this world. The rice on the nigiri was absolutely horrid! It was extremely mushy. Sitting at the bar, I would hope that the chefs are open to taking our order, but they seemed non willing to take our order so we had to order through the waiter. I don't think I'll ever come back to this place!
Hamachi Kama - not bad. Sashimi is better than I expected.  I'm beginning to find that quite a few Japanese restaurants have good sashimi. We also ordered some rolls but they're nothing to rave about. The total bill came out to be very reasonable consider we had alcohol.
I originally gave Yuki a good review in 2011 but they have gone downhill!! I went to Yuki last night and ordered the beef teriyaki and salmon sashimi dinner combination. The beef teriyaki was over cooked and lacked flavor, the salmon sashimi did not taste fresh at all, and the waitress charged me extra to get salmon sashimi only instead of mixed sashimi. Not a huge deal but they should let you know in advance if something will cost extra. There are a lot of good Japanese restaurants in the area. Unfortunately, Yuki is not one of them anymore.
Yuki sushi is a hidden gem! My girlfriends and I decided to have dinner here after a fun shopping... Read more 
We came for dinner and got their sushi specials which included soup and salad. We got a lot of sashimi for $16. It was a good deal as far as portion size goes but I couldn't help being disappointed with the quality of our fish. Their draft beer is $5 a glass. Green tea ice cream is $2 a bowl. My only gripe is their freshness. I wouldn't mind paying more for better fish. Everyone has off nights and here's to hoping this was their's.
Food is really good! Atmosphere is great for a loud date or meeting with your old next door neighbor to confess being the  guy who ran over his cat in 2002 just before you moved! ( :) ) . The spicy tuna roll is th e best item to me.The fried mackerel and halibut jaw are great.I have a little bit of a bias as the big guy sushi chef-Kiyo,lives with my family! :). Too bad he hates sushi and goes to Burger King and never brings any home for us! Some pal he is! This location is more cozy then the  one in Willow Glen.I have been here 150 times I'd say,the  newer one maybe 12 times.Keith is a cool guy as well and his mom's home made plum wine is awesome!
My favorite sushi restaurant in the south bay.  The place is small but food is always fresh.  Nice and clean.
My hot plate was just okay. A lot of variety and mini filler dishes, like kimchi, noodles, and bean sprouts, but overpriced I felt and the actual meal paled in comparison to even the Korean Bistro near 99 Ranch in Milpitas. I have no comment on the sushi as I didn't try that out, but maybe that will fare better! I really loved the interior though. So beautiful and intricate, albeit a bit dark. I went with my friend and felt like I was on an intimate date with her! If they lit a few candles, this would be the quintessential date spot. The girls working there were very nice as well, hard-working and gracious hostesses. Pretty too :)
We had visited Yuki several years ago and had a great experience, but I was a little anxious when we visited recently after reading the reviews. Well, we weren't disappointed.  Our dinner was very good - HUGE portions -- we had enough food for dinner and lunch the following day.  The sushi was fresh, tasty chicken options for our son and the soup and salad was yummy.  We look forward to returning.
This is another case where Yelp has failed me. Or maybe I did not read the reviews well enough to determine the level of sashimi eating customers. First off, when you come to a place and they offer other nationality dishes like Korean short ribs then you have to question how authentic is the food. I came here years ago and have not been back since. So, as we drove up and we questioned why have we not been back for so long. Well, this trip explained it all and why we will be crossing this off our selection for great Japanese places to eat at. Ordered the Chirashi and Sashimi dinners: Bad: - poor cuts of tuna (I was told that the cuts are the parts that you throw away or is NOT use for sashimi) - rice was soggy - we were seated in a back room, which you have to walk through the kitchen to get to. And as you walk through the kitchen the workers give you a dirty look. Which is strange, since the place set-up this messed up seating. - they served smoked salmon in the Chirashi - Who does that! Good: - thick cuts of fish (but bigger is not better) I guess if quality is not your goal and quantity is it, then this place is okay. A roll can hide the quality of the fish cause all that sauce masks the true nature.
Takes reservations... The staff is very friendly....the owner even let me switch the channel of the tv from golf to basketball...which was really nice of him ...in the backroom it was nice and quiet.....=) The furniture in the back is a little old though...maybe think about upgrading it? haha In the beginning they give you cold soba noodles like bread when you get at other restaurants they give you noodles which were okay... Teriyaki Beef+Chicken Katsu Dinner Combo:The food is huge portions...had to take some home to eat later ... The crunch roll and Agedashi tofu was really delicious...
If you're looking for an Americanized Japanese restaurant, this is ok, but it's not even close to authentic. I mostly downgraded them for their quality of sushi. It's horribly bland. Also, their katsu (pork cutlet) is extremely thin and hard. Real katsu should be thick, juicy, and soft. If you must go, order their nabes (stone soups). They're the only saving grace on the menu. Also, their service is horrible. They have a million people running around and yet they always seem to be too busy to help. The last time we went we saw our food sitting on the sushi counter for over 10 minutes. We finally grabbed a waitress walking past and ask about it. Without apology she just brought it over and left, never to be seen again until we got our check.
I haven't written a review in years, but sometimes the food is so bad that I have to warn others to spend their hard earned money elsewhere. Clientele: Mostly Caucasian, not a single Japanese person to be found. Major first red flag. Staff: Attentive, careful, and polite. Mostly non-Japanese, Southeast Asian staff - This was the second red flag. Soba Appetizer: Pleasant surprise to get a small bowl of soba noodles as an amuse-bouche, but it was slightly over-cooked instead of al dente. Dab of wasabi was an authentic touch that was well appreciated. Crunch Roll: Smothered heavily in a spicy sauce that was delicious but highly Western and fatty. Imitation crab meat was used, an incredibly offensive move that was only compounded by the wasabi which was commercially produced and not ground fresh. The ultimate mistake was the rice which was not shiny and pearled, but mushy and lacking in the mildly sweet tartness that comes with properly prepared sushi rice. Sake (salmon, not alcohol for you hakujin) Sashimi: Not unpleasant, but not good either. Odd combination of soft and firm textures, with a touch of gristle. For a better price, consistency, flavor and freshness, stop by Mitsuwa. Yasai Sukiyaki: The over-cooked theme carries through with the vegetables, which were not blanched first and added later, resulting in an unpleasant mushy texture without a hint of crunch or nutrients. The broth was too salty and some restraint should have been exercised with the shouyu. The presentation was unappetizing, with the vegetables arriving in oversized, bruschetta size slabs and the shirataki noodles dumped on top in a cylindrical patty as if they were cooked in the plastic wrap they probably came in. To summarize, go elsewhere. This is simply another mediocre Japanese-esque restaurant in a line of many. I would have given it a 1 to help properly warn others, but that would be unfair to the truly horrid places that deserve it.
Ok, I totally love this place!  I'm starting to get a bad case of the "5 star syndrome", but truly feel this place deserves every last star.  I was recommended to visit this place by a co-worker and realized that my wife had already taken me here.  I ended up having the Sukiyaki and she had some sushi and Hamachi "Jaw bone".  The cost was the same as any other sushi restaurant and service was given with a smile!  I would though, recommend hitting this joint early, as this place will get packed with a quickness! I must say though, this is one of the better sushi restaurants I have been too in a long time.  Apparently, they have been getting great reviews for many years and consistency is what keeps a restaurant in business (in my unprofessional opinion).
CAME FOR SUSHI; GOT DOG. Food is okay.  It's just conveniently located close to home so the gf and I go here on occasion. However, we were there the other night and I felt something brush up against my leg.  Turned around and it was a big white poodle.  WTF??  If you've been here, you know this place is elbow to elbow so there is barely any room to spare for humans much less someone's big poodle. But I digress, when the heck are dogs allowed inside a restaurant?  I confronted the staff -- they didn't say it was a living assisted animal (more bs for what qualifies for that but that's another topic).  The best they could do was get the owner to move the dog to the other side of the table. Never coming back here again!
Found this place on Yelp and decided to give it a try because it was so close to Valley Fair. There was a little bit of a wait, and we came on a random weekday for dinner. The place is really small and I think a lot of people just come here with some coworkers or friends after work. My friend and I ordered a salmon sashimi plate and a chicken sukiyaki entree to share. The sashimi here is really fresh and they give you a decent amount of it. On the other hand, I did not enjoy the sukiyaki. Chicken was dry and everything was really salty. Too salty for my taste buds. I think I'd come back here for the sushi and maybe to try something else, but steer away from the sukiyaki!
Despite it's small, ghetto looking exterior that makes Yuki Sushi look like one of those joints people who don't know anything about sushi go to for a California roll and some chicken teriyaki, this place is pretty crackin! Expect about a 20-30 min wait, but since they serve alcohol outside and have some patio furniture set up, you can get an early start on those sake bombs. The food portions are generous and the prices are reasonable. Between the 2 of us we shared the sashimi dinner, chicken teriyaki, and ten zaru soba, which comes with an assortment of shrimp and vegetable tempuras. (Yes, our eyes are bigger than our stomachs) The small dish of soba noodles given as an appetizer tastes strongly of wasabi, so don't choke on it like I did. The soba dinner was good, though I wish the sauce was a little tangier. The tempura that comes with it is crispy with none of that over-battered heaviness. And the sashimi pieces were pretty big and decent quality. For that much food and our share of sakes and beers, our total was only around $45--a solid meal that won't break your bank.
I have to say, the quality of food and service are pretty exceptional. Price is also quite reasonable. I also like the good selection of vegetarian meals. Compared to many "Korean" or "Chinese" owned Japanese restaurants, this place is much more authentic. I have been there 3 times recently, and will continue to go back there.
Love this place. Great service and food every time. never a disappointment.
OMG..how does Yuki have so many positive reviews and over 700???!!!! A rare miss for me using Yelp but Yuki was a bit of a disaster.... Ordered their Soba - I'd rather chew on wood.  No taste and the noodles were barely cooked.  They give you some wasabi and what appears to be some soba sauce and nothing = no taste and bad texture.  FAIL!!! Based on reviews, sashimi was supposed to be good - oh how the reviews were wrong. Besides the tuna everything else on our sashimi combination plate was poor quality.  I think they just give you larger portions of sashimi so people may like that but if you really like sashimi you'll be sadly disappointed. Do yourself a favor...there's plenty of other Sushi restaurants around that have above average sushi/sashimi/soba for half the cost.
Quick Overview: Good service, average sushi, easy parking. Details: Tempura: 4/5 not bad Spicy tuna roll: 2/5 not spicy at all, and skimpy Rainbow roll: 3.5/5 I have had better Alaskan roll: 3/5 cream cheese and avocado wrapped in salmon, average Negihama: 3/5 yellowtail and green onion roll, very average Bottom line: Not the freshest fish, average food.
i really like this place! I'm actually surprised a lot of people that tried the sashimi rated this place so low! I ordered a Salmon sashimi plate mixed with Hamachi, and it was delicious! The salmon was SO good and Hamachi was more for my grandma but I thought it was one really good too! We also ordered sweet shrimp nigiri, but I didn't like it... it's just not my taste BUT I loveeeeeeeed the fried shrimp head it comes with! In my experience, my waitress was REALLY attentive and nice! AND the sashimi was FRESH! Doesn't get much better than that.
If you're looking for healthy and good food, this is the place to be! I usually go here for lunch with my coworkers. I love their Salmon teriyaki and their Kiyo's roll rocks! It's a sushi made up of eel inside with topping of Mangoes, nuts, and glazed with Unagi Sauce, cream cheese and Siracha sauce. I haven't tried that kind of sushi in any Japanese restaurants I've been to so it's one unique thing they have here.  It's a must try!
Came by for lunch the other day. Made a reservation for our party and we were seated at the traditional Japanese table where you had to take off your shoes. The meal started off with the complimentary cold soba noodles which was good. We started off with appetizers which included tempura, beef tataki, and sashimi. We ordered a huge selection of rolls, including rainbow, crunch roll, and dragon roll to name a few. Most of the rolls were tasty as the layer of rice was relatively thin and the sauces were a nice contrast. Fish was relatively fresh. Service was decent throughout the meal as the waitstaff came by to refill our tea pot.
Went there with an expectation that this place will be good after researching on Yelp.  It was very disappointing.  Food was not particularly bad but nothing special; I could get that kind of sushi quality anywhere.  My friend had curry with very dry, chewy port cutlet, yak! What truly was disappointing was service, it was BAD!!! Waitresses were impolite and unfriendly.  We are never going back to this place again.
The bomb. Been coming here for 20 years and the food and service is always great. The  place is busy, so plan ahead.   Portions are big and tasty.
The staff and ownership here are very friendly and make coming here a joy.  The restaurant is a bit small and cramped for larger groups, but for the most part, it works.  The gyoza is delectable and their other non-seafood options rarely disappoint, although sometimes the teriyaki chicken can be chewy. Yuki Sushi will continue to be a go-to restaurant for my group outings and celebrations.
I have been there many times already. It has never disappoint me. The food is exceptional every time. It usually comes in big portions and the prices are very reasonable. My favorite dishes are chicken kara-age, kaki fry, yudofu, beef teriyaki and Uni sushi. I guess the bad thing about this restaurant is that it always has long line. I suggest you to either go early or make a reservation if you don't want to wait for 20-30 mins. Overall I will continue to come back
Hands down best sushi in the area with very, very good prices, I think. It's a tiny place, so there can be a wait in the evening. I come here whenever I feel like raw fish, so any wait has been fine with me. Note: be careful with takeout! I have definitely gotten some subpar takeout from this place with inferior pieces or substitutions I was never alerted to... Check your food before you go. I have only had a couple of bad experiences with takeout, which were upsetting enough to keep me away for awhile, but I always keep coming back because... see sentence #1.
Pretty good sushi place, I would come here again. They give you noodles at the beginning before you order, which is a nice touch. The sushi was good, not memorable, but quality and good. The thing that bumps this up from 3 to 4 stars is how attentive they are to the needs of children. First, they sat us in the back room, which I appreciated because we didn't have to worry as much about our son disturbing other diners. They brought out a cup of water with a lid for my son (22 months) without me asking for it and they automatically brought a bowl of noodles for him that didn't include wasabi and green onions. Smart move! They also brought his food out first. We will probably be coming back here again just because they made it so easy to dine out with our little guy. It's nice to have a place nearby with high quality food that is also kid friendly.
oh my gosh. This place is delicioussss!!! With very reasonable prices!! I got the rock n roll, spicy tuna and crunch spicy. ALL DELICIOUS. They also had great service and very friendly staff and sushi masters!! Keep it up! :) I will definitely be returning!
Please don't let the strip mall location deter you.  Hands down this restaurant creates the freshest most delicious sushi I've tasted in a long time.  My girlfriend has been raving about this place for years and compares all her other sushi experiences to Yuki and now I know why.  The quality is exceptional and the slices of fish on the nigiri are generous. Next time I'm in Santa Clara or driving past S.C. I will definitely make a stop here.  Yes, this place is that good.
Store's a little tiny, but luckily we beat the rush (there's not many seats). I heard about this place from a variety of sources, and so we had some high expectations. Honestly my boyfriend and I didn't think it was anything super special. He got salmon, hamachi, uni, and some other nigiri and I got a dragon roll. Both of us were unimpressed. Definitely hope to come back in the future and try the hot entrees; maybe that's where the popularity of this place lies?
Pros: - Salmon sashimi was fresh but tiny - Staff was somewhat friendly Cons: - Chirasi has very little good fish and expensive - The dinner combo with sashimi does not include salmon sashimi.   For salmon sashimi, there is additional cost - The oriental seafood soup didn't have that many clam and just mediocre - The roll selection was very limited with fresh fish If you are a salmon sashimi lover like me and want good simple rolls with lots of fish, do NOT come here.  I was disappointed.
Definitely the best Japanese place in the area. I just wish we'd found it sooner (moving to Belmont next weekend)! Wait: The place is very small, so there's a bit of a wait, but it was no longer than anyone would expect from a small restaurant. There are options for bar, mats, and just regular tables. We sat at the tables. Atmosphere: Even for a Thursday night, it seemed like everyone was happy and having a good time. The waiters and waitresses would do shots with people, and were very friendly and pleasant. What we ordered: Katsu Curry: Curry is one of my all time favorite foods in the world, and this place does it right. Delicious stew with potatoes, beef, and carrots, walled in by a large portion of rice which is topped with that glorious panko-crusted pork. Teriyaki Beef+Teriyaki chicken Dinner Combo: Boyfriend ordered this, and it was delicious. Many times when getting Teriyaki Chicken from restaurants they burn the chicken or it comes out dry- this was juicy and delicious with a great sauce. Gyoza: I didn't personally partake of the Gyoza (having been ruined on it by the monstrosity that was microwavable potstickers-they're about as disgusting as they sound) I can't speak to their flavor. However my boyfriend assures me they were quite good. The right amount of crispy, did not skimp on the meat. I would have loved to get some Mochi Ice cream for dessert, but alas, the portions were large enough that we were both stuffed + leftovers. This place will definitely be worth the drive down from Belmont.
Solid, good value sushi restaurant that is extremely popular with the clientele.  Stopped for a late lunch and the crowds were still stopping by though service and seating is fairly efficient. Decided to order the chirashi ($14.95) and a nigiri order of saba ($3.95).  Complimentary cold soba noodles in a small appetizer plate are given to each customer.  It was fine. My chirashi came with both miso soup and a salad with a light miso dressing.  Salad was fresh. A large bowl or chirashi was soon dropped in front of me.  Large cuts, though a basic selection fitting the price: several pieces of tuna, a large single slice of hamachi, a slice of smoked salmon, two pieces of tamago, a piece of octopus, and a thin slice of halibut, and finally a cooked shrimp.  I did enjoy the generous addition of marinated mushrooms. My nigiri was also a large generous cut, but like the chirashi displayed an emphasis on value rather than preparation.  Saba is typically prepared with a thin slice of seaweed on top at top sushi places to counteract the very fishy nature of mackeral.  No seaweed here.  Similarly, all the chirashi cuts were pretty coarsely cut though, again, generous in size.  The tamago tasted fine, but also fell apart once picked up. Overall, I enjoyed the lunch prices and thought it was a good value if the location works for you.  Tomi Sushi in Moorpark is higher quality, but a bit of a trek and this location is much better than anything Santana Row has. Yuki accepts credit cards, including American Express.
Par excellence. Where to start?! The beef tataki was ok as probably the worse dish we had but it wasn't bad at all. Just compared to the rest of the dishes! Tofu agedashi was superb - nice ad crunchy on the outside and soft inside. The sauce was a perfect complement. Unagi donburi was as good as most other places but not the best ever. The eel was a bit too fishy but I had no problems with it. Sashimi moriawase was excellent. Large thick slices which tasted fresh and leaving us wanting more. We ordered another hamachi because it was so good. Dragon roll was excellent although a little poorly constructed as it fell apart and stuck to the plate a bit but taste cannot be faulted. Crunchy spicy roll was also excellent with the same issues as the dragon roll. It's far away but we would definitely come back here. Yummy and worth the wait.
Been going to this place alot lately for lunch.  The Bento box here is a great deal.  You get to select two items and get some sashimi on the side.  There usually is a small wait to get in but it's not something ridiculous where you start to think about where your life is headed while your stomach is telling you to feed it. They have a small sushi bar in the restaurant that seats around 8-10 people.  I haven't tried a variety of Sushi here but it looks very fresh and good. The atmosphere here is very chill and I often recommend this Japanese restaurant to friends and they come back with glowing reviews as well.
I definitely like the Yuki Sushi at Willow Glen better. The menu doesn't have as wide of a selection as the one at Willow Glen. They don't have their bombass tuna tartare appetizer and also less sushi rolls to choose from. We had their Agedashi Tofu, which we didn't like very much. You can really taste the ginger though. We also ordered their calamari that didn't come with any sauce, it didn't have enough flavor so we had to ask for spicy mayo. I had the Alaskan and Spicy Tuna roll, which was good but nothing special. The spicy tuna tasted good with the spicy mayo too! Service is cool and prices are alright.
4.0 Stars Yuki Sushi is a small, cozy Japanese restaurant located behind Valley Fair mall. The restaurant is actually bigger than it initially appears. My friend and I didn't have trouble getting a table for dinner around the prime dining hours on a Saturday night. There is a whole back section with additional seating, but you have to awkwardly walk through the kitchen in order to get there. Our meal started off with complimentary cold soba noodles topped with green onions and served in a light soy sauce. I tasted a small hint of wasabi in the noodles too. With the colder weather outside, I was in the mood for Sukiyaki and I was glad to discover it on their menu. The price of Sukiyaki here is very reasonable at $12.75 and it even includes miso soup and a bowl of rice. I've seen other restaurants charge $18+ for this dish. I highly recommend ordering it! The Sukiyaki is served in a cast iron pot with your choice of beef or chicken. This pot is packed full of ingredients including carrots, broccoli, napa cabbage, sliced shitaki mushrooms, bamboo, green onion, tofu, and glass noodles. The beef was cooked on the medium to medium well side and it surprisingly wasn't overly dry. The Sukiyaki sauce/broth probably helped keep it moist. The sauce/broth gave the dish an overall nice, sweet, and hearty flavor. My friend and I also shared a couple different sushi rolls. I'll make a note that the sushi rolls are on the smaller side, but this is reflected in the slightly cheaper pricing. The presentation on the rolls could also have been slightly better. I found sections of the roll to be quite sloppy. Toshi Roll ($5.75) *4 pieces *Tuna, Hamachi, Smoked Salmon, Avocado, Cucumber, Spicy Cod Roe *This roll is a great value compared to the other ones we ordered! I remember eating some big chunks of fish in this roll. *I could not taste any spice in this roll. The flavor was dominated by the three different kinds of fish. *Highly recommended. Negihama ($4.25) *Hamachi, Green Onion *6 pieces *I describe the sushi in this roll as maki sized. They were shaped like small cylinders. Negisake ($4.25) *Smoked salmon, Green Onion *6 pieces *We asked to substitute the smoked salmon with fresh salmon instead. This roll was also maki sized. Rock n' Roll ($4.95) *Unagi, Avacado, Masago (tiny fish eggs) *6 pieces *These rolls were slightly larger than the Negihama and Negisake. I found this Overall, the Sukiyaki was the star of the meal and pushed this review to 4 stars. The sushi was good, but not exactly amazing. The roll presentation could have been better, but I was still glad the fish tasted good. The pricing was also decent for the amount of food we ordered. == A MUST TRY! ==
I have been to yuki for about a year now and am a sushi fan,  everything in yuki was great till i ordered some oysters and super fishy sushi off their menu... Everything in the first half of restaurant looks great until i walked towards the back room, i had a quick glance at the kitchen and saw the bathroom in the kitchen..(Go figure) they have a metal desk preparing our meals 1-2 feet away from the bathroom. It raised some questions about being hygienic ; however, it didnt bother me that much after i sat down in the back room... I had several bites of the nigiri  i ordered and thought it was kind of fishy and funky at first, but thought about the reputation and rating it had on yelp that it wouldnt be possible for them to be this lousy, so i carried on... i had food poisoning that night after having a set order of sushi and raw oysters at Yuki, and cannot believe a restaurant with such rating could still have such problem. I am terribly disappointed in the yuki and lost all my confidence with their raw food. Just giving you a heads up, i used to be a regular here and now suffering from their unprofessional-ism. I mean come on, if you're going to overlook the freshness of the food before you present it to your customer's table then why bother serving it ? my days of diarrhea and vomiting are not over yet.FML
I was expecting more. Not gonna lie, based on all the reviews.... Pros: + Close to home + Reasonably priced + Fish was fresh + Cozy + Nice service, I requested a roll made with smaller bites for easier consumption Cons: + I possibly may have had the rolls made by the rookie chef, they were kind of sloppy + Crowded, tiny building + I thought the menu was kind of uncreative, that said.... I'll give this spot a few more tries though, I can see a lot of potential. I like going to sushi when the chef knows me and makes custom rolls to my preferences. Not expecting that at every restaurant, but that's my favorite treatment.
Service was impeccable with a lot of preemptive touches to make our family dining experience great. Plus, we loved that they didn't rush us out even though we had a prime table and there was a line-up out the door on a Friday night. We should have listened to the other reviewer who said the Kid's Bento Box was enough for two kids! Those things are huge! Only reason I'm not giving five stars is that the quality of the food was a little less than what we prefer and are willing to pay more for. But overall, we'd happily come back.
I love this place.  It's in a strip mall off of El Camino (a few blocks off).  There's parking, the staff are super chill and friendly (and provide excellent service).  There are 3 tables in a tatami mat area that are pretty cool (two 4 tops, one 2 top), but they're next to the door, so kind of cold. The sashimi combo is really good (make sure you ask for "no octopus" if you don't like octopus), and everything fried is DIVINE.  Next time, I'm going to get chicken katsu AND pork katsu and just turn into a ball of fried goodness, but maybe I'll get some sushi too.  LOVE their dinner combos! The only bad thing I would say is that the yakitori is super sweet.  I wouldn't get that again, unless you really really have a sweet tooth. p.s. -- Bathrooms are clean!
Oooh, I don't know... still the same great quality of fish... but I really don't remember my spicy tuna being a pastel pink tinge with a strange chicken salad consistency... oh, and NOT being spicy AT all? It's almost been 7 years since my last visit... and the fish is still good.  It's still the same hole in the wall w/ the same proximity issues I remembered, but I'm happy they keep the fish quality consistent.  Aside from the weirdest spicy tuna roll I've ever eaten, it's the same... Well, with the exception of deserts... their tempura ice cream was wildly different - it looked and tasted like ice cream wrapped in a 1cm layer of pound cake, then very lightly battered and fried.  It wasn't the crunchy hot/cold item I was looking forward to... instead, cold - wet and soggy. They did redeem themselves with an awesome assortment of cupcakes though.  Burnt almond won my heart instantaneously. Still... cupcakes and sushi?  =/ ps: The menu items have either reduced in price, or I am no longer living like a broke college student.  The portions are much smaller than what I remember though...
i liked this place because it was right across the street from my old apartment, so if ever i found... Read more 
I wanted to see what all the hype was all about since this place had 800+ reviews, but I was SOOOO dissapointed -_- 1) the soba was SO gross -_-. the sauce was okay, but the noodles were HORRIBLE! It was so soggy.. 2) We ordered the shumai as an appetizer and it just kinda tasted the ones you buy at the asian market and steam it.. 3) Our main dish that we ordered was the 15 piece combination sashimi plate. The sashimi slices were WAY too thick and I could smell the non-freshness.. If you want absolutely fresh sashimi, I don't recommend coming here. 4) We also ordered the Crunchy roll. Comes in 6 pieces but..6 very small pieces.. and the the rice was falling off of the roll because they drenched it in teriyaki sauce.. Overall, the service and the environment was alright, but the food was ehhhhh for me.
Soooo yummmy! I went here today with my friends as soon as it opened! It was our first time here and the customers next to us assured us that this was a great place to eat. When we sat down in the relatively small restaurant, we were given complimentary noodles, which were simple yet yummy! Even my picky little brother liked it. Looking at the menu, we were surprised with the selection of sushi rolls, it being slightly less than other places we have went to and many of the rolls were around $5 for 4-6 pieces. Definitely worth it though! We all got two rolls each and decided to share. We got the Rock n' Roll, California, Alaskan, New York, Dragon, and Toshi rolls which were all extremely good! The Toshi roll was my favorite because it was filled with different fish, although it only came with 4 large pieces. It's understandable since it was only around $5 but I wanted way more. All these rolls were amazing and I will definitely come back!
I don't know, guys. I believed the hype and went here for dinner with a few friends. The atmosphere is adorable but the sushi was unremarkable at best. I had the weirdest spicy tuna roll of my life here  - I don't know what they used to make it spicy but it didn't seem like the usual red chili. The sashimi was probably the best thing we had, and it was just solidly average. Two of said friends aren't big sushi people - they had other menu items and seemed pretty happy, but the other sushi-lover and I walked away underwhelmed. And still hungry. It wasn't bad. I'm just not in a rush to go back.
Yummy, yummy authentic (to me) sushi. A friend of mine who is Japanese recommended this small place to me. I asked him to recommend a place that has the most authentic-like japanese food - and so he recommended Yuki Sushi. It is different than your average restaurant that's mainly owned my non-Japanese managers (Chinese, Hong Kong or American owners). Don't expect to eat your average California Roll or sauced up, sweet, made up sushi roll. This place is for the serious Japanese sushi fan who is looking for fresh, tasty, hearty sushi or Japanese food. It seems they are more about QUALITY fish/dishes, then they are of QUANTITY of different, invented rolls. They have some noodle dishes (hot and cold) that were different to me, but are sooooo good. Anything in one of their clay pots is hearty, filling and delicious. It's a really, really small place, that's the only reason why I gave it 4 stars. They are always busy...so expect to wait and work up an appetite.
Incredible food and fresh sushi, friendly wait staff, affordable prices-- one of the best restaurants in SJ!  I like that they give you a small serving of the soba noodles as soon as you're seated.  Their salad dressing is also very unique and delicious.  I love their soft shelled crab. The wait may be a bit long, but it's definitely worth it.  I like this location better than the one in Willow Glen, but both are good.
This place is okay -- not the best Japanese restaurant, but good enough to stop by once in awhile. Their chicken teryaki is good, not my favorite, but good. I've never noticed this place and I always pass by it. It was my friend who suggested this little place and I'll likely be coming back. It's a hidden spot in a small shopping center, but it seems like they have regulars that come in. There was a big crowd of people waiting outside for lunch, which definitely speaks to how the food is. Good Service, Good Prices, and okay food. I'll probably be back.
We were looking forward to a pleasant meal with an old classmate that I haven't seen in, well let's just say that it was more than half a lifetime ago and leave it at that... It's a small place in the corner of a modest little strip mall next to a model train shop.  We had reservations for 5 people, but there was still a wait as this place cannot accommodate a lot of people at once, even with the small hidden dining area in the rear.  My first impression is that this place caters mostly to non-Japanese clientele, ourselves included;  this is only an observation as I subscribe to the generalization that restaurants that can attract their own ethnicity tend to be more authentic.  To be fair, we didn't sit at the sushi bar, nor did we partake in the tatami seating during our only visit, but we got a good sense of the cuisine in general... The menu is pretty diverse, you can almost have anything you want including cold soba noodles http://www.yelp.com/biz_... which is not always offered at other places.  The buckwheat noodles were not quite al dente, which is just right because once you cook past this point it gets mushy rather quickly.  I added this to an entree combination of grilled saba and chicken kara-age. http://www.yelp.com/biz_... I loved the saltiness of the mackerel paired with the fried goodness of the boneless chicken, I just scarf that stuff up.  My wife didn't do badly by going for the chirashi bowl, http://www.yelp.com/biz_... the fish selection was nothing spectacular but that was made up by the overall quality and freshness.  My son somewhat followed suit by having a sashimi combination of his own, choosing the sashimi and the saba, http://www.yelp.com/biz_... kinda funny since this is what I usually like to order.  As if this wasn't enough, he also ordered a Rainbow Roll to augment his selection... http://www.yelp.com/biz_... The place was full but I thought the service was pretty even, not bad, but not great.  We sat in the dining area in the back about 15 minutes after our entire party was present.  We thought the prices were pretty reasonable for the quality and quantity offered... Since I'm just visiting the area, I don't see myself coming back, although this kind of place would be a terrific neighborhood Japanese spot for anyone within say a 5-10 mile radius.  The point of this visit was to catch up with our old HS friends and I would say that it was a nice casual place that let us do that very thing.  Good food and good company, good times...
I liked the little bowl of soba noodles they give you before your meal --- hamachi kama - good and moist - they cut it up into sections - i'm not sure how i feel about that - if you are sharing and a germophobe, you're not bumping into other chopsticks picking at the cheek.....but i found that i had to pick a lot of chunks of bones from my mouth which was annoying croquettes - good - wish they were more potatoey rolls - rainbow and toshi -- not good - avoid rolls at all cost - they were small and the fish tasted funny....and not in a good way... probably won't come here again unless i am in the area service was good and fast - it got really crowded at around 730 on a thursday
The quality of their sashimi is excellent.  Their rolls are a decent size and their teriyaki is pretty goot.  I love how they first bring you out a sample of soba.  Although prices here are a little on the high end, you get what you pay for, which is really good quality food.  The waiters were always nice and even though they get busy most of the days we come here, they are very patient with the customers and your service is no different from a slow day.
I LOVE SUSHI a lot! This place is small and has the ambience of one of those sushi places in Tokyo. It's part of the reason why I like this location. I love everything in the menu-- but my meal are mostly SUSHI Dinners or Sashimi for lunch.  I have tried all the items under the SUSHI DINNER and love them all! Part of my choosing this place is the proximity to my house, but the crowd is also important.  I like eating with great looking people around...and most of the time, when I go here...that seems to be the case.  ;)) Yuki Sushi won't disappoint.  Kampai!
Our latest go-to sushi place.  Wife's brother and his wife have been regulars here for years, so when they first started taking us there we got the rockstar treatment.  My wife and I have gone a couple times since and been treated really well -- even when they didn't remember us.  And when they did, oh boy, were they gracious and generous. Food is realiably very good to outstanding.  You may have to wait a bit, but that's to be expected when you're getting great quality.  Service, as I've said, is friendly and warm.  Get some sake and share -- it's the nice thing to do :-)
At first glance, this seemed like a good find.  The atmosphere is intimate with great lighting.  I was also pleased to see so many vegetarian options.  I order something that seems very delicious: a veggie hot pot with yam noodles and sauce. This hot pot is literally vegetables in hot water with some sauce on the side that I think was half red wine vinegar and half soy sauce.  It was awful!  And apparently "yam noodles" means ramen noodles and yams in the same hot pot.  Don't get me wrong, I love my veggies, but I wouldn't pay $11 for them in hot water.  Without any flavor it was impossible to eat any more than a few bites.  So, I'm starving and I was ripped off, great!  I should also mention my man got the sushi, and he said it was less than mediocre. When our server came around, I communicated my displeasure for the dish, and she sent someone else out.  I also talked to this other server and she said, "Well, it's vegetarian."  I said, "Well, I have had great, flavorful vegetarian dishes."  She said, "Yeah it's very plain, I'm sorry, you should've asked me for a recommendation."  I was so stunned by that answer!  So they know that dish sucks but still continue to serve it?  They also didn't do anything to try to make it right, which I think most restaurant owners would find astonishing. Bottom line: Flavorless food and poor service!
Something tasted sour. I ordered Albacore Tataki-ice cold, bland flavor. Scallop/shrimp/spicy jalapeno roll-yummy Spicy California Roll- ok, too much sauce Side Salad-lettuce leaves were wilted and soggy! I won't come back here. I miss the traditional "Irashaimase!" and the "Arigatogozaimasu!" I didn't get a single hello or good bye or thank you! I had Safeway sushi today and it fulfilled my craving!!!! :(
My gf and I went here with a friend one night looking for a sushi place close to our new apartment.  We've been back a dozen times or so since then and have never had a bad experience.  The food is always delicious, sushi and prepared dishes both (haven't had their hot pots yet, but gf enjoyed it). We've sat at all three options (sushi bar, table, tatami) and got the same service in each location.  The sushi chef's like to have fun so I recommend the bar if you're not in a big group. The one negative thing I could say is the place isn't huge.  At full capacity (which they usually are) you'll be eating in pretty close quarters unless you're at one of the three tatami tables.  This also means that the waiting list can start pretty early in the night. All in all though, a wonderful place that I will continue to visit frequently.
My work (as a Corporate Chef)  allows me to travel all over the country and eat at some very good restaurants.  In regards to sushi I have had a chance to experience "the best of the best"  Well tell you what ... even if Yuki Sushi WASN'T very well priced (Which it is!) the QUALITY of the sashimi and the nigiri is TOP NOTCH.  Try the fresh Sake (Salmon) - They could run a succesful business selling JUST this.  When I moved away to Newport Beach it was a serious hurdle to know I would no longer have it at my beck and call.  I am mainly a Sashimi/Nigiri guy but their rolls are outstanding as well.  My favorite is the Toshi Roll.  If you are lucky enough to get the "3 mighty warriors" (Kio, Toshi, and Tama) working the sushi bar they MIGHT even do a roll off the menu for you- but you got to be respectful.  Don't act like a douchebag and try and order a special roll at 9:30 on a Saturday night.  If you are not into sushi, they have some fantastic entrees as well.  My personal favorites are the chilled Green Tea Soba Noodles (Ten Zaru Soba)  and the Curry Plate.  You really can't go wrong.  Another thing to try is the Hamachi Kama Yaki (Grilled Yellowtail Collar) -  THis is a chef's secret as it was normally a cut that the chefs took home becuase it was a "primary cut" Well I tell you what, you will not find a more flavorful and tender cut of fish out there .... and for less than $10!!!  So in case you are wondering ... yes.... GO!
i love dinky little places that are hole in the walls... and i love the feel of small tavern like japanese restaurants. came here on a weeknight for dinner.  the places was crowded for a week night.  ordered some sushi and their beef tataki... i love it.. its rare... no searing or anything... just comes on a plate with three beef roses... ahh... my favorite kind of flower. the sushi ordered were decent... i've definitely had fresher sushi.  dont get me wrong here... i'm not saying it's not fresh... it's good... but SF is better that's all...
My daughter's (6) favorite: kid's bento box. We have t o go every week.  She puts on her Yuki Sushi t-shirt with the cat and never reads the menu.  By now they know and she gets special tatment. Kids bento box is not like in other places "funny" in the shape of a car but the way you expect it. (kids are not stupid - were you stupid when you were younger?). Recently friends with kids joined and one bento box for $8 fed 2 kids.  Spend more money on Torro and eat the leftovers from the kids as well.
As one of my family's favorite Japanese restaurants, we love going to Yuki Sushi. There's a good selection of food, and the owner, Doug, has always been really welcoming and kind to us.  He even remember when my brother and I were little kids. The last time I came here with the fam, we found seating pretty quickly thanks to a new dining space in the back (though the room was a little loud). I decided on the Combination Beef Teriyaki and Tempura plate. Something that separates Yuki Sushi from other restaurants is their zarusoba appetizer that always comes before the meal. It's delicious, and no other restaurant does that. The combination portions were quite large, and this may be one of the first times where I didn't eat everything. The tempura was good and crispy, and the beef teriyaki was tender, with good sauce.  To top it off, I got some Sapporo on draft, which was poured excellently (no foam at the top). It was a great Japanese dinner with full American portions.
quick update, and will flesh out later when i have time.  But restaurant went way downhill this last time we went. Chirashi cuts were awful shapes and warm.  The salmon was smoked salmon, WTF? Hubby got katsu curry, and the katsu was barely any meat, and the beef in the curry was stringy and tough. Sorry Yuki, but what happened?
The chirashi was wonderful...the pieces are cut thick and fresh, and the variety is decent.  I like... Read more 
There are sushi restaurants, and then there are the "roll" restaurants which specializes in making giant rolls of rice with sweet sauce poured on top.  Obviously Yuki is in the latter group. Other than the regular rolls, I tried hamachi and saba sushi, they weren't very good.  They also gave me the worst beef  tataki I ever had.  Finally, Agedashi Tofu is the only good dish. Basically, this is not even a good "roll" restaurant.  It may have a loyal following, but they seem to have an all caucasian clientele.  Best to skip this one.
Great authentic sushi and large portions at a fair price  Bathroom was small and a bit dirty. Besides the awkward restroom it was absolutely fabulous.  So many tables packed tightly together it felt a little cramped on a busy Friday night. Great authentic sushi and large portions at a fair price  Bathroom was small and a bit dirty. Besides the awkward restroom it was absolutely fabulous.   many tables packed tightly together it felt a little cramped on a busy Friday night.
This little neighborhood restaurant could be seen as the answer to a question. And that question might be: "Where in the name of Jove do you take your parents when your mom wants Japanese food like she grew up with and your dad wants tonkatsu and neither of them will eat the raw fish and neither of them is keen on eating "bar food" at an izakaya?" Not that I would know anything about that. But truthfully, it is amazingly hard to find a solid, traditional Japanese comfort food place.  Most Japanese restaurants, even the good ones, are into their sushi or their bar food and don't *care* about making good donburi, or the perfect nabemono. Yuki Sushi came through for us - mom got an awesome nabeyaki udon, dad got his tonkatsu and beer, and we got to gross them both out by eating uni and ikura and all sorts of icky raw stuff which was no worse than you'd get just about anywhere else, and in fact pretty darn good.  All for a very reasonable price. No wonder the place seems to be packed every time we go there - the parking lot is full and it's the only place open in the entire strip mall at night.  It's not a high end place, it's a little family restaurant that's been there long enough to build up a loyal following.  It does what it's supposed to do in a way that's actually quite hard to beat.
The other day, I did a pickup at Yuki, and they made a mistake with the order. SO I drove back to pick up the remaining food. They gave me a 25 dollar gift certificate... I mean, WOW!!! that is way above and beyond customer service. Just a sorry would have won me over :) Thanks for the great food and kind service.
Ever since we started coming here. We have never gone to another sushi place. Friendly staff, nice... Read more 
Yuki Sushi, I love you! I've tried all the 4 star places in South Bay. And by far my favorite are Yuki Sushi and Sushi Maru. I'm a nigiri/sashimi girl, so the places I love are excellent at those two things. Yuki has the best escolar and yellowtail belly, I've had hands down in the Bay...possibly anywhere. Both of these melt in your mouth like the way the best sushi is suppose to. I also love their saba shiyoyaki...which was the most moist and largest for the price. I'm not a fan of their rolls, but to be honest, I don't like most rolls in the South Bay. And the service here is impeccable and very friendly. We got some salmon belly nigiri that wasn't cut well tonight (although they tasted delicious) and our waitress saw it and brought us another order on the house to apologize for the bad cut. Now that's wonderful service! This and Sushi Maru are my go-to places for delicious nigiri in the South Bay!
I wanted to try all the sushi places by my house.  This one had good reviews but SO overrated!  This is what I ordered: 1.  Crunch roll - There are only 6 pieces and I only ate half.  Tasted very meh... 2.  Agadashi tofu - super hot and fresh but need just a tad of flavor 3.  Salmon skin handroll - this was ok This place is cheaper than other sushi places, the service is quick but not necessarily good.  And they lost major points on serving only smoked salmon and not real fresh salmon. I would not come back here nor would I recommend it to anyone.
I had such a fun night here!  For a smaller sushi place they were very accommodating for our party of 10 and a baby.  My gfs and I were HUNGRY for sushi but the sushi menu here is so BRIEF!  Geeze, I was surprised at how cute the menu was.  Roll prices were actually pretty reasonable until I realized that they were for half rolls, as in only 4-5 pieces!  I KNOW sushi, I've served and managed sushi and Japanese restaurants and I know that places serve sushi by the pieces and half rolls, not including nigiri, but still!  If we want sushi we obviously want whole rolls!  We are die hard! We rolled up onto this place as opposed to the usual because a friend of ours who invited her friend insisted we come here.  Overall service was attentive, we were brought all our beers and sake first and my iced tea was forgotten, twice. I SO WANTED SUSHI that night, but nothing looked omg to me.  And so, I settled with their hamachi kama as my entree with a side of rice, miso soup, and salad.  The hamachi kama came out last, and in four tiny pieces!  This is the first time I ordered this anywhere and it was so tiny, a true appetizer size.  Thankfully, however, it was tasty and succulent. Great company = a great time.  I will definitely try a new place before coming back here.  And the bathroom is a shared stall, in the kitchen.  If you're drunk and have to pee, you just have to wait. :)
A friend and I met up here for dinner.  He highly suggested this place but I've only been to the Willow Glen location and wasn't so happy (I got sick from it actually).  BUT this location was good.  I didn't get sick and food and such were great.  It is on a little pricey side I think but there's good quality stuff. I'm a big fan of beef tataki when they have it at restaurants.  Theirs like the other location was presented as a rose. Very cute but the meet was thickly cut and more rare than I'm used to.  As for the rolls we had all of them were pretty good.  Good quality fish but nothing "crazy" fancy as other places get.  I'd come here again but it's not a place I'd rave about
I have a mixed review about this place. The first time I went here, I really liked their grilled fish (I forgot what I ate, but, I think it was Saba). That was pretty delish :) The second time though, was not really good. My friend ordered their CHIRASHI (assorted sashimi on top of sushi rice) and it was not at all fresh. The egg rolls were a bit greenish in color (ewh), and I'm assuming for the salmons they used smoked salmons instead of fresh ones because they were just not fresh at all ! Will I come back here again? hmh, very unlikely.
If I had three wishes one of them would be a lifetime supply of nigiri from Yuki Sushi. Yuki is a no-nonsense Japanese restaurant, you aren't going to find fancy rolls or sauces, only fresh sushi where the fish is the star. The soba noodle appetizer is the perfect way to start any meal. They have some of the best udon in the South Bay, my favorite is definitely the beef udon, it's perfect for when you're fighting a cold. My favorite thing about coming here is the nigiri and sashimi, order the nigiri combo ($14.95) and you will feel like Christmas came early.
After Fuki Sushi is Yuki Sushi.  I must of been a good girl to have so many different sushi restaurants in one given week.  I heard so many good things as well as not so good about this sushi place.  But I had to try it out for myself to make any sort of judgments at this establishment. Went out with a friend for dinner and I suggested Yuki Sushi.  I was told to get reservation.  Given that it was on a wimp and on Tuesday, I took my chance.  When we got there, I was surprised at how old this plaza looked compared to other around the block.  I felt like we were back in "Bonanza" time.  And yes, we were seated quickly without the wait.  That was a plus. Given that it was late, we each ordered separate dinner plates.  We both got the Chirashi dinner.  The dinner came with a cold-like Japanese noodle and miso soup.  Did not care for the noodle but the soup was not too bad.  The service was good.  They were very attentive and made my first time here--memorable.  I was pleased. I thought the place was a little bit old and needed  some TLC.  Service was exquisite.  Prices were very reasonable but the sushi wasn't all that.  For the price we pay, I would come back and recommend to others.  You do pay for what you get.  Overall, Sushi was bad at all.
My #1 sushi place ever!! My friends took me here 4 years ago for my birthday and ever since, they still remember my name when I walk in :-) The sashimi is always fresh, always consistent & always hits the spot! There is always a line but the wait is well worth it each time.  The sushi chefs behind the bar are very serious, but would never say 'no' to a quick sake shot - all night long! A loyal customer I am :-)
Delicious sushi is always a good call, Yuki is delicious sushi, Therefore Yuki is always a good call. QED Using logic, my taste buds, and my heart I know that Yuki makes some of the best sushi in the area. The fish is always super fresh and the ingredients they put in the rolls are perfection. I have tried all sorts of rolls here but my favorites are probably the spider (soft shell crab) and the Jackie (spicy scallop). The nigiri is always great if you want a fresh lighter option. The udon here is also delicious. My favorite is the tempura udon. The noodles and the tempura are always perfectly cooked and delicious. On a cold day nothing beats udon. The place is huge but always packed! You will most likely have to wait to be seated and put your name on a list. The waiting area is tiny and can fit about three close friends (three strangers would feel uncomfortably close). You can wait outside, and most do, but if its cold it could be rough times. The service is pretty good. They are not always super attentive, but then again the place is big and stuffed to the brim with people so you can't really blame them. This is a place you must try out!
The fish is very fresh here. My bf and I came here last Friday for dinner and I was very impressed with the oysters, spicy tuna roll and sweet shrimp nigiri. But everything else was too Americanized for me and not authentic Japanese enough. The way I measure authenticity is if an establishment gives me the choice to have my sweet shrimp head deep fried or made into a miso soup. We ordered a couple of other rolls, including the Dragon Roll, but they were poorly put together as they kept falling apart on our plate. I do like how they give you a bowl of soba noodles to start your meal off, instead of the usual edamame. It's a great dish to eat during hot weather. Yuki is no Shimura in my book but it'll do when I am craving for some fresh nigiri.
I've been going here, off and on, for years. Sushi is ALWAYS good. Glad to see they still have the same chefs -we're getting old together ;-D So we had the soup appetizer. Very light and tasty broth with clams and shrimp. It was enough to share. Sapporo draft. Can't go wrong. Then we had tekka maki, crunch roll (it had a jalapeno sauce on it that was REALLY good), spider roll (again, can't go wrong). We stopped after that, it was more than enough. We had a coupon from Entertainment Book. Total came to $30, dinner for two with two beers Yay very happy & as always, will be back.
I'm an amateur though, with sushi. I'm going to steal someone else's review and say that I really enjoyed the soba noodles the gave to us in the beginning also! It was good. My friend and I went this past tuesday since she's been craving sushi for a long time. She ordered a few nigiri (i'm not quite sure if that's what it was called) and enjoyed most of them. I got two rolls (spider and the other one had unagi &cucumber) which were both pretty good. the spider roll had soft shell crab and imitation crab and something else, but it was a bit too much crab for me. i didn't realize it at the time. the service was nice. the food was pretty good, though a little salty the inside was small but the interior looked pretty nice and home-y. overall, it was pretty good. will probably return again for rolls. OH. and coming from my friend, a daughter of a former sushi maker, she enjoyed it.
Have been here twice, for lunch and dinner. I enjoy Nigiri and Sashimi, so there's nothing that covers the taste and quality of fish consumed. Yuki serves fresh, thick slices of fish. The Sashimi I had for dinner was absolutely outstanding. A tasty variety over shredded radish, plenty of fish for the price. Did I say fresh and thick? Definitely coming back next time I'm nearby!
Had a fun birthday dinner with the hubby here last Saturday. We don't get out much! Nice not to have to wait too long on a Saturday night for a table. As always the hostess and servers are super here. Felt right at home. Started off with plum wine and then hot sake. Got our entrees, halibut teriyaki, and shrimp/veg tempura before we got our sushi but that's ok. Good, fresh sushi is worth waiting for (dragon roll, some kind of unagi roll - forgot the name). As always, the food was consistently good. The tempura perfectly crunchy, tasty-- the rolls delicious morsels of YUM. Lastly, to my surprise I got a cupcake from Aki's (can you say guava!) Oh Yuki, how I love you!
Hands down the best sushi spot in town. Not just the sushi but the teriyaki chicken, tempura, katsu,... Read more 
weekday wait for dinner...twenty to thirty minutes experiencing...taking pseudo-tatami seating...cut-out floors for shoe-off regular seating...hot sake to start...browsing large menu options...sushi, soba, rolls, sukiyaki, sashimi, etc...selecting sushi dinner, a maki-roll, uni and seared tuna in ponzu...big balls of rice draped by a slab of overflowing sashimi...big sushi...thicker rolls...good rice, but tightly packed...quite filling...average uni, but hefty...enormous seared tuna in ponzu a mouthful...all average at lower pricing...big sushi and big portions....small bottle of hukusuru junami ginjo only $ten...bargain prices....
stopped by for dinner today. Didn't expect much since decent sushi taste the same, but it turned out to be really good! i never though that this little hidden sushi restaurant is actually comparable to Sendai, which is the only sushi place i go to. Spicy tuna roll was GOOODD and saba shio-yaki( grilled mackerel) is a must try! One interesting thing about this place is that  waitresses are all thais, which is kinda rare for a sushi place. Overall, this place is awesome, will definitely come back again. :)
Space is small. Staff was rude. And rolls were super basic. Not a fan!!
Don't love it, don't hate it. I don't see what the rave is all about this place. It's not like they had a million rolls to choose from and their size on sashimi is not huge compared to other sushi places. They actually have less rolls compared to other places and the variety isn't that great. I had a few of their rolls that have unagi in it, and it tastes ok. I guess the neat thing is that they have the tatami seating area, although there's only like 6 of those seats by the door. When I came here with my friends, there was a long line! Seriously?! The only cool thing is its by the mall, so you can shop and come here for dinner. Other than that, I don't see what's so special about this place. May be it's their entrees?
Smoked salmon (lox) is for bagels, not for traditional sushi. Are they using it because it keeps longer and is cheaper?  Sake is one of my favorite fish types for sushi and I was so disappointed. The rest of the fish was hit or miss as to freshness.  Ohitashi isn't just a pile of spinach with bonito flakes, you have to at least put some soy sauce on there if not dashi (and sesame seeds can be nice too) Maybe if this place served more Americanized sushi I'd be able to forgive easier, but their menu was more traditional than most (not many crazy rolls). It's a shame, because the agadashi tofu was decent, the service was excellent, and the rice was okay. If I'd been paying, I would've tipped well the first time I went there (because the service is great) but probably not go back (because the food was meh)...I just can't forgive the lox.
great spot for cheap and quick eats!  doesnt seem like a sushi/sashimi spot...but the food that they serve there is great. very fresh and the quality is great. if youre just walking in, make sure you either go early or late, as the wait time to get in can be a bit ridiculous (make sure u call to make reservations if u can) as somewhat of a regular there i have my go-to list of foods that you cant go wrong with. -spicy hamachi handroll.  no frills. not glamorous.  just really tasty hamachi "tartare" mixed with spicy jalapeno sauce and rice....wrapped in seaweed. excellent handroll. -beef tataki.  thick cut slightly seared pieces of beef that you dip in ponzu sauce. -albacore tataki.  seared white tuna with massive piles of fresh onions and ponzu sauce. -ten zaru soba.  im not usually a big fan of noodles, but i make an exception for this dish.  its not your usual run of the mill soba.  these soba noodles are definitely special.  very chewy...made with green tea powder...and super fresh...i thought they were made in-house, but the waiter told me that they get it fresh from another local noodle shop.  this is hands down the best soba ive ever had in my life.  everyone that ive taken to have this soba have all agreed that its the BEST SOBA EVER.  on those hot sout bay summer nights, ill have this at least 3 times a week for dinner.  hands down. best. soba. ever. price. very reasonable...borderline cheap. service. meh, but not horrible. reservations. definitely recommended! walk-in's welcomed but make sure your iPhone is fully charged to pass the time...
Cheer-Rah-Shi!!! When I get that sushi craving, the first place I think of is Yuki Sushi. We've become regulars here. They know that when I arrive, I'm looking for that bowl of chirashi. On occasions, I will order something else on the menu (which brings a few raised eyebrows) - but I always seem to come back to my old standard. I've haven't yet been disappointed - service is always attentive and friendly. Big plus - I can also get my guava cake yearnings quelled here too as they now offer guava cupcakes from Aki's Bakery!
***300th Review*** My favorite is Japanese food and throughout the years, Yuki Sushi has rarely... Read more 
I love coming here for the location (liquor store stocks premium dutch beer ;) around the corner. They are only about 3 blocks from Santana Row and Valley Fair so it is my little escape from shopping all day. The Hamachi, Uni, Hotate-scallop are always fresh here. Just be careful to come a little early or late so you don't catch the dinner or lunch crowd and end up waiting outside in lawn chairs.
Not the best I've ever had, but also not bad.  When I arrived we put our names down on the waiting list of about 4 others before us.  Luckily, they expanded their seating by buying the store next over.  This cut down on our wait time immensely.  When we got it, its super small, so dont' expect a lot of space around your seat.  We ordered Agedashi Tofu and California Rolls for our appetizers expecting them to come out before our actual meal.  We were given miso soup and salad quickly, but waited for a while after. Our Agedashi tofu finally came out, but with our main dish.  I ordered Steak Teriyaki and my Dad ordered Tonkatsu Curry.  After eating a while, our California rolls finally came out.  This is probably one of the worst made rolls I've had in my life.  It still tasted good, but the visual stimulation was lacking.  The Steak Teriyaki was perfect and everything was good. The reason I only gave three stars is because of the service and sushi.  They have a sushi bar, come on now.  I expect it to be better than what I could make.  I seriously could have made it look nicer and probably taste better.  Being Japanese also, we ordered two orders of California rolls and they gave us a tiny portion of Wasabi.  Disappointing!  I would still recommend this place because I have had better experiences before.  Still no 5 star, but I would not order sushi next time.
Good food, but big minus on the sanitary front.  The bathroom practically sits in the middle of the kitchen... This means you and everyone else pee within 5 feet of where they wash and prep your food.  There's nothing separating the line of sight between the toilet and tiny crowded kitchen. I liked the sushi, especially the udon and would love to return, but that's just gross.
The sushi here is really fresh and tasty. It tends to get crowded so come early.
Freshest fish I've been able to find in this area.  When I'm in LA, I craave Yuki's thick slabs of fresh sashimi and the top-notch grilled saba. It is a little cramped inside even with the seating area in the back, Mike F. describes it well as "cozy". Great for: family dinners, intimate date dinners, casual dinners amongst friends....
I've been to several different sushi places and I liked the reviews that I saw. I like the sushi, I had a crunch roll and it was amazing. Sashami Moriawase was the main dish that I had and the salted Mackerel was probably the best part of it. My sister had udon, which she said went a little too soggy too quickly but the tempura was quite good. They gave us cold Soba at the beginning and it was actually pretty good! We had a wonderful time, it was very enjoyable but the presentation of the rolls were not that great as some of the places that I've been to but overall it was pretty great! Overall: Enjoyable and very obviously busy, so they keep consistently serving great food. Service: The waitress was pretty nice and food came quickly and timely. Portions: These were amazing, I was very full afterward, which is a lot to say for a sushi place.
Yuki Sushi is gem tucked away in an old 70's building. I would have never heard of Yuki if it weren't for yelp. So YAY! The store looks really small but don't let that fool you, there's an extra room in the back. You also have the choice of either sitting barefoot at the Japanese style tables or the normal tables with chairs. Service is a bit slow but who can blame them, it's a busy restaurant. The sushi here is amazing! Although the prices are a bit high, the quality of the sushi is worth every penny. The best one I've tried here would have to be the Crunch Roll (Spicy). The Crunch Roll comes with crab, avocado, cucumber, tempura crumbs all topped off with jalapeno sauce. The sauce is delicious by the way! I've also tried the: *California Roll- Average and a little small. *Jackie Roll- Scallops and shrimps topped with jalapeno sauce. Sushi Special- For around 12 dollars, you get 6 California rolls, 6 Tekka Maki rolls, and three pieces of the chef's choice Nigiri. (Great Deal) So far, all the sushi i've tried here is perfect in quality and taste. I highly recommend this place.
Small sushi place run by Thai people? Interesting... Yelped this place and saw the great reviews and had to try it out. The rolls are very fresh and on the small side but you can see it reflected on the prices.  The sushi rolls here are not the sloppy type that have tons and tons of stuff in them- its pretty basic but you really get to taste the fish that way. I like how they started you out with a teeny bowl of soba noodles.  I don't usually see that at all. I enjoyed the tofu, fish, sushi- love to come back but since we ordered so much food I'm sure we ate about half the menu!
I've been on a sashimi run lately so I've been trying it at different places.  This place is tiny, so arrive early! I do love that this place is ran by authentic Japanese chefs, which is always a good sign. I ordered the sashimi lunch (assorted fish) and it came with yellow tail, tuna, optopus and salmon - two/three pieces each.  I was a bit disappointed that the pieces were on the tiny side.  Good thing it came with soup, salad and rice or I would have still been hungry after I finished.  The sashimi lunch runs about $14 here.
This place is very small. You have to write your name down on their clipboard if they're busy and they will call your name as soon as a table opens up. The sushi tastes great and fresh. The soft shell crab is also good. I got the beef teryaki with chicken katsu combo, it was all good. Wifey got the beef teryaki and tempura combo and she said it was good. My sister got the Halibut and it was huge! Great place for Japanese food!
Great dinner tonight. We arrives at 6:30 and grabbed the last table We got one veggie roll, the yakitori chicken (both great) and the sukiyaki with chicken to share. with one beer it was $30 bucks. We were not very hungry so it was perfect. Prices are reasonable and service is great. Will come back for lunch or their happy hour in Willow Glen
No fancy sauces, just to the point, good fresh raw fish and rolls. After hours of shopping at Valley Fair, with a several giddy new purchases, my friend and I decided to get some good quality sushi. Yuki Sushi was our winning choice since it's right behind Valley Fair, and it's prices aren't outrageous for good quality. My favorite thing we got was the Toshi roll. This 4 piece roll is filled with chunky raw hamachi and smoked salmon. 2 things I love separately, and did not know would go so well together! Our mixed sashimi platter was good too. Well cut, thick slices of hamachi, mackerel, tuna, aji, and tako. We were definitely having a raw fish craving that day, and Yuki satisfied that. I saw everyone else order a lot of bento boxes, yakitori, and bowls of hot food. Next time, I might consider this, but I still like to judge my sushi restaurants on the quality of their sashimi and rolls. And Yuki, you definitely made the cut into my list of South Bay's favorite sushi joints! Yum.
I'm a sucker for uni (sea urchin) but its hard to find a decent sushi place that serves fresh and reasonably priced uni. This place satisified my uni craving! I like nigiris more than fancy sushi rolls so I ordered uni, salmon, squid, and toshi roll (doesn't have extra sauce, contains various chopped sashimi). The nigiris and toshi roll were both fresh and delicious. We also had the agedashi tofu as appetizer (ginger soy sauce was so good) and chicken teriyaki. The chicken was tender and the sauce was great, but the portion isn't very big- satisfying nevertheless. The tofu was crispy on the outside and soft on the inside. Service is attentive, place is smaller and always crowded. Keep in mind that there's usually a wait. I would definitely come back for the affordable and yummy food!
Yet another hole in the wall restaurant with barely a foot of space right when you walk in to wait to be seated. According to the SBBF and tons of other Yelpers...this sushi place is the SPOT, so it's always packed. And I would NOT wanna be waiting outside in this Bay Area bone-chillin weather we're having. We got there in the knick of time...to wait for about 15 to get seated on the awesome tatami seating. Service here is very quick, even with just 2 or 3 waitresses walking around to each table, bar area and tatami. The soba noodles they brought out while we waited for the food we ordered were BOMB diggity baby. I had the sashimi with some gyoza for din din and it was delish! On top of that the bf ordered tons of fresh sushi and rolls with his dinner as well. So bomb I tell ya. Ended my lovely night here with some green tea mochi ice cream which was also divine. I honestly enjoyed my time here much more than the newer location in WG.
Truly excellent restaurant, not much to add to the 600+ reviews except that I love this place most for their sashimi and their Japanese cooked foods. Tempura - top notch, lightly battered, crispy, not greasy Sashimi - favorites are the tuna and the halibut, we usually get 10 pieces of each, although the 15 piece appetizer is excellent as well Chicken Karaage - I love chicken nuggets more than just about any other food, and I love Yuki's chicken nuggets the best of all! Honestly, there isn't a bad or overpriced item on the entire menu, and I've always been impressed with the freshness of the fish. My only caveat - the rolls were a bit heavy on the rice, although the rice itself was very well seasoned.
I love hearing the Japanese language behind sushi bars.  But more than that, I like seeing a bunch of people waiting for tables while I put my name down and get seated right away.  (I think they either forgot to write their name or didn't want the bar, but either way they looked stunned.) Be forewarned that the fish isn't probably the freshest but the thick cuts and thin prices will subdue your craving any day. One thing I wouldn't get again is the chicken karaage.  Pieces were abnormally shaped and also dry and flavorless.  I even sprinkled seasoning on it and dipped it in soy sauce which only distorted the intended taste furthermore. You can tell that even though this place isn't the finest of fine Japanese restaurants, it's a regulars' haven.  I spent the last 15 minutes staring at this party of one sitting at the end of the sushi bar downing an order of curry, multiple sashimi platters (including a plate with 10 slices of salmon), soup, and salad, all the while chatting it up with the chefs.  Thanks to eavesdropping, I found out this was one of his first stops after being away from home for a couple weeks. If you don't like the normal tempura ice cream dessert, you should get this one.  The outer layer is less like a crispy tempura layer as it is more like a pound cake!  It's a big order and they drizzle lots of chocolate syrup with mounds of whipped cream on the side.  Definitely an American influenced concoction. Even on a Sunday night, it was busy up until we left at around 9pm.  It doesn't help that there were only two waitresses servicing the entire place but the food came out timely.  Overall, the two strengths of this place are definitely price and value.  Think chicken karaage + 2 miso soups + 4 nigiri orders (one being uni) + 1 Rainbow roll + tempura ice cream = $48.
One of my favorite pastimes is spending a day at the beach, but when I see the copious amount of flies swarming around a clump of seaweed that has washed ashore, the last thing on my mind is dinner. Or lunch. Or breakfast, second breakfast, elevenses, brunch, afternoon tea, or any other meal for that matter. So, you can imagine my delight when a close family friend wanted to catch up over lunch at Yuki Sushi. Well, I rationalized, there's always the all-too-familiar teriyaki cop-out... ...Fast forward to today. After deciding to order something that definitely wasn't sushi, I was closing my menu when the following words jumped out at me: jalapeno sauce. My interest was officially piqued. All it took was one more surprised look at the Crunch Roll, which consisted of crab, avocado, cucumber, tempura crumbs, and jalapeno sauce, before I decided I had to give it a try. Judge's ruling: De-freaking-licious! My name is Rachel L. and I have found the first-ever sushi roll that I know I will CRAVE in the somewhat immediate future. However, I have to dock this place one star because A) You feel a bit like you're walking into a sardine can when you enter the tiny dining area, and B) Our waitress never checked in on us, and when I decided mid-meal that I wanted to order some gyoza, it took forever to flag her down.
I have to admit that after seeing all of these glowing reviews that I was expecting more... I had the deluxe bento here for lunch recently.  The tempura was okay, but overbreaded and a tad too greasy.  The California roll and the sashimi cuts were very small.  Too small.  Some area sushi joints serve maguro and hamachi cuts that are nearly twice the size.  The miso and salad were very good, but those are throw-ins... My waitress was grumpy at first, but warmed up as she went along.  I just feel that after spending $21 for the bento and a Sapporo that I got screwed.  People swear by this place, but it just wasn't happening for me...
Ok, I was definitely a regular here in college, but I haven't been by in years! I'm still trying to figure out why... AAAAAAnyways, took my fiance there for his first visit. He got the Sashimi Moriwase (15 pieces of sashimi, salad, miso soup, and a bowl of rice!) and I got a combo dinner (includes salad, miso soup, and rice) with tempura and saba. I thought I would get a little teishoku box or something, but NO! I got two giant pieces of saba, and my tempura included three giant shrimps, and a variety of veggies! We split a large bottle of Orion, and green tea ice cream to save on $$, but the bill still came up to about $25 per person including tip. Docked a star for the high prices, but definitely love the food!
Sat on the tatami mat, the one where you have to take off your shoes and sit cross-legged or however you choose. There's a table and I think it's designed to be more casual like. I decided to go here because of the high reviews on Yelp, which I researched about last night, since I was craving for udon. I bought nabeyaki udon, a dinner salad, tuna roll a la carte, and of course, my favorite, the tobiko! TOBIKO: Wow! It was tasty here, unlike the one I had yesterday at Harumi Sushi. It was not salty or anything and it definitely had that taste I was craving for! I guess, it really is not the same everywhere! Unfortunately, the first tobiko roll I had was quite cold. I'd rather have it at a cool to room temperature kind of feeling. But other than that, I loved it nonetheless! SALAD: The dressing was kind of liquidy, which might be normal in some cases, but I still cannot forget how good the salad was at Bluefin. Over here at Yuki Sushi, about a quarter or so of the salad dressing sank to the bottom of the bowl. The salad itself was par and is of average taste, nothing to brag about. NABEYAKI UDON: It was ok, a lot of ingredients, but nothing all that special. It included tempura, but it was more like on the top of the noodle soup and not on the side. I kinda was hoping that it was separate, but I guess not. I probably wouldn't know what would be a wiser choice anyway. Oh my goodness though! Now, I feel thirsty. Did it contain too much MSG or salt or whatever? Earlier today, I did not feel that thirsty, but now, it feels like I'm dehydrated or something after eating this. I have no idea! Maybe I am quite sensitive to MSG. Idk? In conclusion, I thought the tuna roll was ok. Nothing that special either! But on the other hand, I loved the tobiko! And here's another surprise! I only spent $22 again on all these items and a can of coke! Not bad for the price and I definitely enjoyed this visit here more for the taste than yesterday's visit at Harumi Sushi. And to top it off, they do box your food for you, but unfortunately, they did not include the usual wasabi and ginger in my take home box.
To start with, I am not a sushi purist so take this with a grain of salt. I gravitate toward sushi that is crunchy, creamy, spicy and gaudy. The service was pretty good, but the interior could use a makeover (2 years in Japan, the restaurants were immaculate even though dated) I had a two shrimp tempora type roll and a spider roll which were both ok, while my wife had tuna and salmon sashimi which I must say was good in regard to texture, flavor and serving size. Most of my sushi experience took place in the various sushi (not all Japanese operated) restaurants in San Mateo with my favorite being Izakaya Mai. One thing that was odd was a view of food being prepared from the mens room.
I've been coming here for years and never thought to yelp it. This place gets really packed really quick. It's small and located in this old looking strip mall. Two things that I love at this restaurant, besides the amazing service. 1. Their spicy tuna. AMAZING. The spicy tuna mix is a perfect blend. Even though it comes in only 4 pieces, it's sooo worth it. I have yet to taste a better spicy tuna! 2. Ten Zaru Soba: LOVE LOVE LOVE. Best mix of tempura. Soba sauce and tempura sauce is perfect. Everything about this dish is wonderful. To some, the soba noodles can be a little bland, but I like them Their sushi is nice and fresh. Not a place where you go to get huge rolls with a much of sauce. Yuki sushi is more of an authentic Japanese restaurant which can be refreshing from all the other Japanese restaurants on El Camino.
Great place with super fresh sashimi. The restaurant is a little small, so it got pretty stuffy by the end. Even though I enjoyed my food a lot, I don't think I would have enjoyed the rolls that they had.  I sat at the sushi counter, so I was watching them make everything.  The rolls were definitely not nicely presented, and I saw them squirt on too much mayo over the rolls for my taste. Onto my food.. YUDOFU ($5) - Fresh tofu served in a light lettuce and mushroom broth with a garlic soy sauce in the center. This was a wonderful surprise.  I was expecting a plate with tofu, and instead was served a giant bowl of soup, with plenty to share between 3-4 people. It's a really light broth filled to the brim with lettuce, and perfect for me since I love veggies. SASHIMI APPETIZER ($12) - This was a great deal.  Their nigiri is about $4 for two pieces, while this was $12 for 10 pieces of sashimi, and you can split the sashimi order into two types of fish.  I had five really thick slices of fresh salmon and hamachi. SPICY TUNA ($4) - Delicious! I was surprised when I first got it though because it looks different from most spicy tuna rolls, but it was a good type of different.  Instead of mashed tuna mixed with mayo and siracha, this was chopped up tuna mixed with jalapeno mayo.  I really enjoyed eating the little pieces of chopped tuna. DINNER COMBINATION ($17) - Ordered this with saba shioyaki and sashimi combination. The sashimi included 3 tuna, 2 red snapper, 2 hamachi, and 2 octopus.  I don't like octopus, but the others were all pretty good. I did notice though that the hamachi in the sashimi combo was smaller and not cut as well as the one from the sashimi appetizer.  The saba was deliciously juicy and cooked perfectly.
Erm...no. Between my co-diner and myself we ordered 3 different nigiri (2 pieces each), the spider roll, and the New York roll (4 pieces each).  I would agree with another yelper, and advise avoiding the rolls.  The seaweed was tough and chewy, making it impossible to bite in half.  I don't really like to stuff a whole piece of sushi roll in my little mouth, but it had to be done.  Not worth it though.  I couldn't much enjoy the flavors as I was too busy breaking down the seaweed... but it was pretty boring anyway. I was thinking of giving this place 3 stars based on the fact that the slices of fish on the nigiri were honestly the biggest I've ever seen. But later in the evening neither of us were feeling very well, which makes me wonder about the reviews that rave about how "fresh" their fish is.  Back to 2. All in all, nothing was gross or unpleasant so I'm not going to give 1 star.  But nothing whatsoever made me want to give it another try.
Came in today and they were busy. Service was just ok. Food quality has gone down hill. Some sashimi that we ordered were falling apart. This place used to have high quality of food.
Yuki Sushi is hidden at an old plaza. Parking is sometime hard to find. Its Salmon Misozuke reminds... Read more 
Yay for Yuki!! I have pretty much grown up with this place, and I can't think of a time I've come here and HAVEN'T been satisfied. Food: This is back to the basics, no fancy shmancy rolls, and I think that is one of my favorite things about this place.  Anything and everything on the menu is great.  Some of my favorites: - Spicy tuna roll (they use a white spicy sauce) - Udon - Donburi - Curry - Beef teriyaki - Agedashi - Tempura The fish here is always fresh.  The sashimi dinners are BOMB, and the soba noodles they serve you before your meal are a great start to a great dinner. Ambiance: Ever since I can remember, not much has changed about this place.  It is a small mom and pop/hole in the wall, and I think that is where this restaurant gets its charm.  There are tables, a small booth area, a sushi bar, and tatami seating.  The decor is a little cheesy, but HEY, its Yuki! Price: great price for what you get.  I don't ever remember thinking the price was too much for what we ordered. Service: the servers are always super nice and friendly! And usually, the owner is there during dinner time.  He's a great guy.  Oh yeah, they added a new room recently, and it is in the very back of the restaurant.  If you come, try to request to be in the front, main room. Come here pleaseeeeeeee!!! If you've never been here, you are missing out!
This is our favorite local sushi place! Although it might not be the most authentic Japanese food, the fish is always super fresh, perfectly prepared. The owner is super nice, and we always feel welcome. Definitely start with the miso soup and some of the buckwheat noodles. My favorites are the crunch roll and the rainbow roll and if I am really hungry, I will add the mixed tempura (shrimp and veggies). Sitting barefoot at the low tables is fun, as is sitting at the bar. Definitely one we keep coming back to again and again!
Maybe because I had high expectations given the busyness of the place and the good reviews, but this place did not live up to my expectations. The sushi menu lacks a lot in terms of variety and the portion of the rolls seemed smaller than at other places. The prices are also more expensive than other places I've gone too. The roll I had was decent but nothing to brag about. Also had the chicken wings which was pretty good, but I don't come to sushi places for the chicken wings. Maybe if they had bigger portions and more variety, I would give them a better rating, but I've definitely had better.
This is my regular, go-to sushi place for nights when I want sushi but am not feeling adventurous enough to try a new sushi place.  I always know that I will be happy with the food, service, and prices here. The quality of the fish has improved over the last few months.  I'm usually pretty satisfied with most things on the menu. I only wish this place was bigger!
Upon many recommendations from Yelpers and friends I tried this place but I will say that I did but only for lunch. As any true "Japanese" restaurant you would rate them on the freshness of their sushi. I went straight for the Uni and Hamachi. I was soo disappointed when it was fishy when I ate it. I wasn't surprised that they had Uni from Santa Barbara instead of Japan but for it to be fishy was kind of sad. I did have the Bento box too and that's decent. I'd be willing to give this place another try but I guess I should try during dinner.
Came here for lunch and had the Chicken teri don (Chicken teriyaki & veggie tempura over rice) and I was extremely pleased with my meal. AS soon as we were seated, we were served with soba noodles! Service was quick and nice; as soon as we ordered, the miso soup came out too. The dish itself was delicious - filling but not heavy. The tempura is pretty good here, though a little on the greasy side, but not too batter-y which I don't like at some other places. The chicken was also really nicely cooked so that it was tender and not dry. I enjoyed my meal here. It came out to be around $8-9 with tax and tip. I'd definitely come back here
The YUKI SPECIAL UDON deserves 5 stars. There was such a huge variety of seafood and veggies that could overfeed two people easily. YUM, GET IT. Dinner started with a complimentary serving of Soba noodles. That was a pleasant surprise. Great hospitality and great prices. Their Alaskan roll & crunch roll were also very tasty, but were probably 4 star quality. This place is a new fave for sure. Bringing my mama here next.
Yikes! I think I'm on the verge of getting mercury poisoning. I've had sushi at least 4 times in the past week (be prepared to read back to back sushi reviews). But oh, it was so good. Surprisingly, this was my first visit to the original Yuki Sushi. Since I live down the street from the newer location in Willow Glen, I've just never thought to try this one out. But the two are really different, so you wouldn't think they were one in the same. This location is tucked away in a old little strip mall probably built in the 70s. You can either sit in the main dining room, at the sushi bar or in the small tatami area to the right once you walk in. There may also be a back room, as I noticed a large group go in there. We decided to go shoeless and sit on the tatami. Between the two of us, we shared the seared albacore tataki in ponzu sauce, spicy scallop, hamachi, escolar and sake hand roll. The fish was all very fresh, and the cuts were large. Prices were very reasonable, as our bill came out to $32. The menu is a little different than the one in WG. They don't offer a lot of their special rolls here, so if that's what you're looking for, head to the Lincoln Ave location.
Yelp guided my sushi deprived soul here for dinner... When hungry, I'm one of those people where i either wander around looking for food or I order a bunch of stuff just because my belly says YOU IZZ HUNGRYYY GET SOME NOM NOMS!!! And so, I do :) Well, long story short, I got a bunch of rolls. I didn't finish it all....but if I had a second stomach...I would. The food was awesome. I love sushi, and this definitely made the list. I will def go next time I'm at the mall...it's down the street! Service was steady :)
So disappointed. I actually went off the Yelp reviews when selecting this sushi spot, and I must say, I felt so dissapointed after since I chose it for a birthday dinner! We made reservations ahead of time and got seating for four right away, which is why I gave it an extra star. We ordered: Soft Shell Crab Appetizer - 4 small pieces that didn't taste fresh Hamachi Cheek Appetizer - Also not fresh, we thought this was disappointing until we tried.. 2 Spicy Tuna Rolls - NOT SPICY! Usually spicy tuna is red, it was more like 1/4 spicy tuna and 3/4 of their jalapeno sauce wrapped in rice. Dragon Roll Spider Roll The service was so so. Will definitely have to pass on Yuki Sushi.
New favorite sushi in this are. Bar none. Price was right, sushi is SUPER fresh, and they offer everything from the old standby's to exotics. They started us with buckwheat noodles (cold) in broth, then got cranking with some of the greatest fish I've had in a long time. Plan on competent chefs (seems like they've been there a long time), ultra fresh fish, smart prep., and a wait on weekends. Small, cozy little place, but superb food.
I was told about this place and decided to give this place a try. I came here real hungry and was ready to do some damage tonight.The wait was maybe 10 minutes for a party of two.The place on the outside is nothing to talk about but when you get inside its like any other Sushi Place like in Japan Town in San Jose.What I really liked is the place was busy and all the waitresses were smiling and had a good feeling.We were asked if we wanted the back room and this turned out to have a little more privacy. We ordered the steak teriyaki with shrimp and vegetable tempura, rainbow roll and what I really liked was the crunch roll which was real tasty. I will be coming back here again maybe for lunch again after going to Valley Fair which is really close.The sushi was fresh and the staff were really nice.
I have been to this place several times and have never left disappointed, hungry, or broke! They have a decent variety of dishes and the fish are fresh fresh fresh! Love the hamachi sashimi! At a little over a dollar a piece, it's the cheapest place I've been to! The wait is as crazy as any other sushi place for dinner. It usually ranges from 30 minutes to over an hour and there are no reservations. You must go there and put your name in the clipboard inside near the door. Ordering to-go is a good way to do it too if you are in a rush or can eat at home. What better way to be romantic, right, than to set up a nice table with candles and a bunch of fresh sushi :-) Sashimi is ready in a few minutes and sushi is done in about 10-15 mins tops. Don't be hesitant to do to-go!
Came here at 9pm on a friday night. I had the worst time finding it though, thank you Mr GPS (although your voice is female right now). I wrote my name down on the chart thing, and selected whatever was available first. The waitress quickly came over and asked if we wanted to sit at the bar since it was basically empty, except for two people. So we did, and I saw that there were those small booths!! Awwwh, I will definitely choose to sit in a small booth next time:) We looked over the menu, and the waitress was not pushy at all for us to order. I say this because, well, they closed at 9:30 & I had NO idea. We decided on the agedashi tofu (thank you yelpers), sashimi moraiwase, crunch roll (again, TY yelpers), and a bamboo roll. Once we ordered, they brought us small bowls of soba noodles w/ a piece of wasabi which was really really yummy. I liked it because it had a mild kick to it. Our food came extremely fast!! I love sitting at the bar sometimes because I get to watch my food being made :) First we got our sashimi moraiwase, and I was shocked at how large the cuts were. I had asked to substitute the tako because I don't like octopus, and it was replaced with another fish. I had no idea what it was but it was a bit bland. It's okay, I enjoyed the texture of it. I was a little thrown off at the odd number of slices because I like to split things evenly. So when it came down to one piece left of each fish, I bit each piece in half and plopped the remaining half onto his plate. I'm cute. ^__^ The crunch roll and bamboo roll were REALLY yummy. The jalapeno sauce on the crunch roll is to die for. Its the perfect amount of spiciness. The bamboo roll was the shizzzznit. The agedashi tofu was pretty yummy. It had a gingery taste to it which was new to me. We were completely stuffed, and the bill came out to about $35.  Definitely worth the money, and I highly recommend this place! I felt sort of uneasy in the parking lot at nighttime, but then again, I always feel uneasy in parking lots at nighttime. Stupid BF didn't know where the exit was, and he ended up just driving off a curb.
Super fresh, tasty, well-priced food, and great service. That says it all! I've gone for lunch with colleagues and dinner with friends and family, it is always a good experience and I always leave happy/satisfied.
I have heard very good things about this place from both reviews on yelp and friends of mine. Unfortunately I did not find my experience here very pleasurable. Maybe the problem was that I ordered the food to go. I know sometimes quality goes down a bit when the food is ordered to go, but that cannot explain how bad the food was. I ordered a few rolls and a combo plate. The fish just wasn't fresh. One of the pieces of sushi I had was just plain awful. The meat on my combo plate also tasted a bit weird. Not really sure what it was. I am wondering if maybe someone over ordered and most of the product they were using was out of date. I would not recommend this place. I am very surprised considering all the good things I have heard. Maybe it was a fluke, but I don't think I can justify going back there and spending more money in the hopes that they can serve a quality or even decent meal.
I love coming here but dread the wait because it is a small place and fills up quickly. There is a reason why though. They serve very fresh sashimi. The agedashi tofu is yummy. Tempura is done perfectly and  when we do get seated, the food does come out fast because the chefs work pretty quickly. Overall good food and enjoy coming here :)
What time was it.... it had just turned 5pm and I drove my ass over here but I don't care to eat by myself so I made a phone call first.... "Hey, what are you doin?" -Nothing... why? "I'm picking you up... I don't want to go to the store alone" ..... picks her up and pulls up to the store..... -This isn't a store... "Yeah, well I'm hungry and they sell food, so technically it's a store." ;P I have been on a search for collar.... hamachi, tuna, salmon collar. And here they have two out of three so my luck isn't that bad. So I walked in for the first time with friend in tow and sat ourselves at the sushi bar. Ordered up hamachi and salmon collar / sashimi. On both counts I prefer the hamachi collar and sashimi. I don't know in particular but I just prefer the buttery taste of the hamachi. But either way I could sit there and eat it all day. And she ate some too but preferred the salmon. It's all good, different strokes for different folks. Either way we ordered more orders of the sashimi. But the one thing we did agree on was the large Asahi. It's good. ;D
I need some new lunch places to hit around Santa Clara.  So I thought I would check out some Yelper's lists for lunch spots. I found this place and thought why not.  We usually go to Kobe and I don't really like the food there. They are located on Winchester and Pruneridge across from Walgreen's. The plaza is pretty old an you would not think there was a Sushi restaurant there.  Once we were inside the place its pretty small but I think they had another room in the back since alot of people was leaving from the back. I guess we got lucky because it was not busy at all. The hostess greeted us and we sat tatami style (shoes off).  I ordered there bento box and the vegetable croquettes. I had goyza with shashimi.  The bento box was good, but the vegetable croquettes I think has a bit to much breading for me.  Overall the food was deliciousand fresh. So much better than Kobe. The service was very good too.  Our waitress was nice and attentive. She checked up on us and see how we were doing.  I think I ate to much or to fast.  My tummy is so full! So I add another lunch spot to my list. Sorry there is no cute hot asian guy at this one.
I've been here three times, two great, one not so great (the fish in one of my rolls tasted terrible...had two pieces and left the rest). Considering the great service (friendly and quick) and the fair prices, I'm willing to overlook that one experience.  Definitely will be back, the best sushi in Santa Clara (other than Blue Fin, which is a bit fancier/more expensive).
This place does not have good cooked sushi but the raw fish is pretty good. I only enjoy the shrimp heads because you can eat them as a whole piece without having to choke on hard bones. I dont remember anything else here that was special...
Two things might deter you from heading to Yuki: 1) no dinner reservation for parties less than five people on weekends, and 2) the awfully long line protruding out the door. Our solution was to go very late, around 9pm. (The kitchen closes at 9:30pm.) We were seated right away, and the food came out with no delay. First, the appetizers. Items like vegetable croquette, kushi katsu, kaki fry, oshitashi, sake kama yaki, etc. make my heart beating fast. We tried the "albacore tataki" with fresh onions and really liked it. Next, the entrees. We ordered a nabeyaki udon and a dinner combination with beef and salmon. (I know, I know, this is a SUSHI bar...but it was a cold night and I needed something warm.) The dinner combo was standard, but it came with A LOT of meat. My nabeyaki udon was also put together nicely, with extra chewy noodles in a boiling pot filled with A LOT of toppings. We weren't exactly impressed with either, but I still need I go back and try their sushi. Prices are agreeable, and clearly, they're very generous in portions. The service and ambiance deserve a star or two on their own. The folks here are really friendly and approachable. The restaurant isn't so roomy, but it's still cozy and comfortable with a small "no shoes" tatami area. SUM: +3 stars for the mediocre food +1 star for the stellar service & ambiance
Been coming here for a while...wasnt going to review it because I was torn.  I loved the food, service, and awesome prices...hated how small it was. Well Christmas came early this year!  Youre the man now Santa. Santa made Yuki Sushi bigger!  He rode his sleigh and gave Yuki a second room in the back.  Almost feels like a secret VIP room. Thank you Santa...now dont forget to give me Mandy Moore for my present. Davids Bottom Line-  The best bang for your buck Sushi anywhere!  Secret VIP room in the back makes you feel like a SUPERSTAH!!!! I really do love Mandy Moore.
This is my goto place to get my sushi fix. Their sushi selection is somewhat limited but everything I have tried so far was good. Their spicy scallop roll is my favorite. The sauce is simple yet it brings out the freshness of the scallops. Not your typical fusion rolls that totally overwhelmed your taste bud with too many ingredients and seasonings. I love their Hamachi in both sashimi and nigiri form. Had toro there once and it was pretty delicious as well. Their lunch bento was nice. The portion is a bit too much for me but other people seem to have no trouble finishing theirs. For dinner there are usually a bit of a wait around 6-7pm. When I am desperate for sushi I simply order take out.
Another short notice lunch that turned out marginal. Yuki Sushi has been around for a long time, and I can now see that it's all due to the Americanization of what was once a good Japanese restaurant. When I used to go here many years ago, I could find good quality sushi, but now, the place seems to be dominated by bento boxes and specialty rolls. Don't get me wrong, they have a good selection of donburi, combination bento boxes, udon, and even vegetarian entrees, so they do cater to the masses and the non-Japanese. But if you're in the mood for quality and hard core Japanese, you will be disappointed. Where have all of the authentic Japanese restaurants gone?
This is one of our favorite sushi places in Santa Clara. I really like the katsu curry and my wife loves the chirashi.  It's pretty clear this is a local favorite as we've never been seated immediately.  It's ALWAYS busy. Pros: * tasty * tatami seating available * good selection * local small business Cons: * Not a very "traditional" Japanese place * Kinda loud, especially when they're busy - and I've never seen them NOT busy. * Limited waiting area inside, which means you may have to wait outside where some people like to smoke Verdict: "I'll be back!"
Hunting through reviews from other Yelper friends, I discovered one that Donna Y. went to recently and decided to go here.  This week, I've been keeping away from eating lunch out to be able to soften my workout schedule in prep for the half marathon, but last night, my planned eating binge got canceled so I thought today I could get away with it. So grabbing co-worker Cindy N., we headed to Yuki Sushi. It's been a while since I found an authentic Japanese restaurant that I hadn't heard of yet, so it was a really pleasant surprise. Though it's a sushi place, they also have some other traditional Japanese dishes, and that was very welcome.  We decided to try as much variety as possible so we ordered the Katsu-don and split it, had two orders of nigiri (hotate/scallops and tamago/egg), and a couple of rolls (the negima and another one with eel and avocado). Not surprisingly, the rolls were the most disappointing for me.  The negina was pretty good, but the avocado and eel was clearly overly sweetened even by eel standards.  The scallops were good and had a nice firmness, and the egg was definitely properly made, split into dozens of layers and lightly sweetened.  My only problem with the egg was the coloring.  I don't know if that's because too much of the sauce was used (even though the sweetness level seemed fine) or becausee it was slightly overcooked, or if it was a little less fresh, but whatever the reason, the discoloring was a little strange. The katsu-don was near perfect.  Tastewise, it clearly was absolutely perfect, and the sauce taste and consistency was great.  the egg was fine, and the katsu, though a little too thin compared to places in Japan, seems to be the norm for California and tasted just fine.  My one notation is really in the amount of sauce.  There was more than I've come to expect in a katsu-don.  that's not necessarily bad, just a little different from the norm. All this, plus a California roll to go, and it was only $27.  That's not a bad deal at all.  for the price, I'd say this place is spot on. Though I think this is really a three star place, the attention to authenticity and the great price drive it up an extra star. Way to go Yuki Sushi!  I'm a fan!
3.5 stars. **SUSHI ON THE CHEAP** Craving sushi but don't want to blow all of your hard-earned money? Yuki Sushi is your answer. Decent all around: good service, solid food, and best of all, reasonably-priced. Ambiance was rather small and squishy. We sat in the back . . meaning we had to walk through the kitchen. Lay out was odd, but manageable. Meal came with salad and miso soup! YAY! Ordered the following: (1) Agedashi tofu - the fried tofu was good, a little bit too much crunch for me, but that is personal. Would request more ginger but the green onions were fine. (2) Beef Tataki - seared beef served extra rare with ponzu taste was *ok*. There was no wow factor here. Reminded me of the beef they put in the Vietnamese pho soups. (3) Katsu Curry - beef curry with a side of ton katsu was *ok* as well. It tasted like those packaged curry you can make from the Asian stores. Not really home made, but it tasted fine. The sauce was on the thick side. Generous carrots and sauce, but the beef bits were disappointing. (4) Spicy Crunch Roll - crab, avocado, cucumber, and tempura crumbs topped with jalapeno sauce was creative and tasty. My favorite of the dishes we ordered. Dinner for 2 with tax and tip came out to be $30 pp which isn't too bad. Overall, a decent place if you're craving sushi and you happen to be in the Santa Clara hood. RECOMMEND the Spicy Crunch rolls.
That's fine if you want to call me a sushi whore.  I did after all go to Yuki Sushi just one night after I ate some sushi at Smile Sushi. :) What can I say, sushi is my favorite food of all time! At any rate, I can easily compare the two sushi joints as I ate at each place on consecutive nights. I met up with a friend at Yuki Sushi to catch up and eat some good food. As with any new place I've never been to, I did a quick search on Yelp beforehand and got excited as I saw the 4 Star rating. However by the time I started eating, I thought the ratings were a bit generous and didn't quite live up to the "Yay! I'm a fan!" rating.  Personally it was more of "A-OK". Don't get me wrong it wasn't bad.  Just not as good as some other places I've been to. So we ordered four different sushi rolls and two appetizers.  We went with the Rainbow Roll, Toshi Roll, Alaskan Roll, Jackie Roll, Soft-shell crab, and Hamachi Kama Yaki. The Good: The Soft shell crab is a must have and was perfectly prepared.  This perfected delicacy was crispy, tasty, and very flavorful!  The Toshi Roll and Alaskan Rolls were my two favorite rolls.  The Alaskan Roll consists of cream cheese and avocado wrapped in smoked salmon.  I am such a sucker for rolls that have cream cheese in them.  The Toshi roll has Tuna, Yellowtail, salmon, avocado, cucumber, and spicy cod roe.  Both of these rolls offered plenty of delicious fresh fish inside them.  What I really liked about the Toshi roll is that it offered really large cuts of sashimi inside it, yum! The Okay: Usually I really like the Rainbow Roll when I go to sushi bars.  Yet for some reason this one did not excite me at all.  Presentation wise, it was a sad sight and the fish didn't look as fresh as the two rolls I really did enjoy. My friend really liked the Jackie Roll, as that is her favorite dish here.  The Jackie Roll consists of scallops, shrimp, and jalapeno sauce.  It really didn't have much flavor to me. Overall: The night offered a mix of good and okay food.  IMHO, there are better sushi bars to spend your money at.  Sushi might very well be my favorite food, but this isn't my favorite sushi joint!
Used to be (when the office/lab was in Santa Clara), I'd have lunch here with co-workers on a monthly frequency.  That went on for years.  Perhaps familiarity bred boredom; I hadn't returned in just as many years since the lab relocated. One Sunday, a step-out for an afternoon movie turned into a all-day affair with friends and fellow SBC'rs culminating in dinner here, and the appeal of simple preparations, honest presentations, and clean cuts of fresh fish rejuvenated my appreciation for their sushi. For my dinner, I ordered a (smaller) Nigirizushi dinner and a spicy salmon Temaki. All in all, the cuts of maguro and sake were hearty and filling, the [thinner] slices of saba and hamachi were prepared nicely to accentuate their texture.  The unagi was cooked well and dressed with just a touch of kabayaki, delish. The masago and tobiko gunkanmaki were pleasantly generous.  The spicy salmon Temaki was a good finish; the coolness of the overall meal contrasted by a lasting spiciness. The austere stripmall location and exterior masks the simple chic of the restaurant; not overdone with kitsch or memorabilia, the low-lit dining area makes for a nice place to pay attention to the one next to or across from you.  The large chabu-dai dining table (low dining table, shoes off) is a nice and simple immersion into Japanese culture.  And if you want to watch the craftmanship and artistry of sushi making firsthand, find your way to the few seats that perimeter the sushi bar. From dates to dinner parties (or dining solo, for we dating-impaired!), Yuki is a "go to" spot for good sushi. _____________________________________________________ Ever tipsily walk out of a sushi joint into a small dark parking lot? Um, yeah, me neither...  *whistles innocently* (Large hot sake, $5.50. Just saying. http://yukisushi.com/din... )
The restaurant is situated in a center with a couple of other shops.  The inside reminded me of TGIF Sushi, with a small sushi bar and a couple of small tables with the addition of two tables that you can eat at without your shoes. I really really wanted to like this place, but it was a let down.  The sushi combo that I had came some California rolls, miso soup and salad.  The California rolls were six small rolls that super sticky mushy rice with a small piece of avacado, cucumber and tiny stick of fake crab.  When I tried to pick up one piece with my chopstics, the roll unraveled and also picked up another piece of California roll next to it.  That was how sticky it was.  Blech... Miso soup was average, tasted a bit like the soup that comes in a dry packet, and believe me, I've had the miso soup with the dehydrated green onions and nasty pieces of dried out tofu.  You just add water and the thing blossoms into this easy to make miso soup. The salad was rabbit food: some stale pieces of lettuce, couple shreds of carrots and red cabbage.  There was maybe a spoonful of watered down, I guess what they call "dressing".  It was this light flesh color looking thing that had no flavor. The sushi itself, the rice was off, mushy, sticky and worst of all, warm.  The fish was the oddest thing, some pieces were small, some were large, some were tender, some had stringy pieces of fat that were not edible, some of it was downright not edible at all.  It was like missmatched sushi, where someone slapped down some rice, took a bowl mixed fish tossed it all up the air and hoped for the best when they landed on the rice. I asked for extra of the famed jalapeno sauce..hmph, the waitress asked for an dollar for a small maybe one inch plastic container of it.  Since it was talked about on yelp, I gave in and handed her a dollar bill.  It was this green creamy sauce, that has a bite just in the first lick, then it just tapers off.  It was so-so, not something I'd get on the side again though. Perhaps I need to give their specialty rolls a try.
Fortunate that I should have Yelp mobile for when quick and decisive action is required, even if you are exiting a bar and need to decide on dinner for a large group of people; kudos to Yelp for designing a "mobile" version.  I'd also like to give a shout-out to my NorCal brethren for rating this place so highly, you made my decision quite easy. Part of a mall that seems clearly out of place, think Big Bear log cabin exterior, however the interior is Japanese, with tatami rooms. (My group opted for the traditional "table") The food was phenomenal: Sushi, Sashimi, Yakitori, Tempura, it was all marvelous.  I haven't had Japanese food quite this good in a very long time.  Seriously? Seriously. We came at a good time, as we were leaving the wait looked long and resembled the line of rhythmically inclined queuing up to enter Club Sutra on a Saturday.  I will now play The Shins and cry tears of sadness because this place is so far from home.
I would have never given this place a second glance if it wasn't for Yelp.  (I have actually driven right past it several times!)  However, I had a very nice dinner here tonight. I was impressed with the number of vegetarian dinner options!  I chose the simple and very healthy steamed vegetable dinner combo, since I am on the verge of getting a cold.  My b/f had a dinner combo with beef something and sushi.  My dinner was very yummy and the sushi we had was pretty good. Not as good as my favorite South Bay Japanese restaurant (Gombei in SJ Japantown).  However, it is one of the best Japanese restaurants in Santa Clara. It was very busy on a Friday night and we had to wait at least 30 minutes for a table.  We could have been seated sooner, but the servers are so busy, they barely have time to clear a table after someone leaves.  However, the food comes out very fast, so that made up for the wait. Our bill was around $30 for two people including tax and tip, which isn't bad for Japanese food. I will probably come here again when I don't feel like driving to SJ Japantown.
A place that definitely serves fresh fish? Yup! Yuki's one of them!! We ordered the hamachi and the albacore which were both EXCELLENT!!! Also got the crunch roll and the toshi? both were good as well! Also an order of the tempura which came out totally fresh and hot!  all for $40! Decent price especially for the food.  I would definitely come here again.  Not a big place so don't plan on bringing a large group here.  Prepare for a long wait too.  This place is definitely great for the sashimi.
Eh, i thought it was pretty pricey for the quality and quantity you receive. This place is located in a "western/saloon-looking" plaza. A little difficult to find. We came here on a Tuesday evening, and around 7:30pm; a little after, this place got fairly crowded. Probably won't be back--there are better sushi restaurant selections out there.
Eh, it was ok. Definitely won't be driving all the way here for sushi. I wish they had more fresh sushi. I ordered a Haru maki appetizer which was a crispy envelope with krab and cream cheese. Pretty tasty, but its something I could have made at home. For dinner I got the sushi special which was three pieces of nigiri, California roll and a tekka maki. Nigiri was fresh, a bit too much wasabi and the rice was a bit on the wet side, mushy. The rolls I ordered were a bit messy; not round, squished and missing a bit of rice. I found the tekka maki to be a bit fishy and the creamy jalapeno sauce on the spicy crunch delicious. Its a bit different from the usual sriracha based sauces. My friends ordered dinner entrees, beef and salmon teriyaki. The buds said the beef teriyaki was 'mediocre' and the salmon teriyaki 'fishy'. And I got to try the pasta salad that came with the dinners and it was pretty good, a bit Americanized. Service is quick and friendly. Its a small place and a bit crowded, definitely call ahead for reservations for five plus and parking is a bit tricky.
I AM STILL HUNGRY!!  DID YOU HEAR THAT??  I AM STILL HUNGRY!! Tiny hole in the wall Japanese restaurant waited by an over worked Filipino looking dude and a fat sushi chief behind the bar.  Prices was ok but I WANT MORE FOOD! Jason's sushi took forever to come, and Stella will get stoned to death in Japan if she keeps eating sushi by breaking it up in pieces.  Had to arm wrestle her drunk ass to teach her a lesson, TAKE THAT! I'M STILL HUNGRY!!!
I love Yuki Sushi!  This definitely my favorite sushi restaurant in the south bay.  My boyfriend and I come here all the time, and we come here for the Hamachi sashimi!  If you are a Hamachi lover, you MUST try Yuki's sashimi. I've order other sashimi too - the sake sashimi (salmon - not smoked) is my next favorite: oily and thickly sliced, just the way I like it!  None of their sashimi is really fishy, so you can thoroughly enjoy the flavor, without being overwhelmed with a fishy smell or taste that you sometimes experience when the sashimi has been frozen or is a day old.  You know their fish is FRESH!!! Their rolls are great, but not fancy like rolls you find at other restaurants in the bay area.  I like the fact that they try to keep the food fairly traditional and not so Americanized, like most Japanese restaurants I've been to around here.  Being from Hawaii, Japanese sushi meant nigiri style, not fancy rolls topped 3 kinds of fish, tobiko, and hot sauce.  This is what I enjoy most about Yuki.  They use high quality ingredients, and don't try to mask the flavor of the fish with outrageous sauces. I crave Yuki's hamachi almost every week, and I can't wait to go back!
I swear I've reviewed this place before.... Anyways. I've eaten here several times... well, I've gotten take out here several times and finally ate IN the restarunt last night. The sushi here is authentic and delicious. It's nice walking into a Japanese and the Sushi chefs are not named Juan or Kim. Yes people, I am picky about the sushi chef. They need to be Japanese. Don't hate! Anyways, the fish is fresh and flavorful. My coworker noted the size of the fish slices, both for nigiri and sashimi were generous. I would recommend the traditional rolls, but there are always the non-"traditional" rolls that Americans love. Some of these are pulled off very well. I generally order the ohitashi (boiled spinach with bonito), tsukemono (pickled veggies), and the katsu-curry. If you are a fan of curry, this is a good place. The curry is stocked with beef and carrots and some onions... full of flavor. They bring over a bottle of tonkatsu sauce and the togarashi nanami (chili spice). It is also served with akai no zuke... a special pickled radish mix only served with curry, my favorite. This place gets very busy. I wouldnt count on walking in and seating on the weekend, and maybe getting lucky as I did last night by going in after 7:30. I thought the prices were a bit on the expensive side, but for good food, it was well worth it.
Went here yesterday with some coworkers.  I've never even heard of this place so I was surprisd by the very high marks overall.  This place is nestled in an odd strip mall that looks oddly barn-esque and pretty dated.  It's about 3 blocks north of Valley Fair and I would have never expected a place like this out there.  We arrived at 12:20pm to the place being about half full (seats 44).  By 12:45 it was basically full. The 5 of us ordered everything under the sun, from edamame to gyoza, agedashi tofu to bento lunch, spicy tuna rolls to magura nigiri.  I personally ordered the maguro nigiri, spicy tuna maki, and chicken kara-age, to which the waitress said "good choice". The nigiri was very good.  Large, succulent pieces of tuna about the size of a pink rubber eraser, if not a little larger.  The spicy tuna roll was excellent.  I dislike when they artificially color the tuna to make it LOOK spicy.  This one had a quiet heat to it; once the flavors spread along your tongue, you really felt it. The kara-age was FANTASTIC.  Probably one of the better ones I've had.  This place cuts their chicken morsels smaller than most.  Santa Ramen makes theirs HUGE.  Kahoo makes theirs a bit smaller.  Both of them tend overbatter and overcook, so the skin is a bit too thick in places and a bit too charred.  Yuki's was evenly coated and GBD (golden, brown, and delicious, as Alton Brown would say). I am definitely coming back here.  I always talk about Sushi Tomi as being one of the better Japanese (note I did not say just sushi) places in the South Bay.  I think--quite unexpectedly--Yuki Sushi is a very close second.
This is as legit as it'll get when it comes to old school sushi joints that are just about the quality of food and service. My friend introduced me to this lovely little spot and I've since been eager to come back and turn some other friends onto it. Such reasonable prices in a very comfy spot in an otherwise run down looking plaza. Its a bit tiny inside, but unlike a lot of smaller sushi spaces, this is definitely worth the wait.. They don't have a ton of special roll selection, but what they don't deliver in they make up for and exceed with fish quality. Must try if you're a sashimi lover!
Yuck yuck yuck!  What's the hype of this place?  I came in for dinner on Valentine's day, and waited for almost 1 hour.  Alright I was patient because yelpers said the wait is worth it.  The service was quick, our orders were out pretty soon after we ordered. But the taste and freshness was pretty disappointing!  The Toshi roll was a combination of several different sashimi, which was just a bleh.  The individual sashimi pieces was OK.  But the Negihama (chopped up yellow tail and onion) was completely GROSS.  It was not fresh and I had to spit it out.  My boyfriend ate a piece of that and he ended up throwing up at home afterward. I do not recommend ordering anything that's not served as a whole piece here.. they may cheat and use some stale fishes when you order the rolls. Sigh.. I still give a star for the service, and the extra rose they gave out to all couple that night, which was nice.  But there's NOWAY I'll come back, ever.
One of my favorite sushi places in the S.V. Imaginative rolls and delicious, fresh fish. It gets super, super busy, so be prepared to wait.
Pretty tiny place with a surprise back room that you have to walk through the kitchen to get to. Had pretty decent meals here on two separate occasions. The prices are great (in my opinion). Woohoo!: Thick slices of sashimi for pretty decent/lower prices Boohoo!: Omaha Roll. Do not order it. Omaha steak : joy :: Omaha Roll : wtf (I've never had Omaha steak myself, but I've heard good things) If I could give a 3.5 I would, but I'm gonna round up since I can't.
For forty bucks you can have yourself a great meal for two. I ordered: -tempura (appetizer) -2 orders of hamachi nigiri -1 salmon nigiri -1 suzuki nigiri -1 crunchy roll -1 tempura roll -1 spicy tuna roll and two cups of ocha(green tea) The nigiri pieces were big, fat, juicy and the freshest I've tasted so far in the area. I gave it four stars because you can't beat having fresh sushi in Japan(if you know where to look) or Hawaii (if you catch your own!). Im REALLY happy this place is really close to me.   Im going to be bulking up on protein here more often....  =P
Celebrated my friend "JEN S."'s birthday here last night. We had a party of about 12 of us and they actually did a great job of making sure we had what we needed, and the service was very accommodating depite how busy the place was. It is a hole in the wall, but that's what gives it the charm. The rolls were not "blow me away" terrific, but they were solid, and had quality fish (though I can't say I am a sashimi expert). I recommend getting a reservation if you are going on a weekend or Friday night. ROLL OUT!
I would have to minus one star just because they upped the prices for the appetizer sake sashimi to $13, now they're like other places closer to where I live. Competitive advantage lost here...=( But i understand, prices change. hmmmm....
Plain Jane ain't the same when you take off her glasses and let her hair down. This about sums up my... Read more 
As part of my oh-so-healthy diet regime, I eat sushi, pho, and froyo at least once a week (though not on the same day...unless it was a good day HA) So after having to go into the office on a Saturday, I was looking for some spicy scallop and yelp led me to Yuki Sushi with the buzz words fresh and cheap. I sat by the bar and ordered some beer & sake - they have Kirin Light! http://static.px.yelp.co... only 95 calories the bottle said..maybe I should have ordered another. Jackie Roll - FAIL. It was the one roll on the menu with scallop but it fell apart the minute I picked it up. Minimal scallop with shrimp and I think it was missing the jalapeno sauce. http://static.px.yelp.co... Toshi Roll - Filled with big pieces of tuna, yellowtail, salmon...this one made up for the blunder above. Chicken Karaage - Well worth it for only $3.95, but you gotta ask them for dipping sauce since it doesn't come for with it. I opted for the jalapeno sauce...perrrrfect. http://static.px.yelp.co... Crunch Roll - Spicy crab, avocado, cucumber, topped with tempura crumbs. Solid california roll type sushi. http://static.px.yelp.co... My eyes were bigger than my stomach so I ordered more than I could eat. But I didn't feel rushed to leave as I sat at the bar getting my latest read on - Freakanomics. Ever wonder what teachers and sumo wrestlers have in common? I just finished that chapter. Things to take note of: 1) The spicy mayo made from sriracha you're accustomed to at other sushi places is called jalapeno sauce here. It's a light green color but tastes similar with a good kick. 2) The rolls here are half the size than usual (about 4-5 pieces), hence half the price. But it gives you a chance to try some variety rather than filling up on one kind of roll. 3) Seating is tight but there is a small tatami area that's cozy where you have to take your shoes off. So make sure your socks don't have holes!
It's hard to believe that in such a heavily Asian populated area, there aren't too many great sushi places around the South Bay. Is it that San Jose doesn't actually touch an ocean that good seafood is hard to get? Who knows but the BF and I have been on a search for "oishii" sushi in San Jose FOREVER! After consulting Yelp one sushi-craving night, we found the reviews for Yuki and thought we'd try it out. They weren't kidding about the lines for this place! Luckily they have space heaters outside to warm yourself up on those chilly nights! The place itself is small and quaint-about a dozen small tables, sushi bar and an elevated tatami seating area. We found the servers to be friendly and swift (my two favorite server traits) and settled into their fairly extensive menu. On our order list were several types of sashimi, nigiri, and some specialty rolls. I'm surprised that so many folks were adverse to their rolls as we really enjoyed our Spicy Tuna, Spider Roll, and Toshi Roll--mmm! As for the fish, it was very fresh and had great flavor. Nam's Tips for dining at Yuki: 1.  Go early for dinner or on a weekday as there definitely is a wait and they don't typically take reservations on weekends (unless it's a large party) 2. If you have a little one, sit at the sushi bar. The chefs are extremely nice and children-friendly. I've seen them on numerous occasions making little special tiny maki rolls for the kids--fun! 3. Hot sake and Asahi makes everything just a bit tastier!
Yellow sign outside Unusually small place Kind and quick staff I liked the Kyo House Special (not on menu) Appetizer - Ika Fry: fried breaded calamari steak ($5.25) :) - Kaki Fry: lightly breaded and fried oysters ($5.25) :( Dinner - Rock n' Roll: eel, avocado, masago ($4.75) :) - Kyo House Special ($8?- not sure) a bit spicy with that jalapeno sauce, but good. recommended by waiteress. :) - Sashimi/Sashimi dinner combo: assorted sashimi (i saw an octopus and other fishie things) and two MAKIMONOS [Tekka (tuna) & California] ($16.50) =\
Yuki Sushi is a cute little restaurant.  When you arrive, be sure to write your name on the list. There might be a little wait, but it'll be worth it.  They started us with a little sample of soba noodles, which I thought was unique.  I had the ninja roll and the spicy tuna roll.  With some sake on the side ;)  The rolls are smaller portions, but I think this is bet I tried a bit of the (green tea?) soba noodles w/dipping sauce.  It was allllright, a little on the bland side, but I'm not a huge fan of soba noodles. Side note: My table was by the door, and outside waiting was the cutest siamese kitten waiting patiently by the door :3
This place doesn't disappoint. Things that I have tried: *Spider Roll: Texture was weird.  Crab was a bit soggy. *Tatsuo (Dragon) Roll:  Awesome roll.  Practically melts in your mouth. *Spicey Crunch Roll:  This is a MUST try!! Make sure to ask for the "special roll".  It comes with strawberries, mango (or pineapple) and macadamia nuts.  I'm not a fan of cream cheese with any of my sushi rolls, so I usually ask for them to not include it.  Yummy and super spicy! My only complaint ... the last few times I have gone there, service has been bad.  They have delayed in providing sushi rolls, so the tempera shrimp is cold.  They rarely asked how we were doing and took them forever to provide us with the bill.
This is a very Americanized sushi joint. It is what it is. For those of you who like that, it will probably be comfortable and to your liking. For me, not so much. The good: The kids really like it. The kids bento combos are big, well priced and pretty good. The tempura was actually very good. The teriyaki was pretty good too. There was a big room in the back for the family and some friends who were in town. The bad: The nabe yaki udon was flat out bad. Just tasteless. The sushi was okay, but nothing special. The menu was pretty limited. I dont see myself going back for me, but my wife liked the convenience of it for the kids so maybe.
Since discovering Yelp, I quickly became a fan.  I only wish I'd learned about them sooner because I love dining out, I love trying new restaurants and Yelp is THE source for real reviews.  Yelp's taught me that when a restaurant gets it just right, people always notice.  But unfortunately, Yelpers can sometimes steer you wrong. Yuki is a good example.  Despite the large amount of 4 and 5 star reviews I was very underwhelmed with their food.  For starters the menu was quite limited and didn't offer a large variety of rolls.  The spicy tuna roll is often a good barometer of a restaurant's sushi quality given it's a fairly basic roll.  Yuki's was average.  The tuna was minced (a trick used to disguise the tiny piece of tuna being used) and the spicy flavor was undetectable. Prices are fairly cheap but they're also a reflection of the tiny servings you receive.  Each roll I ordered was under $6 but I was lucky to get more than 3 pieces of each.  They did serve a complimentary noodle salad and it was tasty but was literally a forkful of food. I'm beginning to see "tiny" is the ongoing theme at this place; given  the restaurant itself is 'tiny' and as a result, seating is cramped.  Service was so-so, our server was kinda bland.  Not snobby but not friendly either.  She came, she took our order, she served our food.  Nothing more. I have confidence in Yelp and I know with more reviews this place will receive the rating it deserves: a "tiny" 2 stars.
I think I have over expected for this place because of all the good reviews on the yelp. Went there on a wednesday night, it's crazy busy! So many people are waiting outside the resturant and I heard some of them have been waited for an hour. Luckily, I did make a resavition ahead of time, so no wait for me. The serivce is ok, they quickly took the order and the food arrived within 10 to 15 mins. Ordered the sashimi combination 15 pcs @ $14.00 which is not bad for the price. Fresh but don't have the melt in the mouth feeling as some of the yelper said. Also, ordered the Jackie roll which should have jalapeno sauce but I couldn't taste any of it. So it become very plain for this roll. Overall, this is a ok place for me if it doesn't need to wait for more than 10 mins.
At 6pm on Saturday, we went to Yuki Sushi expecting a long line, but we were lucky. There were some opening at the counter! I personally think that the counter seats are the best place to be at sushi restaurant, but that's your personal preferences, I guess. Sushi was GREAT. Fresh and thick cut fish. Mmm... we kept ordering Shiro Maguro (albacore tuna) as we could not get enough of it. Make sure to check on the Today's special board when you are ordering. We ordered Engawa (halibut's thin outer layer muscle) as it was on the special menu, and it was just delicious. It literary melted on my tongue as soon as I put a piece in my mouth. I'd come here more often but last couple times we turned around and went elsewhere as this place get really packed. Guess I need to be more patient!
Total hole-in-the-wall sushi place, which is hidden at the corner of a small strip mall. I didn't... Read more 
Beef tataki is a must try it's as tasty as it looks. The fish is fresh and flavorful and the fatty fish like salmon does melt in your mouth. Great sake selection as well. Good lively atmosphere to relax and socialize. The line was pretty long during prime time so I'd recommend going probably 30 minutes earlier to get a spot.
My new favorite roll is the Bamboo. But then again I also got and really enjoyed the Toshi, New York and Jackie. Tried the beef tataki which was good and fresh. The hubby was just ok with it so I'm not sure we'll have it again. Service was really slow for a Thursday evening but they were busy so I guess it was expected. It didn't take away from me enjoying my meal and I will definitely go back.
I found this place on Yelp and have thanked the heavens since. I have never been disappointed going... Read more 
Super good neighborhood joint. Everyone is super friendly here. Right when you walk in there is a sign in sheet, which is a bad sign. That means a lot of people like it and it will be no doubt busy as heck. We grabbed a table and my friend, who knows the owners, ordered a few appetizers which were all great. The soba noodles were very flavorful. Food came out pretty quick. The fish is super fresh. I had the hamachi and the fresh sake nigiri sushi and both were super fresh. I've heard they have great dessert here. Will have to try it next time! They take reservations, plenty of parking in the plaza, great food, and worth every penny!
Nice little gem tucked away in a sleepy strip mall a few blocks away from Valley Fair and Santana Row.  Saw all the great reviews and decided to check it out while in the area. We started with the complimentary soba ( nice change from the usual edamame), then the broiled whole squid with teriyaki sauce (good), Hamachi Sashimi Appetizer (nice thick fresh slices),  spicy tuna roll (nice little kick), Jazz Roll (awesome spicy veggies with unagi and avocado), Spider Roll (soft shell crab was fried nicely, but used to larger Spider Rolls), and we chose an assortment of nigiri...  We were dissapointed that they didn't have Uni (our fav).  All in all everything was made very fresh, and portions were just right. Service was friendly, and our teapot was always filled.  I'd come back again if I was in the mood and in the area...
I love Yuki Sushi!  They have really great food and sushi at reasonable prices.  The portions are very generous too.  I usually get the Saba Shioyaki and Tempura combination.  Yuki has one of the best Saba I have ever had.   Other favorites are the Kaki Fry, Chicken Teriyaki, and Tekka Donburi.   Their sushi and rolls are really delicious as well. The place gets really busy, so it's good to make reservations or be prepared to wait.  The atmosphere is casual and it's a great place to take your friends!
My girlfiends and I love this place and eat here about once a month. It's clean, fish is fresh and food is very delish!  I usually stick to the rolls and sushi, but last time I went, I tried the Katsu Curry w/ tonkatsu and absolutely loved it! I didn't really care for the tonkatsu cause I thought the meat was a little too thick and tough, but the beef in the curry was tender and juicy and the curry itself was perfect; not too spicy, not too salty, not too thick, it was just right! Only reason I give it a 4 is that when it gets packed, you could be waiting forever and the service is so-so, but if you get there around 6-6:30 during the weekdays, you should be fine.
Yummy fresh sushi... yummy sake.  I wanna go back. It's been a while so, I can't remember much other than a great pleasant feeling about the place and tasty food and drink.  (Oh and Crys really liked it too.)  That's enough for me! See ya there!
One of my favorite Japanese restaurants!!! It's so cute and quaint... which means limited seating and always a wait.. but so worth it!!! Prices are very reasonable,  the fish is super fresh, and portions are just right!! They also have one of the better Yosenabes (assorted seafood and vegetables simmered in broth) I've had. Service is always friendly and attentive. And I love the small bowl of soba noodles that they start you off with. P.S. Their lunch specials are super worth it like their Sushi Special - you get nigiri and 2 rolls for only $8.95!  My mom and I love coming here whenever we can for mother-daughter days (especially since Valley Fair is only a couple blocks away...)
This sushi restaurant is a little different.  The prices are low, but it's not what you would expect.  Yes, the prices are too good to be true!!  The rolls are half the size of normal rolls.  It's a good thing because you won't get full off of just one or two rolls like you usually do.  At Yuki you can order more for a nice variety.  Hell, my boyfriend and I shared 4 rolls and I was almost full (but he probably wasn't).  The downside to this is that if you multiply the price by two, it would end up being more expensive than if you had a bigger roll for a higher price at another restaurant. I loved the jalapeno sauce!  Be sure to order a roll with it.. or get it on the side.  The Spider roll was very good.. and I was disappointed that their Crunch roll wasn't completely deep fried.. it only had deep fried breading on the top. The flavors were great.. but I will not be returning.. sadly.. the rolls just aren't big enough for your money's worth.  Plus, I have to try a ton of other Japanese restaurants before I stick to just one.  I also don't like the location.. coming here at night was a little creepy.. Yuki Sushi was the only business open in the entire plaza.
Are you serious? Yuki gets 4 stars and Sushi O Sushi gets 3 1/2 stars on Yelp?  Let's get this straight... I do like going here when I don't want to spend a lot for sushi.  I've been going here for years.  It's not the best , but it's definitely decent.  It's usually busy here and the service is good and fast. I usually get the moriawase (assorted sashimi), beef tataki, and seafood soup.  All is good, prices are low, and fish is decent.  Come here if you don't want to break the bank.
I cam here with CeCe C. which her review is two or three reviews below mine. I would say that this place isn't too bad. It wasn't like OMG either. You may have some trouble looking for this place since it is a small sign in a a decent size plaza. Each sign looks like the others. Inside is pretty small and people are nice. Food was alright, not extremely impressed.
Another great restaurant from yelp search.  Small little place with decent food! Sashimi set - fresh fish, portion on the small side portk katsu and tempura Bento box - Tempura was good, not oily; Pork Katsu was disappointing :(  it was dry and thin Great service by the staff
Having been to almost 50 different sushi restaurants in my life, this has been the BEST place I have ever eaten sushi. My mouth waters just thinking about it, which drives me insane because I live in LA and go to Santa Clara once every couple of months. My boyfriend and I always make it a point to eat here when I visit. If I could use only one word to describe their sushi, it would be: ORGASMIC. I have never had such fresh, buttery, melt-in-your-mouth fish before Yuki. What's more is that they give you HUGE slices of sashimi, so you definitely get more bang for your buck when you order sushi here. I'm afraid to order toro at other cheaper sushi places because I hate paying exorbitant prices for a pair of nigiri sushi of mediocre quality. But you can be sure about what you order here. The hamachi belly is also delicious. Their bentos are also a really good deal for lunch and dinner. It comes with rice, choice of entree(s), sushi/sashimi, salad, miso soup, and a couple other side dishes. The portions are perfect. I usually order the saba and my boyfriend gets the chicken teriyaki, both of which are good. We found this restaurant through Yelp, and we are sooo happy that we did! It's tucked away in the corner of a strip mall, so it's a hole-in-the-wall. But, you'd be surprised to see how many of these small restaurants are amazing! We've had to wait for a while a few times when they were packed, but I always think it's worth the wait.
Anyone interested in this restaurant should know that this place gets busy almost the instant they open the doors.  My man and I showed up at 6 and there were already several parties waiting.  Lucky for us, the waitress seated us right away in a secret room that you go through the kitchen to get to (this was kinda cool). Food-wise, I thought it was great and I only have the tiniest, most insignificant negative point; as someone who is experienced in rolling sushi and has had family members hover over me while I make it to correct me, I'm sometimes nit-picky about presentation, and at times their sushi rolls were falling apart!  And I'm not talking about "man, this is so stuffed with ingredients" falling apart, but nori-wrap coming undone on a TEKKA ROLL.  That's ONE ingredient, and it was in total shambles! But hey, it still tasted GREAT.  I loved it.  The staff was really friendly, but one major concern was that I brought the check and my card up to the counter because we were in a hurry, and at one point the waitress stopped because she couldn't tell which bill went to which card or which receipt...that's kinda scary. Come early and be prepared for a wait and some crowd.  But you know that when a restaurant gets lively right at opening, it's GOOD.
Food = good. Fresh fish. Nice sauce. Portions for sushi is small.  However, udon and other entrees are plentiful. Prices = moderate. It's not dirt cheap but worth the price for sashimi and savory soup. Service = okay. Friendly but we had like 3 different servers.... It's a very small place...so if you're in a big group...make reservations! Oh and 6+ = 18% gratuity We'll be back...:D
This place was ARRRITE.   Yes, the sushi is a cheap, but the quality was not up to par with my standards.  They were tiny and falling apart when we received them.  =(  We ordered the Yuki, Crunch, and Toshi Rolls with a Chicken Karage Appetizer.  The Yuki and Toshi rolls were good..but nothing extraordinary.  The Crunch was the best one, but a bit too mayonnaise-y for my liking.  I also enjoyed the Chicken Karage..not too oily and plenty of meaty parts (instead of fatty ones).  I would definitely order this dish if I were to come back. The service was nice and very welcoming. All in all this place was just mediocre for me...I don't think I'll be coming back anytime soon.
Being that I live about a mile away. Friday was the first time I tried this place. Thank goodness for lent, my choices were limited and even Krung Thai across the street would have only been a tease for my palette. I should have listened to the numerous reviews saying get there early as it gets packed. The place is small but alot of people go so yo need to get there early or endure the wait outside.  So after about waiting 30 minutes with 6 groups in front of us we got seated at the bar. We had no time for a cooked meal so we went with our standard. Tuna and Salmon Sashimi. The fish was fresh and teh cold beer was perfect for our palette. Overall the food was great and I cant wait to go back and try their meat dishes.
This dump teaches me to not ever eat sushi @ a place where people reviewed it as a "lower priced place" when 3 days before we ate @ Koo ( http://www.yelp.com/biz/... ), i guess our bar is too high for the junk this place served us on a busy Friday night. I ordered Hamachi Sashimi, the fish came to the table looking "gray", rather than the regular silver color of hamachi. Being a good Chinese boy who was taught not to waste food, i braved through the sashimi, wolfing the pieces down with a giant dose of wasabi trying to drawn out the fishiness. When i left the place my breathe smelled so fishy, a herd of cats came out of nowhere and tackled me to the ground. I then had 2 days of diarrhea and lost 4 pounds. So the only chance to bring me back to Yuki Sushi is if i wanted to loose some weight VERY quickly. If Yelp was a diet review site, I would have given this place 5 fucking stars
I went here with my bestie today for one of our "hang-out-all-day-sessions." She wanted sushi - our usual go to since we are both on a perpetual diet. I called ahead just to make sure they didn't have a long wait. It took them a while to answer but they let me know that they weren't busy so we made our way over. Seated promptly and it's definitely cozy. If you're someone that likes to listen on others conversations (like me) then this is definitely enjoyable. I think our neighbors liked listening in on my conversation with the BFF about God. Anyways, I ordered the 2 sides Standard Bento for $7.75. It came with miso, side salad, rice and your choice of two sides. I cheated and got gyoza and tempura. I thought that everything match the price. The BFF got edamame, had some of my miso, a side salad and a crunch roll - she finished everything. I'm assuming it was good. I did notice something non-related to the restaurant while I was there. An older couple - wife pushing her husband into the restaurant as she holds open the door with one had and pushes his wheelchair inside. She was clearly struggling and the men sitting right in front of her didn't get up to help her. I, from the other side of the restaurant, saw what was going on and got up to help. What happened to chivalry?
really? 4 stars on Yelp? No one has that bad of a night. service, great! lots of staff for such a small place, friendly and very quick. food: terrible! I ordered the usual: Amaebi: did not taste fresh, had a bad after taste. the fried head was good though. Salmon sashimi (10 piece) was very firm, almost tough. Not tough as in rubber tough but tough compared to the salmon I usually get from a good sushi place. Uni. This might have saved them, but nope. On my 2nd piece, there were small pieces of shell in it. I've been eating Uni for god knows how many years, this is the first time finding shell. Now I do understand that the shell was already there when they purchased it from a distributor, but still, shell? really? We came here because my gf came here with her friend a few months ago, and she said Yuki was good. This is before we saw the 4 star Yelp rating. I don't know, hard for me to imaging a place can get 4 stars on Yelp and serve what they did. I will not come back.
My GF and I were in the mood for some sushi. Only problem, it was Sunday night & Labor Day weekend. Yikes. MOST places were closed. We finally found Yuki Sushi on Yelp. It's neatly tucked in the corner of a small plaza. We could see the popularity of this place because there were hella people waiting outside! We signed into the waiting list at the front entrance at 7pm. We sat and enjoyed the decor, people watching, and delicious drinks/foods passing by. I would have given them 5 Stars, but they were so busy filing customers in & out, a 3 person group snuck right in and sat themselves down! They cut in front of 4 other groups waiting, including us! We were finally seated after a 35 minute wait! Unless we inhaled our dinner, we were going to miss our movie. Oh well, we'll catch another one next time. Let's enjoy our experience! They had the BEST tempura here! It was so crispy and fresh! The Soba noodles were ok, could have had more flavor than rubber bands. The sushi was excellent and very tasty! They had a nice selection of sake, beers, and juices. Overall: a great dinner. Maybe we'll eat after the crowds. The staff were very helpful and spoke English so clearly too. PS the bathrooms should be cleaner to match the restaurants over tidiness.
I can smell the dudes nasty shoes, and it still doesnt bother me because i have a crunch roll in my mouth. I was introduced to this tiny place by two amazing friends.  You know how everyone says "OMG i know the BEST SUSHI place in TOWN"  and you go there and it just totally SUCKS? This isnt one of those places. For me, its the quality of the fish that reigns most important to me, then in a short second, the variety of the rolls.  I love them both and again highly reccomend the " Crunch Roll" I knocked one star because its kinda pricey, and its so tiny, so u gotta expect to wait if you dont get there at 5 pm.  Space is SUPER limited (I had to sit next to the traditional table where they make the party take thier shoes off... so i had a nice nike or two under my nose)
So I finally got to make my way back here.  We came on Friday early evening so we didn't have a problem scoring a seat right away. We got our menus and our miso soup with soba noodles, yum. We started off with their Chicken Kara-age- Seasoned pieces of fried chicken- It would have tasted better with some kind of sauce to dip it in. Beef Tataki- Seared beef, served extra rare with ponzu sauce- I love this dish and they make it how it's suppose to be made.  Perfect. We ordered salmon sashmi, ama ebi, ika- all were very fresh with no fishy smell! For their rolls, we ordered their spicy tuna which isn't sauced with the usual dynamite sauce, but instead with their famous jalapeno sauce. Wish it was a little more spicy, but good. Ebi Tempura- two pieces of shrimp tempura with avocado, cucumber, spicy cod roe, masago and asked for some jalapeno sauce on top, great touch and made the roll even better. Overall, service was great and we couldn't be happier. We'll definitely make our way back here.
Came here with a big group of friends... good thing one of our friends are great friends with the... Read more 
"Sushi makes you lose control!" I was very impressed with this place.  Its a family run Japanese spot that has a ton of character.  The wait staff was nice and you could really tell the chef's put care into making the food.  Its no surprise that this place gets packed the moment dinner starts and throughout the evening. My good buddy and I shared everything so we could try as much food as possible.  First off, the gyoza was off the hook.  Biting into these pouches of goodness, the meat and the juices tantalized my taste buds.  The specialty sushi rolls were OFF THE CHAIN and well-priced!  We got the Bamboo roll (eel, cucumber wrapped in avocado) and the Spicy Tuna roll (chopped tuna, jalapeno sauce) which were damn good. But what stole the show to the whole meal was the next two rolls:  Tatsuo Dragon Roll (two pieces of shrimp tempura, Japanese mayo, cucumber wrapped in eel and avocado) and the Crunch Roll (spicy crab, avocado, cucumber, topped with tempura crumbs and jalapeno sauce).  The shrimp tempura in the Dragon Roll was nothing like I ever had before.  It was crispy, yet succulent, almost like it was grilled first and then lightly fried.  Combined with the mayo and the avocado, you definitely have a WINNER!.  One bite into the Crunch Roll and my mouth was like Missy Elliot singing "Sushi (music) makes you lose control."  My body wanted to dance out of pure enjoyment as the spicy crab and jalapeno sauce really gives it a kick.  This is definitely another WINNER! Even with a lot of reviews on yelp, I still would categorize this place as a hidden gem.  I'll definitely be back =)
I sat at the sushi bar and marveled at how quickly the sushi chefs cut, chop, slice, and dice. Wow! Didn't like how you had to walk through the kitchen to get to the bathroom, and the state of the bathroom was less than desirable. Also less than desirable was the quality of the spicy tuna roll -- it was so mealy that it was pretty near inedible. Fortunately, the rest of the sushi was much better.
Love love love Yuki Sushi! Wonderfully fresh sushi and quick service.  Great neighborhood find that I would recommend to anyone.
My all time favorite sushi place! Best chicken teryiaki and best sashimi around! You must try the escolar sashimi! It's buttery and similar to hamachi! Oh, don't forget to order the mushroom tempura appetizer. It's VERY rare to find a Japanese restaurant that does tempura perfect, rolls tasty without too much rice or weird nuts and fruit in them, and also has juicy thick chicken teriyaki! 10 stars goes to Yuki! By far, the best sashimi, tempura (perfectly done) chicken and steak teriyaki and of course, very well priced!
Meh.  I decided to try Yuki after seeing them for a couple of years in the 'Best in the Bay' magazine.  Overall, it was fine.  Not the best I've ever had, but not the worst either. Sashimi was good, but didn't taste super fresh.  It was about $10 for 10 pieces of saba.  Prices were reasonable. Service was somewhat slow, but they were packed on a Wednesday night. I don't know why they were selected for best in the bay.  I guess I expected more.  I'll stick to my other sushi places.
In my opinion, the perfect chirashi would contain the following ingredients: *multiple slices of sake, hamachi, saba, hotate, maguro, unagi, amaebi, tamago, white tuna *ikura (salmon roe) *slices of sweeten braised shiitake mushroom *pickled radish or daikon *seaweed salad (optional) This restaurant's chirashi had the following pros and cons, relative to my notion of the perfect chirashi: Pros: Very fresh fish, had multiple cuts of maguro and a very tasty tamago.  Substituted tako with seared white tuna.  Had smoked salmon instead of sake, pickled vegetables.  The rice was a little sweeter than usual, which was actually nice.  Lots of food for a surprisingly low price ($14.95) Cons: No unagi, hotate, ikura, saba, seaweed salad, marinated daikon
Update: It's 2008 and I still go here for my Chirashi bowl.  And you know what, it's still the same... (Which is great) Why?  Consistency and the same Sushi Chefs. The waitresses pretty much know what I order when I sit down...hmmm  maybe time to change things up to throw them a curve ball.  =)    I still retain my 5 star rating. My rating is just for the sushi, not for the cooked food although I have tried a few of their cooked items.  Whenever I go here, I always order the Chirashi bowl which is a mixture of sushi on top of seasoned rice. It is one of the best that I have found in the south bay area. (Maguro, Hamachi, Sake, Tako, Ebi, Tai, Tamago, Kampyo, Shitake)  In addition to the Chirashi, you will get soba, miso soup and a salad. The price is also right too, very affordable for the quality and amount of sushi that you get. The agedashi tofu is also a good starter, one of the few other items that I have tried.
I like to think I have a really HIGH standard for Japanese.  I think we have really great Japanese restaurants in Hawaii so it was tough for me to find one that I really liked in California.  This is definitely one of them.  It's close to Santa Clara University which made it super convenient during school.  I love eating the chicken mizutake and my friend enjoys the sukiyaki.  The sushi is pretty good too.  And best of all, the people are really nice (if you speak Thai, the waiters are Thai and you can get in.  I don't speak Thai but my friend does so I usually bring him a long when I go.  Thanks Ray!). And they have my Sapporo beer.   YES. This place is always crowded and sometimes seating takes awhile.  But it's worth it for me.
Solid. Yuki is definitely in my top three all time favorite sushi spots. The nigiri and sashimi doesn't get any fresher, the prices are right, and my all-star rolls consisted of the spicy tuna, Alaskan, and dragon. Only complaint: Its small, loud and sitting in the 'tamame' area will be guaranteed uncomfortable if you are 5'9" or taller...
Another GREAT find for a Sushi stuffing! Little did I know that I'd be getting sushi 2 times this week and it was only Wednesday... but there we were... looking at YELP recommended eats with my roomie near our current location. "Yuki Sushi has a solid 4 stars and over 500 reviews!"  "Should we Dare?"  "DARE WE SHALL!"  haha It's hidden away in this strip mall I had no idea even existed.  Stuck in the corner and clearly the most happenin place anywhere near it. There were many people out front and several more sitting and standing just inside the door.  The place looked small so we weren't sure we could wait long, but we knew if those people were waiting... they were certain of something that WE were ready to be in on.  ;) We stood outside for less than 5 minutes and they guy came outside to call us inside.  We got a table to my surprise.  Awesome! Water came fast & the Menu sucked me in.  The prices are... CRAZY Cheap!  My roomie "I feel like ordering a TON of sushi just because it's so cheap!"  My reply:  "OK!!!" Rolls ordered: New York - good stuff! Crunchy - Flippin Yummy! Bamboo - GREAT!  and I don't normally like eel! Soft Shell Crab Roll (A little too crabby and I was wishing it had that spicy orange sauce on it too) Spicy Tuna - always a good one and my Roomie's Fave??? - Sashimi Moriawase! 16 pieces of Sashimi (tender & fresh) for like $14!  perfect! I had Octopus for the first time in my life and... other than reminding me of the chewyness of Escargot... I liked it.  I kept saying "I'm eating an octopus"  my roomie:  "I love the pus"  haha Good Sushi = Happy Tummy = Acting SILLY!
CALL FOR RESERVATIONS!!!!! (408) 248-9144 They only take reservations if your party has 5 or more people. Me and the wife went here for an inexpensive Anniversary dinner. She was in the mood for some sushi and she had sent me a list of places she wanted to check out based on folks' Yelp reviews. After reading the reviews and finding that lots of people suggested making reservations I was going to but....uh...huh? Yeah I forgot. So we got there around 7:40pm and were seated at 8:20pm, it was a long wait but we figured it'd be worth it. It was worth the wait, I even found a new favorite food!!!!! Broiled Hamachi Collar!!!! YUM!!!! I saw this stuff being eaten by that chubby man who goes around eating weird food and figure hell I'm chubby too so I'm gonna eat it and I liked it!!!! DAMN I LIKED IT! Service was good especially considering it was just the "Host" guy, 2 waitresses and 2 sushi chefs with a restraint full of people. There's some tables along the wall, tables in the middle, the sushi bar and tables with tatami mats and pillows you can sit on, we sat on the pillows on the mats. Okay so we got seated, were offered drinks, I got a large Sapporo (22oz) and she got a small Asahi(12oz). The beers came in bottles and we were given a couple beer mugs, they brought us waters as well so we were good. We put in our orders and sat around talking about uhhh...stuff I forget what....oh well. So here's what we got and what my thoughts were on our order: Appetizers Broiled Hamachi Kama yaki $ 7.50 - WTF HOW COME I'VE NEVER EATEN THIS BEFORE!!!!! LOVED IT! Good thing I watched chubby man eat it otherwise I would've never ordered it. Thanks chubby man I'd kiss you but uh nah never mind. THANKS! Tempura $ 5.25 - 3 shrimp and 3 veggies, flaky and good. Nothing special but it was well done. Good starter. Nigiri - The fish used was fresh and it looked GOOD! I'd get both again and something new. Maguro $ 3.95 - Nice reddish color, not fishy smelly at all. I'd order this again. Hamachi $ 3.95 - Butter...that's it. Just eat it. It's like BUTTER! Specialty Rolls Spicy Tuna $ 4.75 - This roll had that jalapeno sauce and being that I've never had that sauce it was a pleasant surprise. It didn't overwhelm the roll it added a nice heat and flavor to the roll. I'd get this again. Toshi Roll $ 5.25 - Eh this one kinda disappointed us, but it wasn't gross. Maybe I was still stuck on the Hamachi Collar...mmmm collar. Crunch Roll $ 5.25 - A California roll topped with tempura bits and jalapeno sauce. This was good, but I think they topped it with too much of the sauce. Yeah the sauce is good, but huh? MMmMmM...collar. Overall our dinner was enjoyable, did I mention the Broil Hamachi Collar? I'd eat that with just a bowl of rice, some soy sauce, a squeeze of lemon and that diakon radish stuff....damn it. I want more of it!!!! The only reason that Yuki didn't get 5 stars was because of the wait, other than that I'd recommend eating at this joint....joint...oooh that's gonna happen before we go next time.....mmmm joint and collar!
With it's Shoji Screen windows, sushi bar, and tatami mat seating, Yuki Sushi feels like a restaurant straight from Japan. It tastes like it too, as the kitchen pumps out dish after dish of amazing Japanese cuisine. For sushi, I could go on and on. Each piece has the perfect balance of fish to rice, and just the right amount of kick from the wasabi. For appetizers, the Kara-age Chicken and Gyoza are favorites. The chicken is savory and, with a little lemon, perfectly seasoned. One may believe it can't get any better, but that's before the main course. The Saba Shioyaki and Beef Teriyaki are both outrageous. Also, Yuki's dinner boxes give you a tremendous bang for your buck, with plates loaded with entrees and makimono rolls. You must try this restaurant if you are a Japanese food enthusiast. It may just be one of the best in the Bay Area.
This is the place that started it all.  My sushi addiction.  Before Yuki I have never eaten raw fish and had innocent unspoiled taste buds.  I was ignorant and I was happy.  This was years and years ago.   After their spicy tuna rolls, all things changed, and to make a long story short. - I now need to have sushi budget to keep my addiction under control. This is a very good sushi place, however, the wait can be annoying because if their small size.
Was treated to a birthday dinner last night... the GF's pick, as this is one of her top Japanese/sushi places. Small, cozy atmosphere with 3 sushi chefs behind the counter and 3 ladies serving as waitstaff. Pretty busy too, as we waited about 30-40 minutes just for a table of 2. We ordered the sashimi appetizer (50/50 split between maguro and hamachi), mizutaki and the Toshi and Crunch rolls. We must have come on an off night, because the sashimi was a little disappointing. The maguro was decent and pretty tender but the hamachi was disappointing and decidedly not fresh at all. The mizutaki was interesting - chicken, tofu  with lettuce, a few carrot slices and a few slices of shiitake over what tasted like mung bean vermicelli in a clear, light broth. The broth is definitely an acquired taste - just a hint of chicken stock, which I found to be very cleansing, but to most it would probably register as bland. The rolls were pretty good, with Toshi beating the Crunch in my book - I like fried things, but the maguro/hamachi/sake combo wins out over the spicy krab. Overall, not a bad experience overall, though rather disappointing from a sashimi standpoint. Given that the GF really likes this place, I'm sure I'll be back to give it another try.
I have been here a number of times. It is always good. The line can be a little long sometimes, but thats because this place is small, and has good food. Pros: - Good food - I usually get one of the sushi platters, though the a la carte sushi is good too - Doesn't break the bank - Japanese style seating available - Friendly service Cons: The wait - It's not the line to get a brand new apple product, but it's not exactly the line to get a zune either. Bottom Line: If you want good sushi and don't mind waiting this is your goto place in Santa Clara.
Freshest, best sushi we've enjoyed for years.  Do call for a reservation (I think only M-Th for reservations, unless you have a large party) or be ready for a worthwhile wait.  You will always be warmly greeted on arrival and thanked at your departure. Favorites:  Maguro & Saba sashimi; Saba shio; Toro when it's available;  "Doug" roll; Yosenabe in the Winter months; Karatamba Sake (cold) and Orion beer.  The Tonkatsu/Beef stew combo is one of the most filling meals I've ever had and prepared just like "Mom used to make . . ."  We love Ika-natto and the Sushi Master makes it perfectly with fresh Ika and bits of sliced scallions . . . Yum! You can sit in regular tables, at the sushi bar or in the Tatami area; must remove shoes to sit in the Tatami area.  The dining area is frequently and quickly re-configured to suit the clientele, going from small two-person tables to space for 6-8 or more in a jiffy! If you're tired of sushi restaurants that serve more rice than fish, you've found the right place!  If you leave hungry, you need to order more!  It's all good and you will want to go back!
Unsure why this place has such great reviews. It was our first time here, and I don't think we're coming back. We were sitting next to a family who had been coming here for 8 years, and they said the food's good but the service can be better. But tonight, they complained that their food portion was cut by 2/3, dessert was stale, and it was a bad experience (perhaps because one of the chefs was out on leave). I got "Tony's Special", which was described as deep fried tofu on a bed of sauteed vegetables in miso sauce. I have to say it was VERY bland. I had to ask for the Togarashi spice powder to add some flavor to the dish. The bed of vegetables was a whole plate full of napa cabbage, with a couple of carrots, bamboo shoots and mushrooms. Fail. My husband's sushi selection was not great either. I'd suggest taking your hungry stomach someplace else where it'll be adequately satisfied!
LOVE this place! Great inexpensive CA roll, Fresh Salmon nigiri (the best!). Love the Teriyaki with white rice bowl. The food is always fresh and the staff are always so nice and attentive. hands down the only sushi place i go to in san jose/bay area.  And I hear they are opening a new location in willow glen! yay!
Fresh sushi with reasonable price.  Hamachi, saki, are $3.95, and the fish are a little bit thicker than usual sushi restaurant.  I tried couple times their toro, but didn't get impressed.  Uni and Ameabi are also worth the price.  My son like the fried chicken and also oyako don. It's quite easy to get packed and need to wait, be prepared.  I usually will go there by 5pm so I don't need to wait.
Pretty solid sushi. C0mbination rolls are a bit heavy on tempura, which doesn't interest me at all. PerhapT they could come up with some new rolls.  Most of the noodles soups are good, save one that is way too bland. The sukiyaki is yummy! Wish they would serve shiro maguro (albabcore) nigiri that wasn't seared. the searing ruins it for me... But all in all, a great local sushi place--decent atmosphere and reasonable prices.
This sushi joint is kind of like Cheers, where everyone knows your name. Even if you have only been here a couple of times, they all remember you and often remember what you like to order. Depending on my mood (and the weather) I will order either, sushi, or udon, or a bento box. I absolutely love their teriyaki salmon bento boxes and their teriyaki is always nice and sticky, just how I like it. When the weather is cold I love to order their tempura udon. They do not skimp on the tempura and I always have a difficult time finishing it. Their sushi is always fresh, and cold when it supposed to be and hot when it supposed to be. There are no gimmicks to this restaurant, just good honest sushi. It's a small place, so be prepared to wait when you come during the lunch or the dinner time rush.
Came here with a couple of friends on a friday night and had a great time. Warning they only take reservations for parties of 5 or larger on fri-sat so if you have a smaller group, plan on signing up on the list hanging on the door and be prepared to wait. Luckily my friends got there before me and I didn't have to wait :) First off, I like that the large bottles of beer wasn't too pricey (about $5.50 for a large), they had the usual- asahi, sopporo, kirin, etc. but they also had one unique one- orion, that I've never heard off before. For dinner I think the combos are a great value for your money. I think they were $15.50 and my two friends got the sashimi combo which comes with a plate of sashimi (2 of 6 types if i remember correctly) and they said it tasted fresh and good. They also got a meat item with it, soup and salad. Both meat items were said to be good and the generous portions given were much appreciated by my friends. My other friend and I tried different types of sushi and here's my take on it: Appetizers: - Hamachi Kama Yaki- Ok, not bad, fish was very soft but in terms of taste it could have probably used a little more flavor, it was kind of on the bland side. - Albacore Tataki- pretty tasty, I liked how it was seared albacore with the onions on top. It could have used more of the ponzu sauce, I kept trying to swish the fish in the sauce since the sauce was so tasty but there wasn't much of it Rolls: - Spicy Tuna Roll- a little on the small side but tasty - Dragon roll- very yummy it was one of my favorites - Crunch roll- my other favorite, i love the large chunks of avocado - Jackie roll- my least favorite, but I think it was just because I didn't like the texture of the scallops Overall I enjoyed the food, the ambiance was nice, waitress were helpful and it seemed like everyone around us was having a good time. Next time around I think I will try the toro, I didn't see it on the chef's specials blackboard until the end of my meal.
The food is more authentic and the sushi is better in quality than the wait staff here. If you come here, I really hope you don't get the Thai waitress because even I know the menu better than she does. I don't know who she's kidding because I swear she tries to pretend she's Japanese (she's not!!) and use that as an excuse for not knowing anything about the menu, including the names of the dishes. Besides her, the staff is pretty friendly. They give you a good deal for the sashimi and combo plates, and they have huge lines to prove it (reservations recommended but available only for parties 6+). The sashimi is super fresh and the food is consistent. If you're in the mood for some giant rolls topped with 10 sauces, head over to Joy Sushi in San Mateo. Otherwise, come over to Yuki for some good quality Japanese food.
I had dinner here with my girl Sue Ann and her hubby. We wanted sushi, and it was Sunday night, so our options were a little more limited than usual. My friend's husband, (Jonas thank you!!!) had told me about this place. So, since it was open, I had heard good things, and it was pretty close, we decided to check it out. I was kind of shocked that there was a line out the door on a Sunday night. Although, some people waiting told me it's always like that, and that the food is great. I was hoping they were right! Luckily for us, they were! I had the sashimi moriawase, and a small roll, and was very pleased with both. The fish seemed fresh, and was very tasty. I couldn't believe how reasonable the price of the sashimi was! Compared to other places, this is a great deal! (Around $10 less than most sushi joints.) The seating was a bit cramped, and since we were near the door, it was a little chilly. I think next time, (and there will be a next time!) I'll call ahead and make a reservation, (specifically away from the door!) At least while it's so frigid outside!
This is a very solid sushi place.  It was one of the few times at a sushi place when I considered getting things other than sushi, simply because the menu looked really good. But I bowed did the routine and got the rainbow roll and some other roll with a bunch of fresh fish.  If this place should be known for on thing, its their fresh fish.  HUGE cuts, not those super thin ones, on top of my rainbow roll.  Simple sushi without all the crazy sauces and combinations.  Plus it was super cheat for lunch, two people ended up paying about $30, including tax and tip.
Mmm mmm mmm! I can't believe that I have never found this little gem of a place after going to Santa Clara University for four years! I came here first with some coworkers and have been here time after time for lunch and dinner. This place is an awesome location for cheap, fresh rolls, sashimi as well as curry dinner. They have amazing tasting curry! I recommend this place for a smaller group dinner, no more than say ... 6 people because this place is not for accommodating large groups but their food is, as another reviewer said, solid! They have great service and they're fast as well. Recommended local sushi joint :) The only downside is that they don't have a huge variety and their rolls in terms of descriptions are a hit or miss (you never REALLY know what you're getting) but they always taste delicious!
Service?  Friendly and fast but not quick to give diners the bill. Food?  Excellent!!  I had the bento box.. beef teriyaki and chicken teriyaki was so tasty.. I finished the whole thing!!!  I liked the salad dressing.. the soba noodles that came w/ it was also yummy.  I basically cleared the bento box.  If I could eat the box, I probably would have. Price?  Very reasonable.. my bento box was $7.95. This place gets noisy b/c it gets packed.  People coming in and out constantly.  They are open 4 days of the week: Tues-Friday.  I'm sure they make enough so they wouldn't have to open everyday.. this place is awesome!
I've only been here for lunch and mostly have gotten the bento. The amount of food has always been quite enough to satisfy my craving for Japanese food, and leaves me pretty satisfied. The ambiance of the small place gives you a sense of intimacy with it despite the how cramped it can get... especially during lunch hours and the people that come to eat here. Good food and worth the price you pay.
The wait was fairly short, approximately 10 minutes.  We were escorted to the backroom, which receives equivalent amount of service as the patrons in the front room.  Water and tea is filled often and the servers were reasonably attentive. I shared the chicken teriyaki and hamachi sashimi with one other person.  Table's are a bit too close for comfort but nothing they can do about that, it's just how much real-estate they have.  The chicken prepared nicely and the hamachi was fresh.  Pricing was not bad for the portions given. Overall, my experience here was pretty good.  I'll definitely come back.
We've been to better places but this was the closest Japanese restaurant where we were at the time.  After a couple of hours doing laundry, had a craving for some tempura and sushi.  Quick GPS check turned up Yuki Sushi so we headed there. Too bad we got there right at the height of dinner time; every seat in the house was taken so we had to wait about 10-15 mins for a table.  Got taken to the back area which was sort of hidden past the kitchen. Tempura and sushi weren't too bad but not great either.  Would've put it at four stars had our server tended to us more than she did the other four tables around us.  Probably won't head here the next time we're in SJ.
Just went here with Tetsu N. for lunch.  Thanks Tetsu for searching out a new place for us to try!  I pass this place every time I go to the mall after work, so I was glad to finally get the opportunity to try it out.  We arrived there just before 12 and were thankfully seated right away.  Others who arrived later were not so lucky.  Tetsu took a gander at the fish selection and based on appearance of freshness we decided on hotate (scallops) and tamago (egg), coincidentally two of my favorites.  We also decided to try the katsu-don.  Both of the onigiri were good.  I thought the hotate was really good, but the tamago was okay.  Too much soy sauce in the egg for me, but the texture was good and I'm a sucker to tamago onigiri so it's never bad. Tetsu also ordered a couple rolls.  I was too full to eat much, but the sample of the negi-hama roll that I tried did not leave me impressed.  The rice on that roll seemed almost a little crunchy. The katsu don in my opinion was awesome.  Just the right amount of juiciness and a good balance of egg and meat with a hit of seaweed on top.  Delicious! I will definitely go here again as I'd like to try some of the other dishes and we were able to get in and out pretty quickly.
This is one of my favorite Japanese restaurants ever. The sashimi is always super fresh (hamachi melts like butter, and saba is extremely flavorful). The rolls are always jam packed with tasty ingredients. The nabayaki udon is one of my favorites to get here - nice, hearty broth loaded with chicken, veggies, and tempura. The noodles are PERFECT. If you want to stuff yourself, eat the entire pot by yourself. The chirashi is also awesome. Small restaurant, so seating is limited during normal lunch/dinner hours, so be prepared to wait. Prices are very reasonable, although they have recently gone up.
Nice warm evening, three different couples were about to walk away due to the wait. I told them about the place, they stayed and I think they liked it. Upgrading this to five stars, but not sure why I only had them at four stars (I thought I gave YS five! sorry). Great assortment of sushi, Tonys Special (agedashi tofu on healthy bed o' veggies), Salmon Miso... all delicious and all "for a song." Great service as usual, the wait wasn't really that long. I do wish there was some way they could get the landlord to add outdoor dining though!!
To me this is "comfort food." I'm wondering why I haven't reviewed them before. Dinner Review: 4... Read more 
Delicious Japanese food, great ambiance, friendly staff - and on top of it, not too expensive! My boyfriend and I were seated right away, and we were seated in the back of the restaurant (apparently the restaurant extends beyond the kitchen). The inside was very typical Japanese restaurant, with lots of little tables and a sushi bar, but in the back, there was also a flat screen TV to watch basketball. Sweet. Service was prompt and friendly, which was apparent even though we were seated in the back, where customers are usually forgotten at other restaurants. We were given a starter of cold soba noodles. It was only a bite, but it was free, and delicious, and whetted our appetite for what was coming. I ordered the vegetable croquette dinner, which came with five large pieces of potato/corn croquette, perfectly breaded and deep fried, so the insides were hot and fluffy, the outside crispy. Came with miso soup, salad, and rice. My boyfriend ordered the sashimi plate (the moriawase), which came with mackerel (kind of fishy), octopus (just ok), hamachi (super creamy and delicious), tuna (fell apart, my boyfriend said it was wonderful), and some other kind of fish. We also ordered the beef tataki, which is rare beef, and it was sliced thinly and arranged into flower shapes. This was SO good, I couldn't stop eating it. Something cool about this place - the waitresses would take shots with the patrons. Awesome! This will be joining the regular rotation of nights out.
Small place, and crowded on a Friday night, but damned good sashimi. YEAH IT'S GOOD! I am usually pretty reserved when it comes to reviewing Japanese places because most of the places are just "ok" and maybe some are "kinda good" but this place is actually good. I had the chirashi, which wasn't terribly huge, and it didn't have a huge selection of fish on it, but it had the basics and they were good. The sashimi was fresh and just fell apart in my mouth. Yeah, that good. They even put a neat little slice of toro in there for kicks, which was really nice. We shared the moriawase, a varied sashimi plate. Oh man, that was tasty and certainly a good choice. The Mister decided on the tonkatsu and it was...... ok. Yeah, the tonkatsu was super disappointing, but it almost didn't matter because we ended up eating all the sashimi and taking the tonkatsu home to cook up in some other leftovers lunch remix. Oh, and I was disappointed in their sake selection, but let's face it, I wasn't there to drink sake anyway (I can do that at an izakaya). They have basic selections, but nothing that I would want to spend money on at a restaurant.
Maybe, I've just been getting more and more picky about sushi but this place did not impress me enough to give it 5 stars. My buddies made this place sound like the best of the best but I guess we just have different taste! LOL I will give them credit where credit is due! The beef tataki gets pretty high reviews from me. The beef literally melts in your mouth and its so tasty! The infusions of all of the ingredients from the side sauce are unbelievable. I would come back to Yuki for this plate! Also, the moriawase is pretty fresh. I would say decent fish. Just a heads up. The line is always long and they have a cute sign up sheet however, sometimes it takes a while to get seated and you don't want to get seated in the back room near the kitchen. Just a bit too noisy for my taste. I would give Yuki another try next time I'm in the south bay!
Been getting my sushi fix at Yuki for 5 years and counting. FOOD: The sashimi is always fresh -- never that mealy, old-and-busted texture or non-flavor kind that you get at McSushi places.  Just clean, quality. They always start you off with a (free) small bowl of buckwheat soba in a light sauce, sprinkled with green onions, and a just-right dollop of wasabi.  Rolls are good, and I'm glad they don't clutter the menu with too much of the deep-fried or drowning-in-mayo rolls.  We always get a rainbow and kampyo, then change up the rest. SERVICE: Friendly, prompt, no-nonsense. They recognize their regulars, which gives it a very mom 'n pop atmosphere.  Every once in a while, there's a birthday or rowdy bunch, but they don't mind -- in fact, we saw a waiter sharing a sake bomb with one table, seemed like they were old friends.  Generally prompt, even when busy. PRICE: Reasonable, especially for the quality. Consistent? Absolutely. You know what to expect, and they deliver.  The only thing I would change...  move up to the Peninsula, please!  We need a great sushi place that isn't overpriced.  Please?
prime example of how yelp can be so wrong 600 some reviews what??  "japanese" targeted for non japanese.  tried chirashi, kara age, grilled salmon.  soba appetizer -- flavor off, made long ago; you can get better heating your own packaged soba noodles, chopping onion into the sauce from the store bottles and adding wasabi. chirashi rice had no flavor, shiso limp, miniscule vinegar -- more like plain rice, fish was mushy, tamago flavorless, they couldn't even give you regular salmon, it had to be smoked.  prices are cheaper for some nigiri, no specials, avoid if you know what ankimo is since it won't be your kind of place.
Don't tell anyone but I actually came to this place twice this week. Crazy huh? I never thought I'd go to the same place twice in a week. I'm amazed by how good the food is here. I ordered the Beef Stew Curry w/ Tonkatsu. It hass the perfect amount of spice & is a huge portioned dish for the hungry. I also tried their Sukiyaki, decent but not the greatest. Sushi looks pretty average here but I haven't tried any. I like the buckwheat soba noodles they give you as a tiny appetizer, delicious. Just mix up the wasabi into the shoyu-based sauce, and voila, you're set to eat. Their miso soup is good. I love their salad because they use the good kind of dressing. I forgot what it was but it was better than the typical ones they serve at other Japanese places. The inside of this establishment is achingly small, so it gets packed fast. I've also seen a lot of people order for pick-up, so maybe i'll do that sometime soon when I'm itching for some good nihonjin food. Recommended for sure. This ain't no laughing matter. Serious eaters only.
Really just so-so fish, small rolls, stupid long waits, and no room to breathe let alone eat. The head waitress was helpful and polite, but the waitress we were stuck with sucked.  We had a party of 8 and I'm sure with the mandatory 18% gratuity she was in cruise control, which always pisses me off.  I know I *have* to give you whatever percent the menu says, but at least pretend you're a waitress.  I was flagging down others to help us all night.  Not surprisingly she was quickest once the plastic came out.  Yuck. The roll menu was unimaginative and plain.  I wasn't thrilled with the selection and the rolls seemed hastily made and were less appealing to the eye than to the taste buds, which I didn't think possible. This place must have Koo-aid in the beer because it wasn't 4 stars.  No part of it.  Even three is being generous.  TGI Sushi in Campbell still is, and always will be, FTW.
I think this spot is pretty badass in that the place is ran by family.  I have a sweet spot for family-owned spots.  Very homely.  I went here to pick up a snacky snack, which turned out to be a hefty one, this afternoon.  I got the crunch roll and tuna spicy tuna roll.  The description for the crunch roll was spicy crab.  And of course, I LOVE spicy.  I eat something spicy everyday..  Turns out it was JUST a california roll topped with this jalapeno spicy mayo also with those tempura bits.  I looked at it, disappointed in the size and the lacking of some sort of red sauce lathered and marinated in the crab.  It's good, but......  iono. The spicy tuna hand roll was lacking some kick... so for the first time I added the ginger.  I generally don't like the ginger... but I thought maybe if I tried it again I would.  And it added a little kick to the hand roll.  But examining the tuna on my very last bite, (I have a thing for looking at my last bite to see if I really want to stuff it down my throat), and I noticed the tuna was a pale pink... fresh tuna = dark pink/red.  For a hand roll, since the emphasis is on the fishy fish.......  yea, it should be pretty fresh. I also ate here a couple of times, the bento thing.  And it was pretty good.  the ponzu sauce was pretty damn nice.
I've eaten here several times and have never been disappointed. Last time I ate there was on a Sunday night with a couple friends at the bar. The nigiri portions where _huge_ and delicious, the freshest I've had in awhile. The chefs also add just the right touch of wasabi under the fish, and prepare everything with relentless precision. The udon noodles to start with are tasty, and the service is friendly and attentive. I cannot say much more about this place other than whenever I'm in the area and want sushi, Yuki is my first choice. Be sure to call ahead or prepare for a wait before sitting during dinner hours. This spot is busy and for good reason. It's an excellent place nestled in a a quiet strip center. You will not leave disappointed.
This sushi restaurant is rather unassuming and ordinary.  While the quality of the fish is great and perfect for those who are looking for the typical Japanese sushi joint ... in fact, they do what they do quite well, I might add ... but this place just doesn't cut it for a sushi snob like me.  I was looking forward to find a greater variety of fresh, uncommon sushi flavors ... but the best they could come up with was kampachi ... which is better than some other sushi joints. The decor is cute, service is great ... I just wish they had more exotic stuff like mirigai, japanese mackeral, sea bream, butterflish, monkfish liver, etc.  The chirashi is a good portion and they're more than willing to customize to suit the customer. If you don't care for exotic fish and prefer a nice roll or slice of maguro - then this joint is 5-stars for you!!
I just got back from dinner at Yuki Sushi after reading all the positive reviews only to be met with less than mediocre service and subpar sushi. Here's why: Service Could have been faster. I had to call our waitress over to our table each time we needed something (missing soy sauce, our bill that never came after we were obviously done, etc) Ambiance: Small restaurant with somewhat outdated decor. Food: We had miso soups, which were OK. I had the Toshi roll, which was not that impressive. My boyfriend ordered the Nigiri combo, and I had to watch him painfully chew the giant, unlovingly cut pieces of stale fish. My first attempt at making home made sushi tasted better than their selection. I now feel slightly bloated and dirty from dinner- I brushed my teeth to attempt to get rid of the taste. "At least the beer was cold" my boyfriend concluded! P.S. Yuki Sushi is indeed yucky.
LOVE this place.  My fave is their jalapeno sauce- I have yet to find anything like it, and I tend to eat at a lot of different sushi places. It can definitely get busy, but it's worth the wait.  I always get the Crunch Roll and order extra jalapeno sauce on the side.  It goes so well with the rolls! For dessert, they have mochi- I don't remember much about it, but it was pretty good that I usually opt to order it when I eat here. If there's something I want to say about this place, it's to EAT HERE!  Especially if you're a fan of sushi and spicy sauce!
I had always passed this place on my way to Valley Fair and never gone! So on a Monday night, the BF and I decided to try it out. Sat at the bar. Waitresses were friendly. Gave us tea and started us off with some cold noodles. The fish was very fresh! Loved the tuna. Didn't try the salmon however since it wasn't included in our sashimi sampler. Prices are moderate, especially for the quality of the fish. I usually stick with Sushi Zen in downtown SJ but this place is high on my list.
Note: I am a vegetarian and thus my review will mostly only contain reviews on vegetarian items, however, I may add opinions of friends who do eat sushi and sashimi. Yuki Sushi has a nice ambiance and it's kinda hard to notice... when driving by,... it's right at the intersection of Winchester and Pruneridge and I have driven by all the times on my way to the mall but I never knew it existed..... Anyhoo, moving on to the more relevant details... At lunch time, you get some nice soba noodles while you're looking through the menu and deciding what to order... Unlike other sushi places I've been to, I noticed that Yuki Sushi has more variety for vegetarian sushis, like raddish, yam etc.... Two of my friends ordered the salmon sashimi and specialty rolls.... they both were raving about how fresh and delicious the fish tasted.... I also ordered miso soup which was pretty must standard...miso soup, tofu and scallions..... This lunch however, I ended with some nice green tea ice cream :) I really wanna go back there soon and try out their other vegetarian items...
Strong four star average that I unfortunately don't get.  Glad we tried it for variety in our lineup but nothing stands out about this small place other than the crowd waiting to get in!  (Fortunately we arrived just after the first seatings were leaving and grabbed a table without waiting at 6:30... Otherwise would've been even more disappointed!) We started off with fried chicken wings, lightly breaded and crispy to tease the appetite. We then shared the sashimi mariwase? 15 pieces of small to moderate sashimi.  Unfortunately not too fresh - we were even there early on a Saturday night. (I hate to think how bad the Monday night fish would be!) Spicy tuna roll was spicy but not really flavorful. Spider roll was mediocre and soggy - I don't know about you but IMO soft shell crab should be crunchy!  My husband also had the ama ebi which he deemed as nothing special. The highlight of the meal?  2 big scoops of delicious red bean ice cream for $1.75. Guess you can't go wrong with some processed foods! Conclusion?  Much better sushi options in the area for the same price.
I LOVE THIS PLACE!!! the style of sushi is NOT like most restaurants where they give you a monstrous, deep fried roll with a million different sauces on it. the rolls are of manageable size so that you dont look ridiculously messy when you eat them, and priced so that you can try several different kinds. the nigiri (raw fish on top of rice) is SO GOOD, so fresh, and so well prepared that it doesn't need soy sauce.   i think that's a pretty good measure of a sushi place.    plus the cuts of fish are really generous. definitely try the Sake Fresh (fresh salmon) and Hamachi (YellowTail) if you like sushi/sashimi over rolls, and always try any daily specials.  they're usually worth it. also, you can ask the waitresses (who are very friendly if you chat with them) to suggest things for you, or even order everything for you.  they've been there for years and know the menu (and off-menu items!) like the back of their hand.  i think that's a pretty good measure of service. great restaurant....be prepared to wait in line!
I used to frequent this place about 5 years ago, but because the wait was always long I stopped going.  But I went again recently, and wonder why it took so long for me to come back.  Knowing that there was most likely a long wait, I called ahead of time, and was able to reserve a table for 4.  We got seated as soon as we got there, even though only 3 of us were there. We ordered the croquettes for appetizers and they were very good.  Not greasy as other places, but the size was pretty small.  I ordered the chirashi.  The raw fish here is definitely fresh, and the sashimi slices are generous. The service here is very attentive.  I'll definitely be back again soon, and it will be within 5 years!  At this visit, it wasn't as busy as I remember it to be, but then again I noticed that a lot of people who appeared to be regulars (they were conversing with the staff about their family/wives/school) had ordered takeout.
We live really close to here and are big fans! The fish is always super fresh, the service is great (especially considering how crowded they are). No complaints here! We prefer take out because it's usually crowded with a wait. :)
To summarize:  Snobbish attitude, lazy servers, unnecessary long line up  and average food quality. I used to be a regular to this place for the past few years. However, their service has gone worse in the last few months. To be fair, this review is written after re-visiting this place two more times in the past two weeks. Unnecessary long line up: Two weeks ago, me and my family (party of 4) came with a reservation made. All 4 of us came right on time , but we still had to wait for 30minutes before we were seated. We checked in with them saying we had a reservation and had been waiting for 30 minutes already and the guy (probably the owner or the owner's son)  just give us an attitude saying " yeah yeah yeah". The waitresses and the waiter made us wait even though there were empty tables. After customers left the tables, the servers did not bother to clean up the tables. They just talked to other people and made us wait. There were at least 5 servers in this small restaurant and still no one bother to clean up the tables or to seat the customers who are waiting. Last week, we came again, this time without making reservation.  We ended up waited for 40 minutes , NOT BECAUSE OF LONG LINE UP. It's just because they did not clean up the tables after customers left . Even after tables were cleaned up, they still took their time joking with other people and made us wait. Lazy servers: I have observed in details that the servers were very lazy in clean up tables after customers left. They'd rather walk around, joke with other customers,  or talked to the owner instead of seating other people. Snobbish attitude: The impression I got from the servers was that they wouldn't care if I'd come back or not because they think their place is so popular that they'll have endless stream of customers. They would not greet you, they made you wait for half an hour even if there is empty tables. When inquired about the empty tables, they'd give you an attitude and tell you that they will call you when it's available. Average food quality: The sashimi is of ok freshness. Portion is ok. But the beef teriyaki was too dry and harsh.I wouldn't say their food is bad but I have had much better quality sashimi and beef teriyaki at the price they charge.
Thank god the San Jose/Santa Clara yelpers got this one right.  I was looking for a low key sushi restaurant with a wide selection of rolls at reasonable prices, and boy this is the place! It was so good we went back for dinner the next night! The first trip we sat at the bar rather than wait for a table.  I was mesmerized by the craftsmen making the sushi rolls.  I could watch that all night (provided I wasn't starving). I can't recommend this place highly enough.  If I'm ever back in San Jose, I'll surely make the drive to Yuki Sushi.
This place is solid.  I've tried their tempura udon.  I've had a bite or two of their katsu curry.  I've had their sushi dinner.  Tonight I ordered the sukiyaki.  Everything's been delicious and plentiful.  In fact, I was only able to finish about half of my sukiyaki, and I'm absolutely stuffed.  I would highly recommend their sushi though; their fish is very fresh, and the nigiri is made with generous slices of fish without overdoing it on the sushi rice. It's pretty popular amongst the locals; for a Tuesday night, I got there around 6:55pm and I still had to wait about 15 minutes to get me and my friend seated.  It's a great spot for Japanese food though, and the service is friendly.
I am lovin' this place because I ordered albacore tataki and got the best dish of my life here. Big fat glorious steaks of albacore, not measly little fajita strips of it. STEAKS people. This is the good stuff, the real stuff, the tasty stuff. I also ordered the negitoro that never came, boo. The other sushi items came as promised, and all around loved it. The tatami tables are roomy enough for your whole party, and you won't feel pinched for space. Please get there early because the lines are insane! You know when there are chairs set up outside that it's not for table free dining, yo. It's for the wait, genius.
Some of my friends get their sushi fix here.  But, considering the 20-minute wait on a Friday evening during peak dining hours, the outcome after the wait was a little disappointing. The nigiri and sushi roll portions were not satisfying.  The unagi on the unagi nigiri I ordered was thin and barely covered the rice beneath it end-to-end.  The spicy scallop roll didn't have enough scallop.  The best order I had was the tempura roll...which really does not say much.  One thing I was impressed about was the tonkatsu meal that my friend ordered.  There were two servings of pork tonkatsu in the order.  That was a little more than I expected, on an ordinary tonkatsu order. Overall, the service was fine.  Since it is a busy Friday evening and the place is small, I wasn't expecting a hovering server throughout the meal. If you're planning to be there on a busy evening, try to make a reservation ahead of time, because the wait for a large group may take some time.  Alternatively, you could also opt for take-out instead of waiting for the table.
I had gone to Yuki back in 2005, but honestly don't remember much other than it was "pretty good".  I decided to give it a try again this past week and boy was I impressed.  My usual bay area sushi stomping ground is Sushi o' Sushi but a girl needs more than one sushi restaurant in her repertoire. Make sure you are not in a rush with this restaurant. The restaurant is rather small and we had to wait awhile for a table to come available.  But trust me its worth the wait! We ordered a bunch of rolls and some pieces of sushi.  Everything came fairly fast.  I do have to say that the fish is fresh!  You won't be disappointed. Another point I thought I'd make is that we were at Yuki finishing up our meal with then 5.6 earthquake hit on 10/30/07.  The entire restaurant got to be very quiet while everything shook and then after it was over everyone cheered! I'll definitely be back here again!
I need to find an equivalent in the city. This place is just sooooo good. Tried a bunch of sushi there, the Uni Nigiri was probably the best I've ever  had that came with generous amount of super fresh and sweet uni (sea urchin). The most noticable thing is that they season their sushi rice properly so it is nice itself, while being a nice accompaniment to the fish. The tempura udon is just the best thing to have on a cold day, sad day, or a cozy day. There's so much veggies, and other stuff in the bowl unlike a few leaves swimming in the soup in the city. The tempura that comes with the noodle is awesome, generous amount, crispy yet not too greasy coating. Be prepared for a wait. Bring cash.
Heard the rave reviews about this place so I had to try this place. It's not hidden, it's just in a random plaza. I always drive by that plaza too on my way to Valley Fair. I never noticed the place, it's across the street from a Walgreens and 7-11. I had reservations at 8:30pm, but came at 8:40pm. I told her we had a reservation, but she replied rudely, that we were late. I understand, but dang, can you be more polite?! Still had to wait about fifteen minutes to be seated. The Kaki Fry (I called it Fried Cack) was okay. Yakitori and Gyoza were pretty good. The crunch roll and spicy tuna were pretty good, that jalapeno sauce was damn good. Rolls were pretty cheap. Service was okay. It was a decent sushi place, I wouldn't come back though.
Agedashi tofu win! Crunch roll  with awesome jalapeno sauce on top. Main course: Combination with gyoza and chicken katsu. Kind of on the pricey side, but a nice treat when you're near Valley Fair.
Any place that could be mistakenly called YUCKI has to be good, ne? In six years I've never been disappointed by this place, but rarely eat inside because of the potentially long waits.  I live close by, so order/pickup is a better alternative than waiting with the other sushi fiends outside. Jackie roll gets my vote for one of the best roll here and their sashimi is always crazy fresh. Update 11/7/07 Ordered one Jackie roll, one Spicy Tuna roll and 10 piece Hamachi sashimi.  The Jackie tasted like some of the seafood at Safeway looks (ok, not that bad, but you get my point) and the Hamachi was just a little less fresh than I could stand.  The Spicy Tuna roll was actually spicy....which also then had me thinking. Update 2/6/08:  I will never eat here again.  Ordered 5 rolls and 10 pieces of Sashimi.  2 of the rolls tasted really bad--as in 'swallow and you will be sick'--and the spider roll was gross.  Additionally, the sake sashimi had a funky texture--as if parts of it were liquefying.  Smelled fine--just had a really odd texture.  This place has really gone downhill.  Not so crowded anymore, though!  I guess everyone else is having similar experiences? -1 Star.  I'll try again soon and see if last night was a fluke.
I've always been averse to fish, let alone raw, so I kind of dragged my heels when it came to joining friends for dinner at Yuki. However, Doug, the owner, was warm and welcoming and took care of us right away.  He was quick with suggestions of things to try for the adventurous and the not-so adventurous. I'm happy to report that his suggestions were perfect and I'm now a fan of sushi (especially the Maguro Nigiri--FRESH & DELICIOUS!)  The place is a bit small but there is now a 2nd location open on Lincoln Ave in Willow Glen.  It is more upscale than the first location but I think I prefer the Santa Clara location. It is smaller, more intimate, and unpretentious as a sushi place should be.  Bathroom was very clean and the lunch menu is as great as the dinner menu. I suggest trying the Bento box lunch and choosing your selections. THUMBS UP!!!!
I just moved here in Santa Clara, and was looking for the really good Japanese restaurant. And this place was one of the spots to eat really good Japanese food It might be a little small, but it has a mom-and-pop feel to it, which gave me a feeling that it could be good, and man, was my feeling correct! I got the Alaskan Roll and Crunch roll. I tasted my friend's Dragon Roll and I thought it was one of the best Dragon rolls ever. Everything was very fresh. Even the Buckwheat appetizer. I'd go here again, not only because it's near where I live, but it's also really good!
wow this place kinda shocked me.. my friend is a big sushi lover.. so i usually trust her choices..  I ordered the Alaskan roll.. and boy to my surprise it was REALLY GOOD.. FRESH SALMON!! Service can be tough when it's busy, I went there for lunch and it was pretty packed! Once the food was ordered it came out FAST!! the fastest I've ever seen! I highly recommend this place!
Good little place for sushi or cooked dinners. Sushi is pretty solid. Prices are good! Sashimi dinner combination was like $17 and also came with a little appetizer of udon noodles and even takko... quite impressive that the choices were beyond the typical hamachi/maguro. Small place so it does get busy at times. Would come here again for sushi if I'm in Santa Clara!
Very nice place. It looks like a total hole in the wall from outside, and it's located in an odd little plaza... but when you're inside, you're surrounded by nothing but awesomeness. -Fast, consistent service even when it's a full house -Menu is simple and to the point -GREAT value for lunches -Has some cushion seating where you take off your shoes :) This is a great place if you're looking for good, inexpensive sushi. I love their fast service - our server is a very hard worker and it made our lunch very pleasant. I am so coming back here.
Went there last week.  It was a pretty good place to eat after a 3 mile hike in the los altos hills. It was super backed up for a tuesday, but well worth the wait.  Went with a group of about 5 people and had to wait a good 30minutes on the list.  You can choose if you want the bar, a table, or the tatami.  We ended up on the tatami and had to take our shoes off. I ordered a lot of nigiri (Sake, hamachi, ika, ama ebi, hotate) and the chicken yakitori and a side of rice.  The sushi came out pretty quickly, the service was pretty good, we didn't really have to ask them to fill our water and they gave us enough space to converse and enjoy our food. Very homely/traditional styled place.  Not loud and obnoxious like some other sushi places in the area.
It was my first time here, finally had a chance to come in after many years of going to the Train Shop next door.Can't say a single thing bad about this place.  So damn good!  HUGE portions of very fresh fish.    Very friendly staff - and they take AMEX! Today's special was negi toro and kampachi - so, so, so... sooooo good. This has definitely entered my short list of all-time favorite sushi places.
I think I've found my go to spot for japanese food and sushi for as long as I'll live here in the Santa Clara county. Here was my experience.. Came here around 5pm right when they opened for dinner. Although the outside plaza may look old don't be fooled. It's tucked nicely in the corner and the lighting is rather dim and homey looking. The sweetie and I were warmly greeted and seated immediately with the option of sitting at a table or on the tatami mats. We opted for table and were given menus. While flipping thru the simple and organized menu we were given a cold noodle appetizer. For dinner we decided on the Beef Tataki appetizer, Beef Sukiyaki for the sweetie and the Sashimi Dinner Combo for I choosing Chicken Katsu as my dinner option. Sweetie got a Sprite to drink versus my Hawaiian Sun Pineapple Orange. Our respective dinners also came with miso soup and salad. Beef Tataki, this was showcased with a beautiful rose presentation accompanying a light dipping sauce. It was a generous portion as we unraveled the petals and found out it was well worth the $7 price tag. Great sear on the outside followed by a nice raw buttery mouth feel for the meat. Beef Sukiyaki, delicious! Had noodles, little pieces of bamboo, enoki mushrooms, kobe beef, onions, cabbage and carrots. The Nabe was sweeter than I was accustomed to because I've only had homecooked Sukiyaki but it was still delicious. For $11 it was a great price for Sukiyaki where other places would charge $20+. Sashimi Combo Dinner,  $15 for Chicken Katsu with Rice, 3 pcs. of Tuna, 2 pcs. of Hamachi, 2 pcs. of Yellowtail and 2 pcs. of Octopus was a shocker. I thought the pieces would be small but they were a good size. Aside the quantity the quality of the food was amazing. Chicken Katsu was fried perfectly not heavily breaded and the chicken was succulent. The fish was pretty much perfect for me, nice silky and buttery melt in your mouth feel. Very fresh, cool and plump. The service here is good as our waiter checked on us more than once, gave us requested condiments, smiled, gave us adequate time to order, wasn't pushy or rude and delivered our food on time, hot and delicious. The homey atmosphere definitely added to the experience as we noticed the owner? talking to customers who frequent this joint. Signs of amazing food and service. Yuki Sushi stole my heart and tastebuds and left my wallet nice and happy too! I'll definitely be back for more; sushi, Agedashi Tofu, Chicken Kara-Age, Gyoza, etc!!
FOOD: 1.) Hamachi sashimi = Honto oiishi desu! Lotta times Yellowtail comes out too firm, but at Yuki it's of a tender consistency close to perfection 2.) Teriyaki Chicken = Satisfied. nom nom. ^___^ Came with Miso soup, salad, this mayo noodle side thing SERVICE: Great. And no language barrier at all. ATMOSPHERE: Very small, low ceiling, small sushi bar in front room, there's a back room, but it's still kinda small. All the tables were uncomfortably close to each other, which disrupts my personal conversation because I really dislike someone else eavesdropping and quietly judging everything I'm saying.
If you want good Japanese food (meaning sushi and cooked entrees), this is the place to go.  They have something for everyone and it's authentic Japanese. The place is a little small so it's more intimate and you get better service, but it has its cons.  For example, the food comes out way tooo fast! During my recent visit, we got to sit on the tatami area so I was happy.  For a mini starter, they will give you a small bowl of cold soba.  Most of the entrees come with salad and miso soup so those come out first.  I ordered the Sashimi with Chicken Teriyaki dinner.  Before I even had time to finish my soup and salad, the whole entree came out.  So my food started getting cold fast.  I wish they would watch the pace of the food. The food was really good.  Generous portions of sashimi although it was a part of an entree.  Too much food, but satisfying.  My husband ordered the chirashi and the slices of sashimi were pretty thick and long, but nothing to complaint about.  Definitely will be back again.
Came here for a weekday lunch and this is definitely on the short list for sushi restaurants close to work.  My boss recommended Yuki to me and it took me a bit to figure out where it is because it is tucked in a strip mall near a hardware store (where I had keys made). The place was busy, but there was no wait for lunch when we arrived.  Parking was difficult, however. Food was good.  I opted for a sashimi/tempura bento and my friend had a noodle dish.  We both were happy.
Quaint, cosy sushi place that serves high quality sushi. The beef tataki stood out. The sashimi platters are excellent.
Tiny. The place was full when we got there; you sign up at the door. The sushi was ok, not spectacular. The rolls were rolled kind of loose and tended to fall apart. One good thing is the owner actually is the sushi chef. We had a udon clay pot with chicken and a dragon roll and a sashimi dish of sake and yellow tail. All of it was decent and edible but we were not wowed by it like Sushi O Sushi or Main Street in Half Moon Bay. Probably not gonna come back.
Make a reservation!  The wait is quite long if you don't as people have discovered how fabulous this place is.  Everything we tried was delicious.  I was amazed by the many vegetarian offerings including design-your-own sushi rolls.  My dining companions loved the Beef Tataki (sliced rare beef with Ponzu sauce).  The sushi was lovely and filling.  We will certainly be back with frequency.  My only hope is that they will offer more sake varieties in the future. The wait here is unpleasant and we completely prefer Hoshi ( http://www.yelp.com/biz/... ) now that we've discovered it.
In middle school, my parents would always be on my case about not taking school seriously enough. "Haaaaiiiiii, Horace", they'd say. "You've got such a good mind! But because you're always out playing instead of studying, it's just going to waste!" I've always wondered why they seemed so frustrated; it's not like my grades weren't good. After eating here, I think I can see where they're coming from. I ordered the sashimi dinner, which comes with ahi tuna, yellowtail, halibut, mackerel, and octopus. The ingredients were top-notch. Incredibly fresh, glistening fish, with no indication that it had been frozen or sitting around for days. It's what you'd expect from a very, very good sushi bar. I ordered some uni nigiri as well, which was extremely fresh. Where the dinner fell down, though, is in the preparation. The halibut, mackerel, and octopus were fine; no complaints there. But the tuna and the yellowtail were far too thick-cut and the slices too large to enjoy properly. Instead of being delicately prepared, I felt like they had just lopped off hunks of meat onto my plate. It was all rather careless, and perhaps a sad concession to the American mentality of "bigger, bigger, bigger!" To be fair, the dinner is very good value for money, considering the amount of high-quality sashimi I got. But I think they should've gone for fewer, thinner-cut slices of ahi and yellowtail, making up for it by adding another variety of sashimi. I see so much potential here, but I feel like it's just been squandered. To me -- empathizing with my parents so many years back -- that is more frustrating than not having any potential to begin with.
Very nice food here.
My bf and I came by to grab a quick bite before the Sharks game.  Which is was a great place to be.  We order a roll, sashimi and a beef tataki. The roll was decent, taste great, just the sauce slight salty for me.  The sashimi taste fresh and clean. The beef tataki was delicious, just wish they can cut the beef a little thinner.  The service was wonderful but the waitress need to use less hair pin.  We have a hair pain just fly and drop it right into our table. lol
It's weird looking back on really old reviews.  I must have tried a few other place in the the south bay and ultimately this little joint truly became my favorite sushi in the south bay!!!!  I get take out there and I go for dinner there with my partner and friends.  I literally have no complaints.  The sushi is great, staff is friendly and the atmosphere rules.  Since my first review Yuki Sushi expanded the Santa Clara location and opened it's WIllow Glen location.  I still prefer to go to Santa Clara's location.  It's old school.  The staff knows me and treats me great.  My partner teases me saying I'm like Norm from Cheers, going there.  I guess he's kinda right.  Haha.
Excellent sushi.  The place is busy, I'd suggest a reservation especially on a weekend evening.... Read more 
I would give this place more stars but it just didn't live up the hype that yelpers had really given.  I would give 2 1/2 stars. It's probably due to the fact that you mostly have to go try out a sushi restaurant for yourself, because everyone has varying opinions about it. So here's my review. Went there on a saturday night, surprisingly not too busy and we got seated right away. We sat at the bar, along with a mom and her daughter, and a few others joined later. It was nice how they had a tatami style seating, 2 tables for parties of 4. It was nice how they served cold soba noodles, a little bowl before the meal. Ordered the crunch roll, spider roll, california roll, and salmon skin roll and tempura. The tempura was pretty good, it even comes with 3 shrimp.  The crunch roll had a spicy sauce made from mayo and jalenpenos. I thought the salmon skin could have been more crunchy, and was oddly sweet. The rolls were just ok, it seemed like there was too much water on the rice so the rolls were kind of soggy. I don't really understand what the hype was about. The sushi was ok, atmosphere eh..waitress seemed attentive as i had no more water and asked if i would like some more. The bill came about 10 minutes later, we had just finished paying for our 50 dolla meal..and she comes by and says oh sorry it got busy but here's some water. I guess thanks for trying but we were leaving? Also had a hard time flagging down the waitress to order something else. Don't go here expecting something great, it just seemed ordinary to me. There was about 10 people waiting outside for a seat when we left too, the place is pretty small. *What was cool was that it was 2 people's birthday in the restaurant, and they gave free ice cream to the girl and sake with a candle in it for the guy! Go there for your birthday!
This gem of a place is a tiny, family owned Sushi/Japanese food place. My family and I have been coming here since I was a little girl and till this day I think it is the best Japanese and Sushi in San Jose. You get good quality, for a good price. Everything tastes amazing and it is a very small restaurant, just like you were eating in someones home. It can get loud and very crowded but that's because it is so popular! Food: I love getting their little soba noodles that come with every dish! I am so addicted to those!  When I was little, before I liked sushi, I would always order their Soft Shell Crab or Agadashi Tofu appetizers to eat. Also their Hamachi is some of the most fresh and best I have ever had hands down. They really know their sushi (one of the brothers who owns the place is always there behind the counter making it super fresh!)  Their Salmon Teriyaki is pretty good. During the winter I always have to come in for some Sukiyaki, which is a wonderful soup/stew with tons of veggies and noodles. They have a decent selection of rolls, all of which are very good, but they are not known for outrageous combinations. If you want crazy rolls, try Michi Sushi. But go to Yuki for all around quality and assorted Japanese food dishes. So yummy its like you had a Japanese mom cooking it up for you!
everything here is average.  you name it, I got it.  karagee wings, tempra udon, salmon nigiri, crunch roll (stupid roll i call it, taste horrible) and probably their best dish, agedashi tofu. something is not right when I'm writing that their tofu appetizer is their best dish....
Try to get past the shopping center that looks like it belongs in 1970s Tahoe; this place is awesome. Great rolls (I love the way they do their spicy tuna), tatami seating, and friendly service. We had to wait for a table, even on a Wednesday night. I also didn't appreciate the fact that they put wasabi on my tuna nigiri. Other than that, I loved this place. Definitely the best sushi I've had in Santa Clara.
I've had two sort of different experiences here, the first was not so good and the second was good.  Firstly my good friend told me i had to go to Yuki because the portions a huge compared to your regular sushi joint. So we go and yes they gave you a generous amount of fish on  your nigiri, but the quality was not on par.  I'd rather have a small amount of good fish than a large amount of not so great fish. The second time around which was about a month ago, the quality of the fish had much improved, and yes the quantity was a bit smaller too.  It looks like they're on the right track and the price is right, i'll be sure to try Yuki again in a while.
I really enjoyed my first visit to Yuki Sushi.  It's in a very unassuming strip mall at the corner of Winchester and Pruneridge, very easy to miss.  The first thing that impressed me was the overall vibe of the place...once you're inside, it's easy to forget that you're in a strip mall in Santa Clara.  It has a very cozy feel to it.  We ended up eating in the rear dining room, which was cute because you get to walk through the kitchen on the way back there. The staff were all very friendly and helpful.  I ended up getting the steak teriyaki.  My wife got a combo plate of chicken teriyaki and the shrimp/veggie tempura assortment.  Everything was delicious.  There were only 8-9 sake choices, although the sake menu lists the SMV for everything, and they seem to have curated the selection such that there's something for everyone. I will absolutely go back here next time I'm in the mood for Japanese.  If the sushi (which I haven't tried yet) turns out to be just as good as everything else, I may bump this place up to 5 stars.
I just moved into this area and this is the first sushi place I went.  I found it based on Yelp reviews and it didn't disappoint me. Yeah! Thanks Yelp I found a good sushi place in my neighborhood.  Sashimi and sushi are very fresh.  I love the Agetashi Tofu too.
True, the place is tiny, hole in the wall and more home like. There is two tables that you can sit tatomi style. Good for salmon, mmm yummmy. Their curry is pretty good, with yummy croquette. They give you a little soba right when you come in. So aside from the small environment, it is pretty good. Prices are decent.
The place is already VERY popular and getting a table can be a real challenge if you arrive much later than 5:00 p.m. However, it is indeed worth the effort and here's why. You say you like sushi? Well, you like sushi, and who in their right mind doesn't? - Toshi Roll:  tuna, yellowtail, salmon, avocado, cucumber = yummy!!!! -   Alaskan Roll:  cream cheese and avocado wrapped in smoked salmon = true love!!! -  Jackie Roll: scallops, shrimp, jalapeno sauce = just eat it!!! -  Yuki Roll: shrimp, avocado, masago = makes you feel so right!!! Look, I love sushi, and I've had my share of it in virtually every part of the world. Yuki Sushi IS the real deal. Others have already mentioned that this place is small, and that is a fact - get there early. If you see a 6'7" guy and his 5'4" wife making their way to the door - just make way!!! Have fun and enjoy!
My new fave is Yuki Sushi near Valley Fair Mall.  Hint: avoid the psycho VFM traffic and drive to Yuki via 880/Hedding/Pruneridge. Comparing it to Sushi Sam's (my more-northern reco): Yuki has less selection but the fish is better. And the place doesn't feel as chaotic as Sam's. Their albacore nigiri with ponzu sauce is the best in the bay area IMO. Likewise with the albacore tataki. Albacore fans, you have found your fixx. Yuki also has excellent hot dishes; their age-dashi tofu is stellar: light and crispy with all the awesome garnish. Hot dishes come in large portions and are very good. The kid's meal looks like an adult's meal -- it dat big. Hamachi is buttery and fresh. Spicy tuna roll (cut roll) is one of the best as they spice it with jalapeno sauce (but yes, I wish it wasn't so measly). Still, it's really good! Go early or expect a wait. I must fault them on one thing. We had 2 families with 2 toddlers (4 adults). They automatically charged us 18% gratuity for "a party of 6." Uhhhh, ok.  fine.
I am absolutely stumped as to the popularity of this place.  I work nearby and I always saw the lines of people outside so I was itching to try it!  What is my first criteria of a sushi place?  Freshness of the fish!  My husband and I always have the sashimi first--it's a good indication of the quality of the rest of the night.  Sashimi freshness cannot be masked by sauces, deep frying etc. So, we tried the Sake (Salmon) and Hamachi sashimi.  OMG!  It was sooo fishy that we had one bite of each and gave it back-- I'm not going to risk getting sick.  When we told the sushi chefs it was fishy they just looked at us and shrugged their shoulders.  We immediately cancelled the rest of our order, finished our beer and walked out.  I can tell you, 10 years of eating sushi, I have NEVER walked out of a sushi restaurant. This happened a few months ago, but I forgot to review it (trying to forget it I think!)  So, this week one of my co-workers decided to take out some sushi rolls for lunch and she wanted to share it with me.  She loves salmon so she got some kind of salmon roll.  I asked her where did she get it?  She said Yuki Sushi and I stiffened.  But, I decided to give it another chance and I accepted the piece of salmon roll she gave to me.  She bit into hers and I into mine and she said, "Does this taste fishy to you?" I nodded and she made a face and threw the rest of the roll away. I suppose if you only have the cooked food, it may be better, but I would be wary of the freshness of their fish.
Since we moved to Sunnyvale in the summer, we're in search for our south bay sushi restaurant. Before Yuki, we haven't found one that we can say we'll go back to. Although I would rate Hotaru in San Mateo high than Yuki, we did have a good experience at Yuki tonight and we'll go back. Agedashi $4.25 - the best agedashi tofu hands down! the tofu skin is crispy and the source is very tasty Sashimi Moriawase (sampler) $15.75 - a good value sampler, it came with tuna, yellow tail, tako, saba adn halibut. The tako (octopus) is one of the best I have, tuna/saba/halibut are quite good. I'm not fond of the yellow tail, I thought it tastes a bit sour - I wasn't reading the menu closely but it came with steam rice, not sushi rice Ama Ebi (Sweet Shrimp) Nigiri $ 4.75 - the best Sweet Shrimp (with fried Shrimp heads) hands down! I am usually hesitated in eating the shrimp heads.. for this one, I wanted more! Sweet Shrimp is fresh and tasty! Spicy Scallop Nigiri $4.45 - absolute disappointment. Too much mayos and not spicy at all. I am more used to the whole scallop or more chunky ones.. this one seems to be finely chopped. Jackie Roll $ 4.95 - (scallops, shrimp, jalapeno sauce). It wasn't bad but I'm not crazy about it. Again, too much mayos and not spicy at all. Toshi Roll $ 5.25 - (tuna, yellowtail, salmon, avocado, cucumber, spicy cod roe).  Another disappointment. The roll doesn't have spicy cod roe (I searched for it and it's not there!). It wasn't bad but I wouldn't order it again. Service is 5 star! Waitress is attentive and food comes very fast. As you can see, I either love the food or I am really disappointed. I guess I'll skip the rolls next time and go for the nigiri or try something else. Overall, a good experience. I can't believe there's a wait on a Wednesday night - sign of a good restaurant
I can't say I am impressed. The place seems authentic, but I didn't notice authenticity on the sushi served. The portions were small (eg. alaska roll is coming only 4 pieces!!) , price paid is high than usual. I don't get  why it's highly rated in Yelp.
The name may suggest yucky for it's you-key, and this place is anything but yucky.  The sushi here is off the chain, just look at the rating after 680 reviews, well 681 including mine. This place is a bit hidden away and hard to find at first but once you do, you won't forget it.  It's a really small restaurant and it's always packed, so you know the food is great.  You might think this is all too much for some sushi, but you won't regret coming here.  Try the specials and also go with what you know.  The food here is really good.
My girlfriend and I just had dinner here tonight.  We've been looking for a sushi bar in the San Jose area that we can frequent, and I think we may just have found one.  The staff is a very nice and personable, and they bring you a small cup of cold soba noodles after being seated.  We ordered some green tea, which was delicious!  For sushi we ate the rainbow roll, some ebi, unagi and a couple of toshi rolls.  They were all delicious and fresh! Needless to say, we'll be back, and often.
Although I loved going to this place and never had a problem really... I had to take off some stars... I went in to pick up a to-go order, and the lady behind the counter in the back was extremely rude. She didn't even show me my receipt (I had to ask how much everything was), reluctantly told me how much it was, and didn't even mention there was a $1 charge for extra sauce on the side. They didn't even mention this on the phone when I ordered and asked if I could order some on the side. Anyway, after I inquired, her response was, "No, we charge." And I told her, "No one mentioned it over the phone," and she just looked at me like I was crazy and didn't even apologize. Then, I quietly agreed to pay and did so, she gave me my credit card authorization receipt and didn't even say "thank you," and went back to whatever she was doing at her desk, as if I wasn't even there. The crunch roll and toshi roll are still really amazing and so is the jalapeno sauce. I just was not satisfied with this experience. The aforementioned lady didn't give a crap about the business I was giving her restaurant or my polite request that I would at least appreciated some sort of notice for "hidden" charges. I mean, JEEZ, it's only $1.00! No need to act so rude or sneaky about it. She needs to learn how to treat customers properly, and at least say THANK YOU.
Thank you for all your Yelp reviews! Just came back from my first time eating there and was pleased!... Read more 
Absolutely best sushi in town. Their quality of fish is amazing. Before this place opens, people are all lined up waiting outside.  No joke!  Once it opens, it gets flowed with stream of people, all he tables would get occupied people are writing their names on waiting list to be seated.  The list board is right by the door so when people come in, they can just sign up. If you want to experience Yuki sushi, go there early. Their lunch is fantastic, too.  Good price, quality food.
If I want good sushi I come here. They've got  your typical selection of rolls and whatnot, but its the service, portions and atmosphere I like the most. If you want to pretend you're a real life japanese person you can even sit in a tatami table and eat, although I've no idea why you would want to, as I find them incredibly uncomfortable personally. You may think differently, but I like foot room and back support. The service is always very friendly, they're very patient and always willing to suggest things if you're not sure what you want. The sushi bar is the most fun to sit at, because you can watch the sushi chefs make your order right there, as well as talk to them, which you should, because they're really nice. The food is always very good, i've never had any problems with my order, nor has anything every been undercooked or burnt or wrong. The little bowl of cold noodles they give you for free the second you sit down is damn delicious too. I can and have ordered a big bowl of just those, they're so good. My only complaint is that its kind of crowded, and since its so popular, you'll always have to wait a bit to get in. The best way to get around this is take out! Just call 'em up, order what you want and then pick it up to go. It's really handy if you don't feel like waiting to eat for any longer than it takes to cook. Try the dragon roll, that wasabi mayo is godly.
To make it short but sweet....the service, people, and food are the best in town! I'm not just saying that because I have been eating there for YEARS, but because i have "cheated" on Yuki's and have tried other Japanese restaurants. Those other places, don't even compare to Yuki's. Hope to you see you there soon! The Sunday/Wednesday regular
Yuki is the only sushi place I've gone back to so far, and really just for the dragon roll that they have. I love eel, and their dragon roll is the best I've had in the Bay to date: seasoned and sauced perfectly,  tempura shrimp is actually crunchy, and large serving size to boot. Now, the other dishes... they use firm tofu for their agedashi, which is a huge no no in my book. Their crunch roll is interesting with the jalapeno sauce, but they're small and, overall, the flavors don't blend too well. The unagi don is pretty good, with a decent serving size. And while I didn't try the teriyaki chicken and beef myself, one my of dinner partners did order it, and the serving size was massive. Lastly, waits haven't been too ridiculously long the two times I've gone so far. About 10 minutes the first time, and 20 the second. Also, really friendly waitresses.
The parking lot is shared as it's in a mini outdoor shopping center. It fills up fast! There's a long wait after 7PM so get there early. The sushi is served to you super fast which makes me question how much effort they put into it. They don't add any detail  such as sesame seeds on the outside of the roll or wasabi on the inside. Their wasabi is the worst I've ever tasted, tastes exactly like horseradish. The sushi is cheap but the sake ain't - that's how they get you. Also, the dish they give you to put your soy sauce in is soo small you can barely fit your sushi in it. Oh, and the entire place smells fishy.. any good sushi place wouldn't smell like this. 1 star for the price and another star for fast (almost too fast) service.
Yuki...sushi...how I love thee let me count the ways: I love thee more than any other sushi joint and this is my point... Your pieces of fish are fresh and thick..you definitely don't skimp... Your prices are just right...I won't put up a fight... Your service is great..that's why there's a wait... My distance is so that I no longer can sip your miso...but alas we will meet again...with chopsticks, soy sauce and wasabi in hand... the end
This is an OK sushi place -. 3 stars only because the sushi chefs look competent. I've been there several times and this place has always been packed. Why, I don't really know. The food is average. the sushi, though good is nothing spectacular. And the service is absolutely horrid. The sushi chefs actually know what they are doing here and the fish are fresh (enough).  I was sitting at the sushi bar and I saw the chef working on a piece of Salmon; I'm glad to report that he trimmed and sliced with confidence - and was not afraid to throw slabs of fish away if they did not look good enough. I'm not talking about small bits and pieces, these were bits of fish that one of these boat places would gladly serve you. Bravo. I ordered Sake, Shiro Maguro, Hamichi, Scalop, Suzuki. The Suzuki was a little disappointing - I didn't like the ponzu-soy sauce they slathered over it. The scalops were slightly fishy. Ant the other three fish were good. The rice was nicely seasoned and slightly warm - just right. Now on to the service. This is a small restaurant - 10 tables, and a 6-8 sitter sushi bar. There were 3 people working out front, 2 sushi chefs behind the bar, and I would guess 2 more in the kitchen behind. I was sitted at the bar within 2 minutes of walking in, but did not speak to anyone else for the next 12 minutes. It was over 15 minutes before I was even offered a drink. What are these people doing? They were buzzing around like headless chickens and accomplishing nothing! The long line of people waiting outside of the restaurant is not indicative of the high standard of cooking, but the absolutely unbelievably ineffectual waitering. I'm going to give this place a second chance - only because I live some 3 minutes away, and the chefs really look the business.
I've been here now twice and have to say they make some of the best saba dinners around. The portion is generous and I love the feel of this restaurant- it feels old school inside despite it's located in a strip mall. So, Is that peppery macaroni noodle pasta side really Japanese?? Just curious as I do like it. We'll be back.
So I just finished eating my Crunch Roll, New York Roll and the Vegetable Croquette (kind of like potato pancakes) and I must say, I'm impressed. I ordered to go and was hesitant at first because a few reviews mentioned they didn't have a great experience when they ordered for pick up. I took a chance and I'm glad I did. The waitress was very pleasant and quickly got my food and rung me up. The restaurant was full and I could understand how a waitress might not be super happy to help out a to-go when they most likely won't get tipped for it. I've worked in a restaurant before and waiters always hate to-gos. But the waitress had my food all ready within 20 minutes like she quoted me on the phone and I was in and out of there in under 3 minutes. Next time I would like to come in for dinner and sit down but at least I know now that takeout is easy at Yuki Sushi. The food: Crunch Roll- too spicy for me and I just wasn't a big fan of the sauce they put on top. I ate it all but I'll want to try something else next time. NY Roll- nothing wonderfully amazing but it was a simple, tasty roll. Vegetable Croquette- loved this! The sauce that came with it was good too. My boyfriend really liked this too. For those 3 items it came to $15.
Squeezed in between a model train shop and a liquor store named after a cedar tree, it's hard to imagine a quality Japanese restaurant existing in these confines...but somehow Yuki Sushi stays on the down-low, announcing its presence only with a tiny boxed sign. Once you enter, you get a choice of table or tatami, but you'll be cozying up to other dining guests either way.  The selection offered here is very impressive with everything from grilled eel to sukiyaki to beef curry and tonkatsu, the last of which is about the size of a Superbowl party tray and good for 3 sets of leftovers.  For such an obscure location, eating at Yuki Sushi is always a surprise.
Fresh sushi/sashimi but very limited varieties.  The fish and rice ratio seems about right (fish slice drapping nicely over the rice.) The hamachi kama-yaki was a big disappointment .  Somehow the kitchen had decided to cut it into 4 pieces instead of a whole (or 1/2) fish collar.  I can't tell if they were from one collar or just end pieces of a couple hamachis. Only 3 stars because of their luke warm wait service and lack of fish varities.  There are just too many other Japanese restaurants that offer similar food quality and service that Yuki probably won't be on my return list for awhile.
NEHHHH why? looked at website, thought it was prettttty cheap for dinner. though this might be bad but i want more for my dollar. so if youre a quantity person like myself, do not come here. ordering: 8 bucks for spider rolll? hellll yeahh. im on it arrival of my spider roll: 5 pieces? aftermath: finished in basically one fell swoop im ok with ordering more but they did not ask us for last chances. and when i was craving for more, the kitchen had supposedly "closed." but within 15 minutes, the waitress came out with a fat platter of sushi for the staff to eat. that better have been pre prepared. pretty lame since i craved sushi all week. rice was a little hard... but it was near closing time, so thats forgivable. we had choice of table, bar or tatami mats. tatami mats! overall an arrrright place.
I've been coming to this place for years and it's never failed to disappoint. The rolls are always fresh and delicious, the service is prompt and kind, and they have exciting seating. Seatings always been prompt, even when there's a wait. They serve the best crunch roll I've ever had.
I have friends that swear by this place. In fact for a long time one of them wouldn't even tell me the name as he was so damn secretive about it. Well I found it anyways and yes it is pretty good. The best evar? Not sure about that but pretty solid. Chicken kara-age and the sashimi moriawase was what was consumed. Good quality fish, solid fried chicken. The ambiance is definitely quiet even for 9pm on a Friday night. Folks are friendly and there are a lot of servers considering how small the place is. I guess they have yakitori and other hot foods that I may try now that my friend's secret Japanese place is out of the bag
My parents absolutely LOOOVE this place!  Not to mention they introduced my sis and I to this wonderful sushi restaurant years and years ago and now we're regular customers ourselves.  I recently came back to visit for a couple of days and this was a MUST visit spot because I miss fresh sushi and zaru soba in which you can really taste the authentic japanese flavors - I also LOVE japanese curry and this place has one of the best katsu curry dishes :P  The Udon is also very good and it's perfect on a cold winter day - it hits the spot, warms you up, and tates delicious!  Can't wait for my next visit back!
This is probably my favorite sushi place, considering I went here all the time when I was a youngin'... Read more 
Fabulous sushi! I would go back over and over again, if not for the high prices compared to other sushi boats in the area. I did, however, like the concept of taking off your shoes and sitting on the ground for a Japanese dinner!
My boyfriend and I come here all the time. We love it!! We like to sit either at the bar or the tatami area. The waitresses are so nice, and the service is great. So far, I have had the hot pots, sushi, curry, bentos, and the grilled salmon over rice. Everything is delicious!!!  I will keep coming back for more!!! (I even got one of the cute neko t-shirts they have for sale :3)
Best Ka-rage ever, but that's all I can remember. We ended up finding a hair in the batter. Not so good afterall. Oh, and limited seating, especially on busy dinner nights. I didn't care for the CA rolls...
Once upon a time in a land far far away I went to Yuki Sushi with some friends who flew in from Seattle. I didn't know my way around the south bay around that time. I thought they took me to some place in the meridian campbell area. One day I was driving around and Yuki Sushi appeared out of no where. I didn't know how close it was to where i lived. Just this past weekend my sister and her family visited and we hit Yuki sushi for dinner. We got there right at 5. Luckily we missed the mad rush. People were waiting outside to get into the restaurant. The portions were large and the sushi tasted pretty fresh. I liked eating at this restaurant a lot.
I agree with Larry H on every point. Great atmosphere. Excellent service. Not trendy -- traditional atmosphere (they don't have the same lighting system as Starbucks -- that's a plus!!) Clean. Fish just okay (not super duper fresh). Rolls were tastey, but not sure I'll be back.
Another sushi place, smaller than the average restaurant but usually lines waiting outside which I took to be a good sign.  So I dived in and went for dinner on a Friday night.  There was a nice buzz inside, family-like atmosphere with lots of buzz and conversations.  Definitely felt a good vibe inside.  As for the food... Ordered the 15 piece sashimi appetizer, the tetsuo(dragon) roll, the spicy scallop roll, and another roll I forgot the name of.  The fish is definitely fresh and not frozen and as a good sign, the order took a while to come to us.  I believe good sushi takes a while to prepare if they put any care into it.  If it comes too fast, then I start to worry. Things I disliked: the mackarel and octopus on my sashimi platter.  I'm accustomed to getting white tuna/salmon so this was a definite curveball for me.  I now know that mackarel won't be a fav of mine.  My experience here was OK and worth a return visit but now I know what to expect and what else to try.
Yuki Sushi is awesome. I would definitely come here again for good quality, fresh pieces of fish. The slices of hamachi and sake were really thick and fairly large. Service was great. When you sit down, they give you a little dish of soba noodles! What a lovely surprise. Oh, and SO affordable! The only thing about this place - I love ikura...and ordered a few. The ikura had a strange, alcoholic taste to it. I thought that was very odd...
Why it deserves 4 stars: 1. Cheap! for sushi. 2. 5.50 for a large Hot Sake, another one please! 3. Quick service (although getting a seat is another story). 4. Big portions. The tamago was the almost the size of my blackberry pearl. 5. Fish is fresh, try the hamachi here. 6. Sushi chefs know what they are doing. We sat at the sushi bar and I was watching them make all sorts of interesting seared tuna dishes. Dont expect immediate seating, or even 15 min seating on weekends. Expect to wait.
GOOD sushi for cheap ROCKS! =D (Well, cheap for sushi anyway. =P) But before the sushi even came out our HUGE portion of beef tataki (seared beef cooked very rare with ponzu sauce) came out. For $7 I was expecting only a few strips of meat, but a whole plate came out. The plating was awesome. They made the beef look like roses. The beef was nice a tender. It wasn't that chewy kind of rare meat. I would definitely order this again! =) The agedashi tofu is one of the best I've had. The crunch wasn't paper thin and actually still had crunch on it even with the sauce on it. But the tofu inside was still soft. Yummy. The sushi rolls were pretty good. The jalepeno sauce they use in their spicy rolls were different. It was more creamy than spicy but still tasted good. There wasn't a specfic roll that screamed to me though. It wasn't "ORGASMIC good" as my friend described. =P But still good nonetheless. I'll come back for the appetizers for sure though! =D
Who knew such a cute sushi restaurant was located in the plaza?! Driving around, I've never noticed this place but it is very welcoming once you get inside. My boyfriend and I had different opinions on this place. He loved it but I thought it was just okay. When we arrived, we got seated very promptly. All the tables are super close to each other, you can basically hear what everyone is talking about around you. It is kind of a hole in the wall but that's not necessarily a bad thing.They give you soba noodles instead of the usual miso soup as an appetizer so that was a pleasant surprise. Now onto the most important part...the sushi! They use so much rice! I really didn't enjoy it because the consistency was so squishy! I know it's sticky rice but I seriously have never tasted rice like this! My boyfriend on the other hand loved it! Different strokes for different folks? Can't really go wrong with a spicy tuna roll but it was not spicy at all! Very bland actually!  Some good parts were the tuna sashimi was very generously cut and fresh! And the price was on point! We got 4, maybe 5 rolls for about $38!!! If you go to a more trendy sushi joint, the bill could have been easily $60+! I would definitely give this place another chance to try different menu items just because it is so affordable!
I've been here twice so far, once for sushi & once for oyako don. No complaints from me! The service is prompt and attentive. The wait (if there is one) is worth it. Fresh fish? Check! Great flavor? Check! Reasonable price to quantity to quality ratio? CHECK! I love places that give you something slightly unique as a complimentary starter. In my book, a small bowl of cold buckwheat soba definitely qualifies, and DEFINITELY puts me in a good mood. Great for lunch, great for dinner. Great for sushi or other Japanese food. Great for leftovers, too! :)
After reading the positive reviews from fellow Yelpers, I decided to take my family out to Yuki Sushi. I couldn't believe all these years going to Valley Fair that I have numerously passed this location. When we first stepped into the restaurant, we noticed there was a long waitlist, which already set the tone that the food was going to be great. One of the hosts said that there were seats in the back and we would be seated immediately. We opted for it and bypassed the traditional Japanese seating of removing shoes. We'll probably do that some other time and I'll be sure to bring clean socks. There were a lot of items to choose from the menu. I ordered entree combination with beef teriyaki and tempura. At $14.75, it was reasonably priced compared to other Japanese restaurants. I was surprised with the large, generous portion of beef and the tempura (there were 3 pieces of shrimp tempura). Being a huge rice eater, I had to conserve my bowl. However, I noticed the waitress asking another customer if they wanted more rice. I'm not sure if it's an extra charge or if it's free. I'll ask next time. Overall, the meal exceeded my expectations and I was extremely satisfied. I tried my wife's dragon roll, and it was also delicious. Great service, great food. Sushi O Sushi is my favorite place to eat Japanese food, but Yuki Sushi could possibly take that title. Who knows? Thank you fellow Yelpers... Highly Recommended
I am a bit reluctant to complain that the cuts of sashimi are too thick since the more the better right? Somehow I still prefer the fish on the nigiri to be 'standard' thickness since having sushi is more about enjoyment than downing as much fish as you can. Stil, I do not complain because I  would still have another giant nigiri here in a heart beat. For this place I ordered freestyle and tried to eat all of the two speical things on the menu on the well. This includes the Engawa and Tsubugai (see pictures) which were both very very good. The engawa was so surprisingly creamy being the fins of a flat fish. The Tsubugai was more standard and was very good also. The hamachikama was super melty and my mouth is watering just thinking about it. What caught me off guard was that there were giant chunks of meat in four pieces when I expected a huge collar bone instead where I can pick at. Perhaps they ran out of the collar bones?
3*. Average. Everything average. Miso soup - not boiled, but not that great tasting. Average. I got the sashimi lunch. Average. A few pieces of the tuna were tough, but the toro was quite good. Skimped on the rice! man... Wife had the sushi lunch special. Everything was average. Average average average. I expected more from having a larger Japanese population around, and being on the West Coast. Maybe I've just been completely jaded by Kuramaya in Chicagoland. If you see people circling the lot and leaving, go find parking on the local streets nearby. The lot is small.
Went here last night with A. The food was not what I remembered it to be. It was just okay. And I thought to myself, "I wonder why people wait out the door for this place" and my educational guess is its service. Our server had been working there for over ten years and so she has a lot of regulars. In fact she has those regulars that order the same thing every time, get the same beverage with same condiments, etc. They know them by name and they greet each other very warmingly. It was nice to see. So the food was just okay, nothing special. In all I would only go if there was no other sushi place open.
Just got back from my 4th visit to Yuki Sushi. Word of advice - go on a Sunday - Thursday night, there's virtually no wait. As for the sushi - YUM. Everything I've eaten there has been incredibly fresh. Make sure to try the Albacore Nigiri with the special sauce. I think it's probably the best I've ever had. So tender and flavorful. And they definitely give you more Albacore than any other place. Also, their other rolls are very reasonably priced. You really get your money's worth. As for cooked food - I've only had success there as well. Tempura is always light and crispy, as it should be. Food is served quickly and steaming hot. Staff seems a bit rushed, but totally friendly and accommodating. This place is definitely becoming one of my regular hangouts.
This place is so deeeleeeeeshusssss. They have the best agedashi tofu, and I love how they provide a little soba for everyone. I did think that their bento lunches are a bit small...the servings are small. I got their teriyaki beef with tempura... They should give double the meat. Luckily, combined with the agedashi tofu order, I left fulfilled with no leftovers.
This hole-in-the-wall in a half-dead plaza was packed with people and lively staff. They have seating at the bar, a handful of tables, and a small area for traditional tatami seating for a full experience. We were a group of 10 people and we literally filled up the middle of the place. The menu had everything from bento entrees to rolls, really good prices - most expensive thing we found was the sashimi for less than $20. Everyone got a tiny dish of cold soba- free appetizer. The hot tea kept coming and the staff was really attentive and as smiley as the fortune cats on their T-shirts. My bf and I ordered from the selection of rolls. They even had a section of customizable vegetarian rolls!! The rolls were not your typical ones, but they had a  unique combination of sushi like the Jackie and the Negisake (sp?) *Note* though the prices look really good for rolls $3.95-$4.95, they mostly come in only 4 pieces. The hamachi (sp?) the broiled yellowytail appetizer was really good, not too dry and flaky meat. All in all, come here for great sushi and great service- worth the waiting line.
YUM! I came here to order dinner to go. The place is pretty small and in a random plaza with a toy train shop, but don't be fooled by appearances! I ordered the hamachi sashimi appetizer, which came with 9 pieces of sashimi. Wow... this fish was melt-in-your-mouth good! So delicious and fresh :) I'm definitely a fan! -L.
I haven't said this in years...  but oh well I'll say it anyway... I LOVE YUKI SUSHI!!!
Sushi: Amazing. The quality was up there with the best. I'm looking forward to coming back to try their yellowtail sashimi. It was sooooo milky and fresh. Service: A tad scary. The GF and I were in a rush so we actually brought the check up to the register to wait as they run us up. The lady in charge of all the checks and credit cards and cash looked all flustered as if she forgot which card belonged to which check! That was a tad scary. Overall: It'd be nice to visit this place when it's not too crazy as it can get really noisy with the crowd and all the servers running around. However, it's still a solid sushi joint.
People rave rave rave about this place, but I really don't see the hype. My friend took me here for my birthday, and I was pretty excited because I've heard great things about this place.  I got the Mitzutaki.  It's chicken and vegetables in a clear broth, aka chicken and vegetables in water.   Hmmm...  It was so bland!  I understand that it's clear broth, but really, it just seemed like they boiled plain chicken and lettuce in water and called it a day. And I am not a person who enjoys tons of salt. But, the agedashi tofu was decent, and the nigiri I had was good.  So it does seem like a  nice sushi place, but since I pretty much hated the majority of my meal, the mitzutaki, I settled for 3 stars.  I'll be back someday to try the other dishes.
Their signature Baja rolls are the best,, they have a jalapeno type sauce on them, order only if you like a mild hot sauce. Best value for portions by far is the killer sake sashimi appetizer! Go there for the food, not the ambiance. Keep of the good work Yuki Sushi , I have been there over 20 times and your food is consistently good.
I was really excited to try Yuki Sushi after reading all of these excellent reviews, but I have to say that this place left a very bad taste in my mouth.  Let me preface this review with saying that I have had my fare share of really great sushi...this is not a sushi 101 review. My husband and I went to Yuki Sushi for dinner last Friday night, anxious to try the "best sushi in San Jose".  We waited about 30 minutes for a table which we expected since this place was supposed to be soooo good.  The service was great.  The waiters were very nice and our food came out rather quickly.  The prices were also very affordable. This is were it gets bad...the food.  Following is a review of what we ordered: -Miso Soup - This was nice on a very cold night.  The flavor was average - not bad and not really memorable. -Pork Potstickers - This was the best thing that we had during our meal.  I would recommend this menu item. -Crunch Roll - This was good but not incredible like everyone else says in their reviews. -Toshi Roll - This was disgusting and tasted like foul fish.  I had a hard time not spitting this out. -Spicy Tuna Roll - I don't know how a sushi joint could mess up this basic item, but Yuki Sushi did just that.  This was so gross! -Yellowtail and Tuna Nigiri - This was ok...but the slices of fish were bigger than any nigiri I have ever eaten. Don't eat here and don't be fooled by all of the outstanding reviews listed below.
LOVE LOVE LOVE it here! The staff is so attentive and friendly. Sushi is inexpensive and tastes great! Rolls are original, crunchy roll has a jalapeno cream sauce on top-- yum! Large Sake was only $5.50 Chicken Teriyaki Dinner $9.95 Prices are great, the quality of food is superb. Call in advance for reservations, this place fills up fast! Parking fills up fast so get there a little early. Tight seating. Little whole in the wall--great find!
My recommendation: takeout. Parking is usually non-existent, especially for dinner.  However, if you do decide to wait, it's worth it.  Their fish is fresh and they're very creative with their rolls.  The staff is mediocre; some friendly, some plain rude, but that's probably because they're wrestling with a massive crowd most nights.  It's that popular!  Anyhow, don't expect the greatest service (nor a seat at a certain time), but you'll most likely encounter a fabulous meal.
Yuki is my favorite restaurant in Santa Clara. My family and I go here at least every other month. Just recently, I made a reservation for 8 people for my birthday. My cousins of course told the waitstaff that it was my birthday and the owner (I think) announced it to everyone in the restaurant (about 60 people). It's such a small place that he had everyone sing for me! It was so embarrassing. As everyone was singing, I even heard someone say, "Look how red she is." :X Their sushi is fresh although they don't have a wide variety of rolls. I just stick with my sake sashimi. I have to have some salmon every time I go there! If it's your first time here, you must know that it's gonna be a long wait. They only take reservations for 6 or more people. And even then you have to work around their schedule. No worries though, it's worth the wait.
Homecooked japanese food. It was so crowded for a sunday night but I can see why. The portions for the cooked meals are large but the sushi is pretty dinky. I ordered the california roll, the vegetarian roll with oshinko, cucumber, and umeshiso and the jackie, soo good! The chicken karagge, broiled ika, and the miso salmon all equally delicious. Probably wasn't worth the 80 dollars for what we got but I enjoyed my dinner nonetheless.
Yuki has been my go-to sushi place for no b.s. good sushi.  The fish is very fresh, the rolls are as creative as I need (no, they don't have 12 thousand different rolls, but they do have the important ones).  The two sisters that work there Suni and Yupin are so incredibly nice, they make the meal just that much better. There's not too much to say for the ambience or the curb appeal... this is not blowfish (thank God), which is a total scene, and a migraine! If you're looking for an excellent sushi meal, without all the fanfare, yuki is the place to go.  I forgot to mention that the prices are incredible, you get so much for so little.
This began as a one-star review.  We came in for dinner to celebrate my little brother's high school graduation and for some reason after taking our drink orders the waitress left our party of 6 sitting unattended for literally half an hour.  Finally one of us flagged down a manager and as soon as he found out he rushed the waitress to our table.  She apologized and said that she'd been waiting to take our order until the "other two" arrived--originally we'd had a reservation for 8 and I guess when we checked in it wasn't made clear that there would now only be 6 of us.  I'm still not sure whether I think this was entirely excusable--I mean, a half hour, really?  And you didn't think once to come by and maybe, I don't know, ASK what was going on?  She looked over at our table once every five minutes so I know it was on her mind...but anyways. Service aside, the sushi I got was pretty good.  I ordered some salmon and tuna nigiri and the fish was fresh and super tender, and that's about all you need.  I wasn't impressed by the ginger, however.  It lacked oomph and didn't add anything to the meal.  And somehow in spite of being at a sushi restaurant, no one else at the table actually ordered sushi (the California roll--which was probably the lamest of any I've had--doesn't count as sushi in my book) but their dishes looked okay.  I tried my dad's curry stew thing and that was pretty tasty, and huge.  I also tried a chunk of tempura shrimp which, when dipped in ponzu sauce, was also tasty. Generally I'm sure this is a pretty solid sushi place--apparently the regulars at our table had never encountered such poor service before--so I can kind of forgive this as a misunderstanding, but not entirely.  As I said before, with good fish it's hard to mess up sushi, and they had good fish--but everything beside the fish?  Not so awesome.  This time.
I thought this tiny place was great! I'm pretty much a sashimi only sort of guy when it comes to eating "sushi". I was pretty skeptical when my buddy, who lives nearby, dragged me here to grab a bite to eat before heading to man-row to grab a drink or two, but i felt a lot better after quickly checking the yelp reviews :p Is this the best sushi place ever? No, i can't say that, but I can say that I really liked eating here. The sushi was reasonably fresh and the prices were great! The sashimi is sold in 10's but the waitress let me know I could get half-orders. We ordered a himachi-kama for an appetizer and had salmon, tuna, and yellow tail, and halibut sashimi. It was all washed down with some hot sake (hey, whats up with their "large" sake? It was so small i can't imagine how big the small is) and a large kirin. Everything was good and I was pleasantly suprised that even the hirame was fresh. Currently, i think  has become my go-to place for a quick fix of sashimi in the south bay.
This place is my favourite Japanese place in the Bay Area, even though I live in San Francisco now. The sushi is really good. They don't have a huge sushi menu with all sort of weird and exotic rolls so if you are into that sort of thing you are SOL. The rolls they do have are all very good, though. Since I'm a big eater I usually order the entrees intead. Getting full on sushi is an expensive proposition. I always order the Nabiyaki Udon and theirs is the best I've ever had. In fact, one time I went there and ordered a bento box instead the lady looked at me in shock and said "What? No udon for you tonight?" Good food, friendly service. It can be really busy at times and the food might take a while to come, but the wait is worth it. EDIT: as of my last 3 visits. they stop giving me a menu and just asked me if I want my "usual". heh.
I am not a fan of sushi. "Want some sushi??" Ooh, I think I'm gonna blow chunks... But ask me if I'd like some sushi from this place and I'll come runnin'! Seriously, I mean it. I have tried sushi at many places and this is my one and only. When I lived nearby I was a weekly customer and the staff knew me by name. Busy, but friendly and well worth any wait! Great sushi, great staff, great place! Gimme, gimme!
The plaza in which Fuki Sushi is located in looks very old school and somewhat run down, but Fuki Sushi is definitely a diamond in the rough.  You'd probably miss this place if you drive by the plaza located on the corner of Winchester Blvd. and Pruneridge.  But looks aside, the place is cozy and pretty welcoming.  There is little to no waiting area, but the sushi is certainly worth waiting for. I think this place is a great value... the sashimi and sushi here is pretty fresh.  You'd expect to pay much more for this kind of quality, but they keep their prices here pretty low.  For example, they have a hamachi sashimi appetizer with 10 pieces for just $9.75!  How great is that?!  Their specialty rolls are all under ten bucks as well... I guess rent is really low in that plaza or I'm not sure how else they'd be able to turn much of a profit here. They also charge less than $5 for a large Japanese beer whereas a lot of other Japanese restaurants charge at least $6 or $7 for the same.  Oh yeah, I forgot to mention that there's also an option to sit in the small tatami area here which is a nice touch.  Anyhow, I'd recommend checking this place out for some good Japanese food at a reasonable price. EDIT:  Just went back last night... Hamachi sashimi appetizer is now $10.50, still cheap and a large Sapporo is now $5.50 (still isn't bad).  The uni was damn good last night and so was the hamachi.  Still a great value.... however, the wait was definitely on the long side.  Definitely go earlier or eat late... I think they take reservations these days.
Never even heard of this place til I went here for a friend's birthday. The restaurant is tiny. Really not recommended for large parties of 6+. Wait was ridiculously long. (30 minutes on top of reservation time even with all of the members of the party present). The rolls are delicious. Fish is fresh. Teriyaki sauce is exceptional. My only real complaint is that the Saba (mackerel) I had ordered, had a plethora of bones. Which really equated, to me chewing extra carefully to avoid having the Heimlich manuever performed on me. Service is top notch. I can't wait to return. Just not on a Friday, Saturday, or Sunday.
Ok - maybe I need to try this place again but to give you an idea of our first impression: we left rolls on the table.  THAT NEVER HAPPENS. We went there for lunch and got bento boxes plus a couple of rolls.  Miso soup makes miso happy!  My husband liked his sushi - he had albacore, salmon, halibut and yellowtail.  I wasn't thrilled with the tempura shrimp.  It was heavy... and although I liked the goyza, my friend didn't.  It was too salty for her tastes.  She wasn't impressed by their chicken teriyaki either.  Rolls were spicy tuna (a staple if you ask me...) and some salmon roll.  We left some of each...  They almost tasted soggy.  Odd description for rolls, I know. Prices were great but I'm not sure if they were great for mediocre food.  I can definitely be a sushi snob after living in NYC on an expense account but given that my japanese friend and clean plate club husband were equally dismayed, I don't think that I'm too off the mark.
Fish is fresh, portion is big, great for the general public who aren't too picky about their Japanese food.  Go for your typical tempura/teriyaki/california rolls fare.  Not my choice of Japanese restaurant. Closes on Mondays.
Put your name on the list at the door, the wait's usually around 15-20 minutes for table for two.  It's usually pretty busy in there... Agedashi tofu ($4.25) - tofu is perfectly fried, just the right amount of green onion and ginger... yum! I recommend it. Ika fry ($5.25) - fried breaded calamari steak - thin slab of fried calamari sliced into strips that comes with a funky tasting brown semi-sour/sweet sauce... I didn't like this very much... pass. Nabeyaki Udon ($9.25) - broth is good, good amount of veggies and udon noodles. Filling! I tried some of their sushi a few times, which is nothing that memorable, but prices are fairly reasonable.  Service is kinda sporadic, sometimes they're on top of things, but there are times that i've had to wait for what seemed like forever for the bill.  However, I usually leave pretty satisfied, and I've been back a few times, so I'd give this place 3 stars...  it's probably your best bet in this area for udon/sushi anyhow...
2.5 stars. This place is alright. It's a small restaurant in a small plaza. My friends and I got to sit at one of those traditional tables where it's low and you have to take off your shoes... Never sat in one before. Hard to get in and out if you're wearing a dress/skirt. Staffers and service was pretty fast. No personality or rapport building here. Food - We shared gyoza and edamame. It's the same everywhere to me. Nothing to talk about. I ordered the sake sashimi appetizer, crunch roll, and spicy tuna roll. The sashimi was very fresh and good. The pieces were pretty big and that's always a plus. The rolls were ehh. They weren't wrapped tight enough because they were coming apart when I was picking them up. The rice might have been on the stickier side too. I don't really have much to say about the rolls - they were just alright to me. Too much mayo on the crunch to taste everything else. Spicy tuna was not spicy whatsoever. My friends ordered bento boxes - they are very generous in portion. Came with a pasta salad that my friends enjoyed. I've never seen it served with at a Japanese sushi restaurant before, but hey why not? I'll stick to the two places I go to.
I'm somewhat apprehensive in reviewing any sushi place, as fish isn't really my thing.  That said, I live fairly close to Yuki Sushi and I would say that my wife and I visit for lunch or dinner at least once a month.  I probably go another 1 or 2 times with friends or coworkers, and they always have positive things to say. I can't write a really detailed, quirky Yelp.-esque review because my working knowledge of sushi choices, preparation techniques & styles, etc. just isn't up to snuff.  Instead, here are just some pros & cons - you be the judge, but I think you'll be happy! Pros: - Friendly staff - prompt service - Excellent food every time I've been (teriyaki, miso, gyoza, Cali rolls, edamame, tempura, misc. sushi) - close to our home - free parking in lot Cons: - Smallish inside, but can be very packed.  Tables are close together, so privacy isn't all there. - Can get pretty busy during peak times, so call ahead or go early! - Not open on Mondays! - $3.95 for 2 pieces of Hamachi (nigiri).  I don't know if that's a fair price or not, but I could eat 8-10 pieces myself!  Too 'spensive for me for "just lunch." All in all, it's local, it's very good, and I like it, so I go back time and again.
Most definitely lives up to the hype. But not 5 stars good because the food just wasn't flawless. -Loved - Agadashi Tofu - crunchy, soft, flavorful.  it was a pretty perfect piece of tofu. crunch roll - jalapeno sauce is way tasty. alaskan roll - giant pieces of salmon and not overly cream cheesy. sake nigiri - very fresh dragon roll - unagi was not fishy, but a good balance of fattiness went very well with the shrimp tempura ( I rarely eat unagi because a tiny bit of fishiness makes me gag, so I was quite impressed, it even passed the test of my pickiness) From the Assorted Sashimi plate - Tako was good, maguro was good, red snapper was good -Mediocre- Rainbow roll - generous portions of fish, but it's pretty standard, not very impressive or stand out from all the other rainbow rolls I've consumed in my life Spicy Tuna roll - it's different, i like the siracha spicy in spicy tuna rolls and I like a bit of a kick that this roll didn't really deliver. From the Sashimi Plate - Halibut was cut too thick, so it was kinda rubbery, but nothing wrong with quality.  Mackerel was okay, cut  too thick also and did not display the fish in a tasty way because of the way it was cut -Not too fond of- Sea bass- never had it before, so I thought I'd try it, And now I know why I never tried it, maybe i just don't like the fish it self, It wasn't really fishy or anything I think this was more of a personal preference. Toro-$10 for 2 piece nigiri, It was HUGE but I didn't like the way it was cut.  All the lines were still in it and it was fishy, not the most fresh and didn't melt in your mouth as much as it should have.  It was worth it for the size but not so much the taste.  A bit disappointed by this, but I think I just got the shit end of the stick on this one. One thing that I notice is that the rice seems to be a bit more sweet than most other places and I think it actually brought out the distinct tastes for certain fish that made it more pleasurable when consumed. Service and ambiance was okay.  They were pretty busy, so it wasn't perfect.  There wasn't anything that pissed me off, food came out quick, drinks were refilled as needed and check came in a timely manner. A small crowded place but quite cozy as well.  The bathroom was clean and smelled okay. I think that about sums it up. Oh and PS apparently they only take reservations for 5+ people in a party. So either go with a big group or expect a long wait (30-40 minutes) on a friday night
The sushi rolls are ok.  The rainbow roll is on the small-ish side.   As other reviewers also commented: the rice in the sushi rolls kinda felled apart. Fish freshness is good, but quality could be better.
Oh Yuki Sushi... how I love thee. When I lived down the street, I was there at least 2-3 times a week. When I lived in SF, I would drive down once a week to get my albacore nigiri and crunch roll fix. Now I live 3,000 miles away, and I make sure to stop by every time I'm within an hour radius. It's that good. Doug, Yu Pin, and Sunee are so sweet and fun. I've been going there for 10 years, and they are my food family. Please open up a Yuki in NYC. I'm going through withdrawals!
This is actually one of my favorite sushi places ever. The service is great, and the rolls are amazingly fresh for being nowhere near the ocean. They are totally filling and I've never had anything bad here. It's also close to San Jose airport, so if you wanna eat before you take off, this is the place to do it.
Saw this place was rated as one of the best sushi places around here so I decided to try it out... the food is pretty good!  I would definitely come here again!  The atmosphere was warm and friendly and the service was great... one of the servers was named Doug and he was awesome!  I must say I think they have the best spicy tuna roll I've ever had!!! I look forward to my next visit!!!
I felt like I was wrapped in a Sushi! This place is REALLY small and busy.  Went on a Tuesday night and it was packed.  The help was really nice and even the people sitting next to us were delightful.  Our waitress was quick with the orders and got our daughter extra noodles when she got fussy. We ordered the New York, Alaskan, Spicy Californian, and Crunch Rolls.  My favorite had to be the Crunch Roll.  The sushi was fresh but nothing to write home about.  In all this place is a decent place for sushi and from reading the other Yelpers pretty consistent. Go here if your in town, but make reservations!
Food was ok, nothing memorable. A little on the pricier side. Service was not great; we waited about 1/2 an hour for one the the seats where you take off your shoes and sit on the floorish (sorry forgot what they're called). The lady then took us to one of the regular table and we were like uhh are we suppose to take off our shoes here. After correcting her she finally seated us at the right spot. Took a while to take our orders and the check. If it were not for the company I was with I would given this place 2 stars. Live, Laugh, and Lunch Patty
I'd give this place a 3.5. The reviews really hyped it up. Went on a little dinner date with my bestie here. It was cute. When we walked in they were packed! We wrote our names down on the list (maybe the fifth or sixth in line) and contemplated the whole time whether or not we should leave. lol. DO NOT put two indecisive people together. It will get you nowhere..... We decided to wait and luckily we got to sit on the traditional Japanese tables so we got to take off our shoes... haha. + Decent prices +Good service +REALLY nice waitresses :) I ordered the jackie and spider roll.. then feeling I could squeeze in more opted to get the rock and roll. I was satisfied. :) Maybe if I'm in the area I shall return.
Another one of our favorite Sushi joints in the Neighborhood.  Quick warning be prepared to wait if you go on a Friday or Saturday for dinner. Like everyone else has said the fish is for the wait alone... (I can feel my mouth watering as I write this review).  Beyond the fish, the food is priced descently.. and the portions are alright. Plenty of parking... a definite must do if your in the mood for some good sushi.. not the trendy type served at Santana Row...
My first time here and I was very impressed. The restaurant is like a little hole in the wall. Service was quick and attentive. Price was very reasonable. I'm not a big eater so I liked how the rolls were only 4-6 pieces, giving me the option to order more than one. They have excellent agedashi tofu and the spicy tuna roll was actually perfect for my liking. I want to give them a 4.5 just because I haven't explored the entire menu but that wouldn't be too fail. So 5 it is.
We go here for lunch once in a while.  They have a nice waiting list if you don't go at the correct time.  The old lady here is really nice.  Not really my favorite sushi place but it comes in second. Pros: If you have the luck, you can sit and eat traditionally.  Kidding, but it's pretty close.  They have this corner section off for sitting on cushion on the group but you can dangle your feet.  You just have to see it. The price is right. Typical, dragon rolls rocks. All the lunch combo is pretty good. Supposedly, the shasimi melts really good Ordering out? It's really fast. Parking is good at times. It's better then you think it is. Cons: One waitress is pretty rude.  Younger, she will give you an attitude. Sushi bar is like never open.  You have to sit on the tables to get your sushi.  Maybe just there for decorations? The tea is not good. Sometimes, it can be messy.
NEVER AGAIN. My husband ended up in the ER with a food poisoning. I'll tell you this, he is not a kind of softie that runs to the doctors with every case of upset stomach . He was on IV because he was severely poisoned. Doctors said that raw fish is the worst case of food poisoning and even could be deadly, if not addressed..... We went to the place because it had great reviews on Yelp, but both ended up with a food poisoning.  I had less raw fish and more of a cooked stuff, thats why i ended up just having a full BOWEL, if you know what i mean.  But my poor hub was admitted to the ER. Our co-pay is gonna be a quite a bit. Im VERY UPSET with yuki sushi. YUCK-sushi, thats it. PS: we had a rainbow, scallop roll and a plate of assorted sashimi. POISONOUS. Their motto: "Yuki sushi - where Fish dies with its natural death..."
You'll def get what you pay for here. Because their rolls on average are half of what other restaurants charge, expect to get half of what you'd get elsewhere. The pieces were about the size of the JFK half dollar. A positive spin is that you'll be able to try more without breaking the bank. While I didn't find anything "special" about their specialty rolls but I would recommend ordering the crunch roll. I'd actually suggest ordering like, three because of the size (tiny!). Sigh, at least the fish was fresh. The service was on point and the complimentary cold noodle appetizers were a nice touch (even if it was shot glass sized). Cute sushi joint but overall, just a tad underwhelming.
